Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB20.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a part to read:PART VIICANNABISChapter1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526 90. Preliminary Provisions91. Adult Use of Cannabis93. Medical CannabisCHAPTER 90PRELIMINARY PROVISIONSSec.9001. Scope of part.9002. Definitions.9003. Smoking.9004. Medical use of cannabis.§ 9001. Scope of part.This part relates to the regulation of cannabis in this Commonwealth.§ 9002. Definitions.Subject to additional definitions contained in subsequent provisions of this part which are applicable to specific provisions of this part, the following words and phrases when used in this part shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Authority." The Keystone Cannabis Authority established under section 9131 (relating to establishment of Keystone Cannabis Authority)."Cannabis." As follows:(1) Any of the following:(i) Marijuana.(ii) Hashish.(iii) Other substances that are identified as including any parts of the plant Cannabis sativa and derivatives or subspecies, including indica, of all strains of cannabis, whether growing or not, including 20250HB0020PN2119 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the seeds, resin extracted from any part of the plant and any compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture or preparation of the plant.(iv) A product intended for human consumption with a THC concentration, however derived, greater than:(A) three-tenths of a percent for any intermediate or finished plant product or material, or any product intended for consumption by inhalation or smoking; or(B) one half milligram per serving or individual product unit, and 2 milligrams per package for products sold in multiple servings or units, for any beverage, food, oil, ointment, tincture, topical formation or any other product that is intended for consumption by means other than inhalation or smoking.(2) The term includes THC and all other naturally or synthetically produced cannabinol derivatives, whether produced directly or indirectly by extraction, including, delta-7 THC, delta-8 THC, delta-9 THC or any structural, optical or geometric isomers of tetrahydrocannabinol, cannabis flower, concentrate and cannabis-infused edible and nonedible products.(3) The term does not include:(i) The mature stalks of the cannabis plant.(ii) Fiber produced from the stalks of a cannabis plant.(iii) Oil or cake made from the seeds of the cannabis plant or any other compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture or preparation of the mature stalks.20250HB0020PN2119 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iv) The sterilized seed of the cannabis plant that is incapable of germination.(v) Industrial hemp as defined in 3 Pa.C.S. § 702 (relating to definitions) below the THC concentrate limits prescribed in paragraph (1)(iv)."Cannabis-infused edible product." A product meant to be chewed, dissolved, taken sublingually, buccally, or swallowed. The term includes liquids, including beverages, food, oil, tincture, capsule, tablet, gummies or other ingestible forms containing cannabis or cannabis concentrate that are not intended to be smoked or otherwise inhaled."Cannabis-infused nonedible product." A product meant to be used topically or otherwise not intended to be ingested. The term includes gels, creams, patches or ointments containing cannabis or cannabis concentrate."Medical cannabis business establishment." A dispensary, as defined in section 9303 (relating to definitions), or a grower/processor granted a permit under section 9343 (relating to granting of permits)."Medical cannabis grower/processor." A person, including a natural person, corporation, partnership, association, trust or other entity, or any combination thereof, which holds a permit from the authority under Chapter 93 (relating to medical use of cannabis) to grow and process medical cannabis."Minority-owned business." As defined in 74 Pa.C.S. § 303(b) (relating to diverse business participation)."Smoking." The inhalation of smoke caused by the combustion of cannabis."THC." A delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol and any structural, optical or geometric isomers of tetrahydrocannabinol, including 20250HB0020PN2119 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 delta-7, delta-8 and delta-10 tetrahydrocannabinol, tetrahydrocannabinolic acid, tetrahydrocannabiphorol, hexahydrocannabinol and any other substance, however derived, including synthetically or from hemp or hemp materials, that has similar effects on the mind or body as determined by the authority."Veteran-owned small business." As defined in 51 Pa.C.S. § 9601 (relating to definitions)."Women-owned business." As defined in 74 Pa.C.S. § 303(b).§ 9003. Smoking.The smoking of cannabis by individuals 21 years of age or older or patients under Chapter 93 (relating to medical cannabis) shall not be permitted in any public place. Nothing in this part may be construed to require a person or establishment in lawful possession of property to allow a guest, client, lessee, adult-use consumer or visitor to use cannabis on or in that property, including on land owned in whole or in part or managed in whole or in part by the Commonwealth.§ 9004. Medical use of cannabis.Nothing in this chapter or Chapter 91 (relating to adult use cannabis) shall be construed to limit any privileges or rights of a patient, including minor patients, or caregivers under Chapter 93.CHAPTER 91ADULT USE OF CANNABISSubchapterA. Preliminary ProvisionsB. Lawful Use and AuthorityC. Personal Use of CannabisD. Keystone Cannabis Authority20250HB0020PN2119 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 E. Social and Economic EquityF. Regulation of Cannabis Business EstablishmentsG. Enforcement and ImmunitiesH. Laboratory TestingI. Advertising, Marketing, Packaging and LabelingJ. Preparation, Destruction and Regulation of Cannabis and Cannabis-infused Edible and Nonedible ProductsK. TaxesL. Cannabis Clean SlateM. Miscellaneous ProvisionsSUBCHAPTER APRELIMINARY PROVISIONSSec.9101. Scope of chapter.9102. Definitions.§ 9101. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to the adult use of cannabis in this Commonwealth.§ 9102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Adult use." Cannabis that can be purchased and consumed by an individual 21 years of age and older."Adult-use consumer." An individual who is at least 21 years of age."Adult-use cultivation center." A facility operated by an organization or business that is permitted by the authority to cultivate, process, transport and perform other necessary activities to provide adult-use cannabis and cannabis-infused 20250HB0020PN2119 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 edible and nonedible products to cannabis business establishments."Adult-use cultivation center permit." A permit issued by the authority that permits an entity to act as a cultivation and processing center under this chapter or any regulation promulgated in accordance with this chapter."Advertise." To engage in promotional activities, including through newspaper, radio, Internet and electronic media and television advertising. The term:(1) Includes the distribution of fliers and circulars, billboard advertising and the display of window signs.(2) Does not include interior dispensary signage or exterior signage displaying the name of the permitted cannabis business establishment."Agent." A principal officer, board member, employee or other agent of a cannabis business establishment who is 21 years of age or older."Agent identification card." An identification card issued by the authority to an agent under section 9159.15 (relating to agent identification cards)."Applicant." A person applying for a permit under this chapter."Board." The board of directors of the authority established under section 9131 (relating to establishment of the Keystone Cannabis Authority)."Bona fide labor organization." A labor organization, as defined by 29 U.S.C. § 402(i) (relating to definitions), that has entered or will enter into a labor peace agreement. In making this determination, the agency shall consider each of the following as indicative, but not determinative, of a finding 20250HB0020PN2119 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 that a labor organization is a "bona fide labor organization":(1) The labor organization has been recognized or certified as the bargaining representative for cannabis employees in the state.(2) The labor organization has executed current collective bargaining agreement(s) with cannabis employers in the state.(3) The labor organization has spent resources as part of a current and active attempt(s) to organize and represent cannabis workers in the state;(4) The labor organization has filed the annual report required by 29 U.S.C. § 431(b) (relating to report of labor organizations) for the three years immediately preceding.(5) The labor organization has audited financial reports covering the three years immediately preceding.(6) The existence of written bylaws or constitution for the three years immediately preceding.(7) The labor organization ' s affiliation with any regional or national association of unions, including but not limited to central labor councils."Cannabis business establishment." A person holding a permit issued by the authority to cultivate, process, dispense, infuse or transport adult-use cannabis, including a dispensary, adult-use cultivation center, social and economic equity dispensary permit holder or microcultivation center."Cannabis concentrate." A product derived from cannabis that is produced by extracting cannabinoids, including THC, with the intended use of smoking, vaping or making a cannabis-infused edible and nonedible product. The term includes a product derived from cannabis that is produced by means of heat and 20250HB0020PN2119 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 pressure or mechanical separations."Cannabis flower." The term:(1) Includes cannabis, hashish or other substances identified as including any parts of the plant Cannabis sativa and derivatives or subspecies, including indica, of all strains of cannabis, including raw kief, leaves and buds.(2) Does not include resin that has been extracted from any part of the plant or any compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture or preparation of the plant, the plant's seeds or resin."Cannabis paraphernalia." Any equipment, product or material which is primarily intended or designed for any of the following:(1) Use in vaporizing, ingesting, inhaling or otherwise introducing a cannabis-infused edible and nonedible product into the human body.(2) Preparing, storing or containing cannabis."Cannabis testing facility." An entity registered by the authority to test cannabis for potency and contaminants."Change in control." The acquisition by a person or group of persons acting in concert of a controlling interest in an applicant or permittee either all at one time or over the span of a 12-consecutive-month period."Clone." A plant section from a female cannabis plant not yet root-bound, growing in a water solution or other propagation matrix, that can develop into a new plant."Controlling interest." Voting rights that entitle a person to elect or appoint one or more of the members of the board of directors or other governing board or the ownership or beneficial holding of 5% or more of the securities of a publicly 20250HB0020PN2119 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 traded or privately held entity."Curbside." The transfer or dispensing of cannabis or a cannabis-infused edible and nonedible product by an employee of a cannabis business establishment to a vehicle located in the parking area or to an individual at the entrance of the facility."Disadvantaged business." A business that is owned or controlled by a majority of persons, not limited to members of minority groups, who are subject to racial or ethnic prejudice or cultural bias."Dispensary." An establishment that is permitted by the authority to acquire cannabis from a cultivation center or microcultivation center or other dispensary for the purpose of selling or dispensing cannabis, cannabis concentrates, cannabis-infused edible and nonedible products, cannabis seeds, immature cannabis plants, paraphernalia or related supplies to individuals 21 years of age or older and medical patients as permitted in Chapter 93 (relating to medical use of cannabis)."Dispensary permit." A permit issued by the authority that allows a person to act as a dispensary under this chapter, Chapter 93 or any regulation promulgated in accordance with this chapter."Disproportionately impacted area." Geographic areas, such as, but not limited to, precincts, zip codes, neighborhoods, and political subdivisions, reflecting a disparate enforcement of cannabis prohibition, including, but not limited to, a history of arrests, convictions, and other law enforcement practices, during a certain time period, when compared to the rest of the state. The authority shall issue guidelines to determine how to assess which communities have been disproportionately impacted 20250HB0020PN2119 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and how to assess if someone is a member of a disproportionately impacted area."Diverse business." A disadvantaged business, minority-owned or women-owned business or service-disabled veteran-owned or veteran-owned small business that has been certified by a third-party certifying organization."Enclosed, locked facility." A room, greenhouse, building or other enclosed area equipped with locks or other security devices that permit access only to cannabis business establishment agents working for the permitted cannabis business establishment or acting under this chapter to cultivate, process, store or distribute adult-use cannabis."Enclosed, locked space." Space within a facility, building or other enclosed area equipped with locks or other security devices that permit access only to authorized individuals under this chapter."Excipients." Solvents, chemicals or materials reported by a cannabis business establishment and approved by the authority for use in the processing of cannabis."Financial backer." An investor, mortgagee, bondholder, note holder or other source of equity, capital or other assets, other than a financial institution."Financial institution." As defined in section 3003.22(r) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971."Flowering stage." The stage of cultivation where and when a cannabis plant is cultivated to produce plant material for a cannabis-infused edible and nonedible product. The term includes mature plants if any of the following apply:(1) More than two stigmas are visible at each internode 20250HB0020PN2119 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of the plant.(2) The cannabis plant is in an area that has been intentionally deprived of light for a period of time intended to produce flower buds and induce maturation, from the moment the light deprivation began through the remainder of the cannabis plant growth cycle."Form of cannabis." The characteristics of cannabis or cannabis products, including the method of consumption and any particular strain, variety and quantity or percentage of cannabis or particular active ingredient."Harvest batch." A specifically identified quantity of cannabis plant that is uniform in strain, cultivated utilizing the same growing practices, harvested at the same time and at the same location and cured under uniform conditions."Harvest lot." A specifically identified quantity of cannabis plant taken from a harvest batch."Labor peace agreement." An agreement between an applicant or a cannabis employer and a bona fide labor organization that seeks to represent employees who perform one or more classes of work to be performed pursuant to this contract, where such agreement requires that the covered cannabis and the labor organization and its members agree to the uninterrupted delivery of services to be rendered pursuant to this contract and to refrain from actions intended to or having the effect of interrupting such services."Limited access area." A room or other area under the control of a dispensary where adult-use cannabis sales occur with access limited to individuals who are 21 years of age or older."Member of an impacted family." An individual who has a 20250HB0020PN2119 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 parent, legal guardian, grandparent, child, sibling, spouse or dependent or was a dependent of an individual who, prior to the effective date of this definition, was arrested for, convicted of or adjudicated delinquent for any offense that is eligible for expungement under section 9199.11(b) (relating to cannabis clean slate)."Microcultivation center." A facility operated by a person that is permitted to cultivate, dry, cure, extract, process, and package adult-use cannabis, including cannabis-infused edible and nonedible products and perform other necessary activities to make adult-use cannabis available for sale at a dispensary."Microcultivation center permit." An authorization issued by the authority to a person to conduct activities of a microcultivation center under this chapter."Ordinary public view." Within the sight line of a normal visual range of an individual, unassisted by visual aids, from a public street or sidewalk adjacent to real property or from within an adjacent property."Ownership and control." Ownership of at least 51% of a business, including corporate stock of a corporation, and control over the management and day-to-day operations of the business and an interest in the capital, assets, profits and losses of the business proportionate to the percentage of ownership."Permittee." A person granted a permit under this chapter."Person." An individual, firm, partnership, association, joint stock company, joint venture, public or private corporation, limited liability company or a receiver, executor, trustee, guardian or other representative appointed by order of a court.20250HB0020PN2119 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Possession limit." The amount of adult-use cannabis that may be possessed at any one time by an individual 21 years of age or older. This does not include purchases made by qualified medical patients or qualified registered caregivers."Principal officer." As follows:(1) An officer, director or person who directly owns more than a 10% beneficial interest or ownership of the securities of a cannabis business establishment applicant or permittee or more than a 10% beneficial interest or ownership of the securities of a cannabis business establishment applicant or permittee that is a publicly traded company.(2) A person that has a controlling interest in a cannabis business establishment applicant or permittee or that has the ability to elect the majority of the authority of directors of a cannabis business establishment applicant or permittee.(3) A person that otherwise controls a cannabis business establishment applicant or permittee.(4) The term does not include a financial institution."Process lot." An amount of cannabis product of the same type and processed using the same cannabis extract, standard operating procedures and the same or combination of different harvest lots."Remediation." The reprocessing of a manufactured cannabis-infused product batch that has failed laboratory testing conducted by a cannabis testing facility or the processing of cannabis flower that has failed laboratory testing conducted by a cannabis testing facility."Restricted access area." An area of a permitted cannabis business establishment where only agents are allowed, with 20250HB0020PN2119 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 limited exceptions."Security." As defined in section 102(t) of the act of December 5, 1972 (P.L.1280, No.284), known as the Pennsylvania Securities Act of 1972."Seed-to-sale tracking system." A system designated by the authority in accordance with section 9133(a)(9) (relating to powers and duties of authority)."Small business." An independently owned and operated for- profit business that employs 25 or fewer employees and not a subsidiary or affiliate of a corporation."Social and economic equity applicant." An applicant that meets any of the following criteria:(1) Is comprised of at least 75% ownership and control by one or more individuals who have resided for at least five of the preceding 10 years in a disproportionately impacted area in this Commonwealth.(2) Is comprised of at least 75% ownership and control by one or more individuals who:(i) have been arrested for, convicted of or adjudicated delinquent for an offense that is eligible for expungement under this chapter; or(ii) are members of an impacted family.(3) Is a veteran-owned small business."Social and economic equity dispensary permit." A dispensary permit issued to a social and economic equity applicant."Tincture." A cannabis-infused solution, typically comprised of alcohol, glycerin or vegetable oils derived either directly from the cannabis plant or from a processed cannabis extract. The term:(1) Includes a calibrated dropper or other similar 20250HB0020PN2119 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 device capable of accurately measuring servings.(2) Does not include an alcoholic liquor as used in the act of April 12, 1951 (P.L.90, No.21), known as the Liquor Code.SUBCHAPTER BLAWFUL USE AND AUTHORITYSec.9110. Lawful use.9111. Authority.9112. Background checks.§ 9110. Lawful use.Notwithstanding any other provision of law, use or possession of cannabis as specified under this chapter shall be lawful in this Commonwealth.§ 9111. Authority.(a) Sole authority.--The authority shall have general and sole regulatory authority over the conduct of medical and adult-use cannabis or related activities as described in this chapter and Chapter 93 (relating to medical use of cannabis) and shall administer and enforce the provisions of these chapters. The authority shall have all the powers necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate its purposes in administering the adult-use and medical cannabis programs.(b) Granted authority.--Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an authority granted to a Commonwealth agency or Commonwealth employee or appointee under Chapter 93 (relating to medical use of cannabis) shall be given to the Commonwealth agency or employee or appointee empowered to permit, discipline, revoke, regulate or make regulations under this chapter.§ 9112. Background checks.20250HB0020PN2119 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Criminal history record check.--The authority shall, through the Pennsylvania State Police, conduct a criminal history record check of each prospective principal officer, board member and agent of a cannabis business establishment applying for a permit or agent identification card under this chapter. The Pennsylvania State Police shall furnish, after a positive identification, all Pennsylvania conviction information and shall forward the national criminal history record information to the authority. After the effective date of this subsection, a principal officer, board member or agent of a cannabis business establishment who is convicted of diverting adult-use cannabis or cannabis-infused edible or nonedible products or who intentionally dispenses adult-use cannabis or cannabis-infused edible or nonedible products in a manner not consistent with this chapter shall be deemed to have failed the criminal history record check under this subsection and may not be permitted or otherwise be employed by a cannabis business establishment in this Commonwealth.(b) Fingerprinting.--Each cannabis business establishment prospective principal officer, board member or agent shall submit fingerprints to the Pennsylvania State Police in the form and manner prescribed by the Pennsylvania State Police. Unless otherwise provided by Federal or State law, the fingerprints under this subsection shall be transmitted through a live scan fingerprint vendor and checked against the fingerprint records filed in the Pennsylvania State Police and Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history records databases.(c) Fee.--The Pennsylvania State Police shall charge a fee for conducting the criminal history record check, which shall not exceed the actual cost of the Commonwealth and national 20250HB0020PN2119 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 criminal history record check.(d) Submission and initial employment.--When applying for the initial permit or identification card, the background checks for each prospective principal officer, board member and agent of a cannabis business establishment may be completed concurrent with submitting the application to the authority. An agent may begin working at a cannabis business establishment while waiting for the result of a background check.(e) Construction.--Nothing in this section or chapter shall be construed to prevent or otherwise inhibit the ability of an otherwise qualified individual from serving as a principal officer, board member or agent of a cannabis business establishment on the sole basis of a nonviolent criminal conviction related to cannabis.(f) Certain convictions prohibited.--(1) A prior conviction solely for a cannabis related offense shall not disqualify an individual or otherwise affect eligibility for licensure or employment, including volunteering, as it related to permitted activities within this chapter and chapter 93 (relating to medical use of cannabis).(2) The following individuals may not hold volunteer positions or positions with remuneration in or be affiliated with a cannabis business establishment, including a clinical registrant under Ch. 93 Subch. I (relating to academic clinical research centers and clinical registrants), in any way if the individual has been convicted of a felony violent crime:(i) Financial backers.(ii) Principals.20250HB0020PN2119 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) Employees.SUBCHAPTER CPERSONAL USE OF CANNABISSec.9121. Personal use of cannabis, restrictions on cultivation and penalties.9122. Possession limits.9123. Individuals younger than 21 years of age.9124. Identification, false identification and penalty.9125. Immunities and presumptions related to use of cannabis by adult-use consumers.9126. Discrimination prohibited.9127. Limitations and penalties.9128. Employment and employer liability.§ 9121. Personal use of cannabis, restrictions on cultivation and penalties.Beginning 90 days after the effective date of this section, notwithstanding any other provision of law and except as otherwise specified under this chapter, the following acts shall not be a violation of this chapter and shall not be a criminal or civil offense under State law or an ordinance of a local government unit of this Commonwealth or be a basis for seizure or forfeiture of assets under State law for an individual other than an individual younger than 21 years of age, unless that individual, and the individual's caregiver, if applicable, is authorized under Chapter 93 (relating to medical use of cannabis) to:(1) possess, consume, use, purchase, obtain or transport cannabis in an amount for personal use that does not exceed the possession limit or requirements of this chapter;20250HB0020PN2119 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) possess, use, obtain or transport cannabis paraphernalia;(3) transfer without remuneration, within lawful possession limits, to an individual 21 years of age or older;(4) control property if actions that are authorized by this chapter occur on the property in accordance with this chapter; and(5) vaporize adult-use cannabis concentrate anywhere smoking is permitted.§ 9122. Possession limits.(a) Limits.--Except as otherwise authorized under this chapter, for an individual who is 21 years of age or older, the possession limits for adult-use cannabis shall be as follows and cumulative:(1) Two and one-half ounces of cannabis flower.(2) 1,000 milligrams of THC contained in cannabis-infused edible or nonedible products.(3) Fifteen grams of cannabis concentrate.(b) Excess prohibited.--A person may not knowingly obtain, seek to obtain or possess an amount of adult-use cannabis from a dispensary that would exceed the possession limit under this section. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter and Chapter 93 (relating to medical use of cannabis), a person 21 years of age or older that is found to be in possession of an amount of adult-use cannabis that exceeds the possession limit is subject to the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act.(c) Exception.--Cannabis and cannabis-derived substances regulated under 3 Pa.C.S. Chs. 7 (relating to industrial hemp research) and 15 (relating to controlled plants and noxious 20250HB0020PN2119 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 weeds) and the Agriculture Improvement Act of 2018 (Public Law 115-334, 132 Stat. 4490) shall not apply to this section.§ 9123. Individuals younger than 21 years of age.(a) Prohibition.--An individual younger than 21 years of age commits a summary offense by attempting to purchase, purchasing, consuming, possessing, knowingly and intentionally transporting, or growing adult-use cannabis. This section does not prohibit the use of medical cannabis by qualified registered patients under chapter 93 (relating to medical use of cannabis).(b) Penalties for underage cannabis offenses.--(1) An individual who violates subsection (a) may be sentenced to pay a fine of not more than $500 for the first offense and not more than $1,000 for a second offense and each subsequent violation.(2) A State or local law enforcement agency shall keep a record of a violation of subsection (a) in a repository or database separate from a repository or database with other law enforcement records. A record of a violation of subsection (a) shall only be used to determine if an individual committed a subsequent violation of subsection (a). A State or local law enforcement agency shall destroy a record of a violation of subsection (a) when the individual who committed the offense attains 21 years of age.(3) A State or local law enforcement agency responsible for enforcing a violation of subsection (a) shall notify the parent or guardian of the individual who committed the offense if the individual is younger than 18 years of age.(4) When an individual is charged for violating subsection (a), the magisterial district judge may admit the offender to the adjudication alternative program as 20250HB0020PN2119 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 authorized under 42 Pa.C.S. § 1520 (relating to adjudication alternative program) or any other preadjudication disposition if the individual has not previously received a preadjudication disposition for violating subsection (a).(c) Intentional transfer or possession to underage individual.--An individual 21 years of age or older who intentionally transfers adult-use cannabis, with or without remuneration, to an individual younger than 21 years of age or intentionally allows an individual younger than 21 years of age to purchase, possess, use, process, transport, grow or consume adult-use cannabis may be disqualified from purchasing adult-use cannabis as authorized under this chapter in addition to being subject to additional criminal or civil penalties under State law. The authority shall promulgate regulations to implement this subsection for the purpose of notifying dispensaries of a disqualification under this subsection and the penalties that may be imposed against a cannabis business establishment or agent for intentionally transferring adult-use cannabis to an individual younger than 21 years of age.§ 9124. Identification, false identification and penalty.(a) No personal information required.--To protect personal privacy, the authority may not require an adult-use consumer to provide a dispensary with personal information other than for the purpose of verifying the adult-use consumer's age by means of a government-issued identification. A dispensary may not obtain or record personal information about adult-use consumer without the adult-use consumer's consent.(b) Scanning identification.--A dispensary shall use an electronic reader or electronic scanning device to scan a purchaser's government-issued identification to determine the 20250HB0020PN2119 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 adult-use consumer's age and the validity of the identification. A cannabis business establishment may operate for temporary periods without an operational electronic reader or electronic scanning device if a process is implemented to determine the adult-use consumer's age and the validity of identification.§ 9125. Immunities and presumptions related to use of cannabis by adult-use consumers.(a) Penalty applicability.--An adult-use consumer shall not be subject to arrest, prosecution, denial of a right or privilege or other punishment, including a civil penalty or disciplinary action taken by licensing or permitting board, based solely on any of the following:(1) The use or possession of adult-use cannabis, if:(i) the adult-use consumer possesses an amount of adult-use cannabis that does not exceed the possession limit under this chapter; and(ii) the use of cannabis does not impair the adult-use consumer when engaged in the practice of the profession for which the adult-use consumer is licensed, permitted, certified or registered.(2) Selling cannabis paraphernalia if employed and authorized as an agent by a permitted dispensary.(3) Being in the presence or vicinity of the use of adult-use cannabis or cannabis paraphernalia as authorized under this chapter.(4) Possessing cannabis paraphernalia.(b) Determination of probable cause.--(1) Possession of or application for authorization to work as a cannabis business establishment agent or the agent identification card shall not:20250HB0020PN2119 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) constitute probable cause or reasonable suspicion to believe that a crime has been committed; or(ii) be used as the sole basis to support the search of the person, property or residence of the individual authorized to work as a cannabis business establishment agent, possessing an agent identification card or applying for authorization to work as an agent.(2) The possession of or application for authorization to work as a cannabis business establishment agent or possession of an agent identification card shall not preclude the existence of probable cause if probable cause exists based on other grounds.(c) Reliance.--An individual employed by the Commonwealth or a local government unit shall not be subject to criminal or civil penalties for taking an action in good faith in reliance on the provisions of this chapter when acting within the scope of employment.(d) Law enforcement liability.--A law enforcement or correctional agency, or an employee of a law enforcement or correctional agency, shall not be subject to criminal or civil liability, except for willful and wanton misconduct, as a result of taking an action within the scope of the official duties of the law enforcement or correctional agency or employee to prohibit or prevent the possession or use of adult-use cannabis by any of the following:(1) An individual incarcerated at a correctional institution, county jail or other facility under the supervision of the Department of Corrections.(2) An individual on parole or mandatory supervised release or otherwise under the lawful jurisdiction of the law 20250HB0020PN2119 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 enforcement or correctional agency or employee.(e) Medical care.--For the purpose of receiving medical care, including an organ transplant, an individual's use of cannabis under this chapter shall not constitute the use of an illicit substance or otherwise disqualify an individual from medical care.(f) Firearms possession.--A lawful adult-use consumer or possessor of adult-use cannabis under this chapter or a patient may not be prohibited or otherwise restricted from lawful firearm ownership. The Pennsylvania State Police shall take measures to revise firearms applications or take other necessary actions to ensure compliance with this chapter.(g) Child custody.--The purchase or possession of adult-use cannabis shall not be a determining factor in a child custody matter. The record of a legal purchase of adult-use cannabis shall not be subject to disclosure solely due to a custody action.§ 9126. Discrimination prohibited.(a) Child welfare.--The presence of cannabinoid component or metabolites in an individual's bodily fluids, possession of cannabis-related paraphernalia, conduct related to the use of cannabis or the participation in cannabis-related activities authorized under this chapter by a custodial or noncustodial parent, grandparent, legal guardian, foster parent or other individual charged with the well-being of a child, may not form the sole, primary basis or supporting basis for an action or proceeding by a child welfare agency or family or juvenile court. Unless the individual's actions in relation to cannabis create an unreasonable danger to the safety of the child or otherwise show the individual is not competent as established by 20250HB0020PN2119 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 clear and convincing evidence, the prohibition under this subsection shall include any of the following:(1) An adverse finding, evidence or restriction of a right or privilege in a proceeding related to the adoption of a child.(2) A fitness determination or a determination related to a foster parent, guardianship, conservatorship or trusteeship.(3) The execution of a will or the management of an estate.(b) Landlords.--A landlord may not be penalized or denied a benefit of leasing to an individual who uses cannabis under this chapter.(c) Use in private area.--Nothing in this chapter may be construed to require a person or establishment in lawful possession of property to allow a guest, client, lessee, adult-use consumer or visitor to use cannabis on or in that property, including on land owned in whole or in part or managed in whole or in part by the Commonwealth.§ 9127. Limitations and penalties.(a) General limitations.--This chapter shall not permit an individual to engage in and shall not prevent the imposition of a civil, criminal or other penalty for engaging in any of the following:(1) Undertaking a task under the influence of cannabis when doing so would constitute negligence, professional malpractice or professional misconduct.(2) Possessing cannabis:(i) in a school bus;(ii) on the grounds of a preschool or primary or 20250HB0020PN2119 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 secondary school;(iii) in a correctional institution;(iv) in a vehicle not open to the public unless the cannabis is in a cannabis container and reasonably inaccessible while the vehicle is moving; or(v) in a private residence that is used at any time to provide permitted childcare or other similar social service care on the premises.(3) Using cannabis:(i) on a school bus;(ii) on the grounds of a preschool or primary or secondary school;(iii) in a correctional institution;(iv) in a motor vehicle;(v) in a private residence that is used at any time to provide permitted child care or other similar social service care on the premises; or(vi) knowingly in close physical proximity to an individual younger than 21 years of age.(4) Operating, navigating or being in actual physical control of any motor vehicle, aircraft, watercraft or snowmobile while using or under the influence of cannabis.(5) Facilitating the use of cannabis by an individual who is not authorized to use cannabis.(6) Transferring cannabis to an individual in violation of this chapter.(7) The use of cannabis by a law enforcement officer, constable, corrections officer, probation officer or firefighter while on duty.(8) The use of cannabis by an individual who has a 20250HB0020PN2119 - 27 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 commercial driver's license while on duty.(b) Business restriction.--Nothing in this chapter shall prevent a private business from restricting or prohibiting the use of cannabis on business property, including areas where motor vehicles are parked.(c) Supremacy implication.--Nothing in this chapter shall authorize or otherwise require an individual or business entity to violate Federal law, including the ability to consume cannabis in public housing or on college or university campuses.(d) THC limitations.--A person may not sell, offer for sale, dispense, process, manufacture, market, advertise or distribute cannabis or a product intended for consumption or inhalation in excess of the THC concentrations and limits prescribed, unless permitted and authorized under this part.(e) Cannabinoid product limitations.--A person may not sell, dispense, process, manufacture or distribute a cannabinoid product that is not derived from naturally occurring biologically active chemical constituents.(f) Penalties.--A person who violates subsection (d) or (e) is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. Upon conviction, the court may sentence the person to a pay a fine not to exceed $10,000 for each offense under subsection (d) or (e).§ 9128. Employment and employer liability.(a) Workplace policies.--Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit an employer from adopting reasonable zero-tolerance policies, drug-free workplace policies or employment policies concerning testing, smoking, consuming, storing or using cannabis in the workplace or while on call, if the policies are applied in a nondiscriminatory manner. Nothing in this chapter shall require an employer to permit an employee to be under the 20250HB0020PN2119 - 28 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 influence of or use cannabis in the employer's workplace or while performing the employee's job duties or while on call.(b) Violations of employer policies.--Nothing in this chapter shall limit or prevent an employer from disciplining an employee or terminating employment of an employee for violating an employer's employment policies or workplace drug policy. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to interfere with any Federal, State or local restrictions on employment.SUBCHAPTER DKEYSTONE CANNABIS AUTHORITYSec.9131. Establishment of the Keystone Cannabis Authority.9132. Applicability of other statutes.9133. Powers and duties of authority.9134. Regulations.9135. Temporary regulations.9136. Confidentiality and public disclosure.9137. Unauthorized activities and civil penalties.9138. Community Opportunity Fund.9139. Governing practice and procedure.§ 9131. Program establishment.(a) Establishment.--The Keystone Cannabis Authority is established as a body corporate and politic constituting a public corporation and government instrumentality.(b) Management.--The board shall exercise the powers of the authority.(c) Transfer.--The Department of Health's oversight of the medical cannabis program established under Chapter 93 (relating to medical use of cannabis) shall be transferred to the authority within 90 days of the effective date of this 20250HB0020PN2119 - 29 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subsection. All authority, information, documents, databases and necessary information of the medical cannabis program shall be transferred to the authority within 90 days of the effective date of this subsection. The failure of the Department of Health to timely transfer its authority, information, documents, databases and necessary information of the medical cannabis program to the authority shall not delay or inhibit the ability of a current medical cannabis business establishment on the effective date of this subsection from commencing adult use operations.(d) Members.--The authority shall be governed by a board consisting of seven members selected as follows:(1) Three members appointed by the Governor, two of which shall consist of the following:(i) a member who represents labor; and(ii) a member who represents persons involved in social and economic equity.(2) One member appointed by each of the following:(i) the President pro tempore of the Senate;(ii) the Speaker of the House of Representatives;(iii) the Minority Leader of the Senate; and(iv) the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives.(e) Terms.--Each board member shall serve for a term of three years.(f) Vacancy.--If a vacancy occurs on the board or when a board member's term expires, the remaining members of the board shall appoint a successor member of the board within 60 days of the vacancy.(g) Compensation.--A member of the board shall be entitled 20250HB0020PN2119 - 30 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to compensation not to exceed the amount of 75% of the compensation paid to members of the General Assembly under section 4 of the act of September 30, 1983 (P.L.160, No.39), known as the Public Official Compensation Law, and as updated for cost-of-living adjustments published annually in the Pennsylvania Bulletin. A member of the board may decline to receive compensation under this subsection. Each board member shall be entitled for reimbursement of expenses actually incurred in the performance of official duties of the board.(h) Ethics.--The authority shall establish a code of ethics for all members and employees. A copy of the code shall be filed with the Pennsylvania State Ethics Commission. The code shall include provisions reasonably necessary to carry out the purposes of this section and any other laws subject to the jurisdiction of the authority including, but not limited to: (1) Prohibiting the receipt of gifts by board members and employees from a cannabis business establishment or medical cannabis business establishment, applicant, affiliate or other person or entity subject to the jurisdiction of the authority.(2) Prohibiting the participation by board members and employees in a particular matter that affects the financial interest of a relative within the third degree of consanguinity or a person with whom the board member or employee has a significant relationship.(3) Providing for recusal of a board member in a licensing decision due to a potential conflict of interest.(i) Removal of members.--A member of the authority may be removed by a majority vote of the board for substantial neglect of duty, inability to discharge the powers and duties of office 20250HB0020PN2119 - 31 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or gross misconduct or conviction of a felony.(j) Liability.--A member of the board shall not be liable personally on any obligation of the board or authority.(k) Organization.--(1) The board shall select a chairperson of the board by majority vote of the members of the board.(2) In the case of absence during a meeting of the board, the chairperson of the board may designate another member to serve as a substitute chairperson.(l) Quorum.--(1) A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum of the board for the purpose of organizing the authority and conducting official business.(2) Only members of the board who are physically present at a meeting of the board or able to participate fully in the deliberations by appropriate telecommunications means shall count toward a quorum of the board.(3) If a quorum is not present, a hearing of the board may still take place.(m) Voting.--Official action shall be taken by a vote of a majority of the members of the board present to otherwise fully participating at a meeting of the board.(n) Advisory committees and subcommittees.--(1) Advisory committees and subcommittees may be formed to advise and assist the work of the board.(2) The chairperson of the board may appoint advisory committees that may consist of members, nonmembers, outside experts and staff of the board.(3) Only a board member may be the chairperson of advisory committee.20250HB0020PN2119 - 32 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) An advisory committee or subcommittee may be formed to address and make recommendations on subjects determined by the board, including, but not limited to, any of the following topics:(i) Public health and wellness(ii) Community safety and well-being.(iii) Judicial and carceral systems.(iv) Education.(v) Housing.(vi) Employment.(vii) Business and entrepreneurship.(viii) Agriculture and food systems.(ix) Medical marijuana program efficiency.(5) Each department, agency, office or other entity of the Commonwealth may cooperate and provide the authority or its advisory committees or subcommittees with staff and expertise to assist the authority in carrying out the powers and duties under this act.(6) Recognized experts in the subject matter of an advisory committee or subcommittee of the board may be appointed to advise and assist the advisory committee or subcommittee by the board.(o) Meetings.--(1) The board shall meet at the call of the chairperson.(2) The board and each advisory committee or subcommittee of the board shall meet as often as deemed necessary.(3) Within 90 days of the appointment of the initial members of the board, the board shall conduct its first meeting.20250HB0020PN2119 - 33 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (p) Office of Social Equity.--(1) The authority shall establish an Office of Social Equity. The governor shall appoint a director of the Office of Social Equity.(2) The director of the Office of Social Equity shall report directly to the governor.(3) The Office of Social Equity may employ staff and retain contractors as may be required to carry out the functions of the office.(4) The Office of Social Equity shall:(i) Promote and encourage full participation in the regulated cannabis industry by persons from disproportionately impacted areas to positively impact those communities;(ii) Consult with and assist the authority in the administration of the Community Opportunity Fund.§ 9132. Applicability of other statutes.The authority shall be subject to the following acts:(1) The act of July 19, 1957 (P.L.1017, No.451), known as the State Adverse Interest Act.(2) The act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.(3) The provisions of 65 Pa.C.S. Chs. 7 (relating to open meetings) and 11 (relating to ethics standards and financial disclosure).§ 9133. Powers and duties of authority.(a) Authority duties.--The authority shall:(1) Adopt bylaws and guidelines as necessary.(2) Appoint committees and subcommittees as necessary.(3) Employ staff, including an executive director. The 20250HB0020PN2119 - 34 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 following apply:(i) An individual employed by the authority shall be an employee of the Commonwealth.(ii) The commission may provide administrative assistance to the authority. (iii) The authority may contract with persons, including legal counsel, consultants, advisors, agents, accountants, auditors, financial experts or service providers, as deemed necessary and at the discretion of the authority. Contracted professionals shall report directly to the authority.(4) Schedule and initiate a process to promulgate new regulations or modify regulations.(5) Hold public hearings on proposed regulations.(6) Issue permits to cannabis business establishments to authorize the cannabis business establishments to cultivate, process, transport and dispense medical and adult-use cannabis and ensure compliance with this chapter and Chapter 93 (relating to medical use of cannabis).(7) Register cannabis business establishment agents and ensure compliance with this chapter Chapter 93.(8) Have regulatory and enforcement authority over the cultivating, processing, transporting, dispensing and using of medical and adult-use cannabis in this Commonwealth.(9) Designate and mandate compliance with a seed-to-sale tracking system, which shall not be required to be utilized as a point-of-sale system, to include activities and information relating to cannabis business establishments and electronic tracking of all adult-use cannabis and medical cannabis under this chapter and Chapter 93 for the purpose of 20250HB0020PN2119 - 35 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ensuring that no cannabis or cannabis-infused edible and cannabis-infused nonedible products are sold or otherwise transferred, except as authorized by law and to aid the authority in ensuring compliance with this act. This system shall be the system of record or a secondary electronic tracking system used by a cannabis business establishment or testing laboratory that meets all of the following criteria:(i) The system captures everything that happens to a cannabis plant from seed and cultivation through the growth, harvest and manufacturing of cannabis and cannabis-infused edible and nonedible products, including testing and transportation, to final sale.(ii) The system uses unique plant identification and unique batch identification for the purpose of identifying cannabis goods and related data.(iii) The system has the ability to track the involvement of an agent or permittee with adult-use cannabis and cannabis-infused edible and nonedible products.(iv) The system is integrated with a secondary system used by a cannabis business establishment or a cannabis testing facility, if applicable, in a form and manner determined by the authority.(v) The system allows for two-way communication, automation and a secure application-programming interface with a cannabis business establishment's enterprise resource planning, inventory, accounting and point-of-sale software.(vi) The system includes a secure application program interface capable of accessing all data required 20250HB0020PN2119 - 36 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to be transmitted to the authority to ensure compliance with the operational reporting requirements specified under this chapter and any regulations promulgated by the authority.(vii) The system prohibits any owner or beneficiary of a seed-to-sale system provider from being the owner of a cannabis business establishment.(10) Develop recordkeeping requirements for all books and papers, any seed-to-sale tracking system data and other information of a cannabis business establishment for a period of four years unless otherwise provided by the authority.(11) Develop enforcement procedures, including announced and unannounced inspections of facilities and records of a cannabis business establishment.(12) Oversee enforcement actions over permittees, including holding hearings of appeals within 90 days of the filing of an appeal.(13) Develop and implement a comprehensive social equity and economic development program in partnership with the Office of Social Equity, which shall have the duty of conducting oversight of grants and loans under Subchapter E (relating to social and economic equity).(14) Approve the members of the board related to actions performed under this chapter and Chapter 93.(15) Establish and maintain public outreach programs about medical and adult-use cannabis programs.(16) Collaborate as necessary with other Commonwealth agencies and departments or contract with third parties as necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.(17) Develop strategies and procedures to prohibit the 20250HB0020PN2119 - 37 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 illicit cannabis market, including enforcement actions and coordination with other government agencies to prohibit unauthorized cannabis distribution and sales within the Commonwealth.(18) Develop and publish regulatory guidelines regarding permitted excipients to be used in the processing of cannabis.(19) Commission an initial comprehensive market analysis within 180 days of appointment, which shall be complete within one year of commencement of the adult-use cannabis program.(20) Conduct comprehensive market analyzes every three years.(21) Establish and maintain a publicly accessible Internet website that includes information related to adult use cannabis as determined by the authority and required by this chapter.(22) Establish fines, fees and disciplinary action for noncompliance with the seed-to-sale tracking system requirements, including penalties.(23) Establish a process for selecting a seed-to-sale tracking system provider that, in addition to following existing requirements in law and rules pertaining to the selection of vendors to the State and authority, shall assess the potential vendor's ability to provide:(i) Comprehensive tracking of each cannabis plant and cannabis or cannabis-infused edible and c annabis- infused nonedible product. (ii) Recent relevant experience in providing seed-to-sale tracking services for cannabis plants and 20250HB0020PN2119 - 38 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 cannabis or cannabis-infused edible and c annabis-infused nonedible products in other states, including a reporting of any state contracts won and, if so, any state contracts renewed at term.(iii) Training and continued technical support to the authority and any cannabis business establishment permit holder.(iv) Integration of third-party software solutions into the seed-to-tracking system designated by the authority. The use of any third-party tracking system that integrates with the seed-to-sale tracking system designated by the authority shall not relieve any cannabis business establishment permit holder from complying with the mandated use of the seed-to-sale tracking system designated by the authority.(v) List affiliations, including the parent company, any equity holder of more than 5% and shared officers.(24) Issue a competitive procurement to implement, operate and maintain the seed-to-sale tracking system. The procurement process shall be initiated immediately after the effective date of this chapter and shall be in place once the adult-use program is begun.(25) Beginning January 1, 2026, and each year thereafter, publish a written report on the authority's publicly accessible Internet website, including a summary of the supply chain activity using data obtained from the seed-to-sale tracking system designated by the authority which contains:(i) Annual Statewide sales of cannabis or cannabis-infused edible and c annabis-infused nonedible products. 20250HB0020PN2119 - 39 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) Total number of cultivated plants in the State.(iii) Total number of plants in a vegetative state.(iv) Total weight of harvested material.(v) Average price per gram for cannabis or cannabis-infused edible and c annabis-infused nonedible products. (vi) Total number of cannabis plants or cannabis or cannabis-infused edible and c annabis-infused nonedible product recalls.(vii) Whether or not all other public safety concerns were addressed during the previous reporting year.(b) (Reserved).§ 9134. Regulations.(a) Promulgation.--The authority shall promulgate regulations, with input from industry stakeholders, to implement the provisions of this chapter and Chapter 93 (relating to medical use of cannabis), including all of the following:(1) The types of permits issued under this chapter, including the following types of permits:(i) Cultivation/processing.(ii) Microcultivation.(iii) Dispensing.(iv) Testing.(2) The methods and forms of permit applications, including timeline, fees and minimum requirements.(3) The policies and procedures to prioritize, promote and encourage diversity and full participation by individuals from communities that have been disproportionately harmed by cannabis prohibition and cannabis enforcement prohibition.(4) Procedures to process and competitively score permit 20250HB0020PN2119 - 40 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 applications.(5) Procedures to process administrative requests, including changes of ownership and location.(6) Security procedures for cannabis business establishments.(7) Enforcement procedures, including fines, suspensions and revocations.(8) Ownership and financial disclosure procedures and requirements for cannabis business establishments, including recordkeeping requirements.(9) Procedures and requirements concerning the divestiture of a beneficial ownership interest by a person found unqualified.(10) Procedures, processes and requirements for transfers of ownership, including the involvement of a publicly traded corporation.(11) Combining the medical program under Chapter 93 and adult-use cannabis program under this chapter.(12) Seed-to-sale tracking system procedures.(13) Procedures and requirements for curbside pickup services offered by dispensaries.(14) Transportation requirements, including:(i) Establishing procedures and requirements for home delivery services by dispensaries.(ii) A requirement that transportation between cannabis business establishments occurs in secured vehicles, but allowing for transportation in vehicles other than those owned and operated by cannabis business establishments for adult-use consumers to transport cannabis.20250HB0020PN2119 - 41 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) Details required on transportation manifests.(iv) Policies encouraging bulk shipment where appropriate.(15) Labeling requirements, including:(i) A product QR code generated by the Commonwealth's seed-to-sale tracking system provider with the purpose of providing additional product information to the consumer.(ii) A warning to prevent accidental or youth consumption.(iii) A universal symbol, approved by the ASTM International, indicating the product contains cannabis.(16) Cannabis-infused edible product requirements, including the following:(i) Ensuring that products are not likely to appeal to minors.(ii) Product safety regulations, including the requiring of best manufacturing practices and appropriate testing.(iii) Standards for creating clearly delineated individual servings.(17) Advertising and marketing regulations that balance the ability of a cannabis business establishment to engage in reasonable marketing and promotional activities while:(i) Ensuring that advertising and marketing does not target minors.(ii) Reasonably restricting access to minors by taking steps to ensure that the audience will be predominantly over 21 years of age for advertising and marketing.20250HB0020PN2119 - 42 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (18) Product safety regulations, including:(i) Regulations consistent with best practices for food products, except where necessary modifications are required due to the active compounds in the cannabis plant.(ii) Standards for packaging to address freshness, tamper evidence and limiting access to children.(iii) Standard symbols and warnings where the authority shall review symbols and warnings from other jurisdictions where cannabis sales are permitted.(iv) A prohibition on packaging that is likely to appeal to minors.(19) Procedures for the investigation and enforcement of unregulated and unpermitted cultivation, processing, manufacturing, sale, dispensing or distribution of cannabis, cannabis-infused edible or nonedible products or products intended for consumption or inhalation in violation of this part.(b) Compliance deadline.--A permittee shall have 180 days from the effective date of a new regulation promulgated by the authority under this section to comply with the new regulation.§ 9135. Temporary regulations.(a) Promulgation.--The authority shall promulgate temporary regulations no later than 90 days from the effective date of this subsection. If the authority fails to promulgate temporary regulations under this subsection, the failure shall not delay or inhibit the ability of a current medical cannabis business establishment on the effective date of this subsection from commencing adult-use cannabis operations. The temporary regulations under this subsection shall expire not later than 20250HB0020PN2119 - 43 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 two years after the effective date of this subsection and shall not be subject to any of the following:(1) Section 612 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(2) Sections 201, 202, 203, 204 and 205 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law.(3) Sections 204(b) and 301(10) of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(4) The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(b) Compliance deadline.--A current medical cannabis business establishment on the effective date of this subsection that is authorized to cultivate, process, dispense or transport cannabis under this chapter shall have 180 days from the effective date of a new temporary regulation promulgated by the authority under subsection (a) to comply with the temporary regulation.§ 9136. Confidentiality and public disclosure.(a) Exempt from access.--All personal information obtained by the authority relating to agents or adult-use consumers shall be exempt from access under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.(b) Public records.--(1) Records are public records and shall be accessible for inspection and duplication in accordance with the Right-to-Know Law:(i) Applications for permits submitted by a cannabis business establishment.20250HB0020PN2119 - 44 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) Information relating to penalties or other disciplinary actions taken against a cannabis business establishment or agent by the authority for violation of this chapter.(2) Private, security-related and trade secret information is not subject to disclosure under this section.§ 9137. Unauthorized activities and civil penalties.(a) Unauthorized activities.--In addition to any other penalty provided by Federal or State law, a person who cultivates, processes, distributes, sells or offers for sale adult-use cannabis, cannabis-infused edible or nonedible products, cannabis concentrates, cannabis flower or any product intended for consumption or inhalation in violation of section 9127 (relating to limitations and penalties) without a permit issued by the authority shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed $10,000 for each offense. Each day a person engages in unauthorized activity under this subsection shall constitute a separate offense.(b) Enforcement.--The Attorney General, the authority, a State or local law enforcement agency or a local government unit may investigate an unauthorized activity under subsection (a) and engage in enforcement measures, including entering into an intergovernmental agreement to prevent the conduct of an unauthorized activity under subsection (a).(c) Suspension or revocation.--In addition to any other penalty provided by Federal or State law, upon the conduct of a third or subsequent unauthorized activity under subsection (a), a local government unit may suspend or revoke the business license of the person who engaged in the unauthorized activity.(d) Violations.--A violation of subsection (a) is an unfair 20250HB0020PN2119 - 45 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or deceptive act or practice under the act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law. All remedies, penalties and authority granted to the Attorney General under that act shall be available for the enforcement of this chapter.(e) Actions.--In addition to the authority granted to the Attorney General under this section, any business or consumer injured by a violation of subsection (a) may bring an action to enjoin a business retailing, cultivating, manufacturing, distributing or possessing adult-use cannabis without a permit and to recover actual damages sustained. A court shall enter judgment in an amount equal to three times actual damages and shall have discretion to award punitive damages in an amount commensurate with actual damages. The court shall award attorney fees and costs to the prevailing party.§ 9138. Community Opportunity Fund.(a) Establishment.--The Community Opportunity Fund is established in the State Treasury. Money in the Community Opportunity Fund is appropriated on a continuing basis for the purposes specified under this section and shall not lapse.(b) Deposits.--Certain fees payable under this chapter shall be deposited into the Community Opportunity Fund as specified under this chapter. In addition, $3,000,000 of gross receipts of revenue deposited into the Cannabis Regulation Fund shall be transferred to the Community Opportunity Fund. The money deposited into the Community Opportunity Fund may only be used for the purposes specified under this chapter. Any interest accrued shall be deposited into the Community Opportunity Fund.(c) Investment.--The authority, in partnership with the Office of Social Equity, shall direct the investment of the 20250HB0020PN2119 - 46 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Community Opportunity Fund. The State Treasurer shall credit to the Community Opportunity Fund interest and earnings from Community Opportunity Fund investment.(d) Administrator.--The authority shall be the administrator of the Community Opportunity Fund for auditing purposes.(e) Purposes.--Money in the Community Opportunity Fund shall be used for any of the following purposes:(1) Providing low-interest-rate or zero-interest-rate loans to qualified social and economic equity applicants to pay for ordinary and necessary expenses to start and operate a cannabis business establishment.(2) Providing grants to qualified social and economic equity applicants to pay for ordinary and necessary expenses to start and operate a cannabis business establishment.(3) Paying for outreach that may be provided or targeted to attract and support social and economic equity applicants.(4) Conducting studies or research concerning the participation of minorities, women, veterans or individuals with disabilities in the adult-use cannabis industry, including barriers to individuals entering the industry as equity owners of a cannabis business establishment.(5) Assisting with job training and technical assistance in disproportionately impacted areas.(6) Assisting community organizations, offender reentry programs, workforce development programs and other community or advocacy programs in disproportionately impacted areas.(f) Additional deposits.--All fees collected upon approval of a dispensary permit and adult-use cultivation center permit for current medical cannabis business establishments and remunerations made as a result of transfers of permits awarded 20250HB0020PN2119 - 47 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to qualified social and economic equity applicants shall be deposited into the Community Opportunity Fund.(g) Transfers.--As soon as practical, but not to exceed 90 days after the effective date of this subsection, the State Treasurer shall transfer no less than eighty percent of the total balance of the Medical Marijuana Program Fund into the Community Opportunity Fund.(h) Prohibition.--Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Community Opportunity Fund shall not be subject to sweeps, administrative charge-backs or any other fiscal or budgetary maneuver that would transfer money from the Community Opportunity Fund into any other fund of the Commonwealth.§ 9139. Governing practice and procedure.The provisions of 2 Pa.C.S. (relating to administrative law and procedure) shall apply to all actions of the authority under this chapter constituting an adjudication as defined in 2 Pa.C.S. § 101 (relating to definitions).SUBCHAPTER ESOCIAL AND ECONOMIC EQUITYSec.9141. Social and economic equity.9142. Loans and grants to social and economic equity applicants.9143. Fee waivers.9144. Transfer of permit awarded to qualified social and economic equity applicant.§ 9141. Social and economic equity.The authority shall promote and take any necessary action to ensure social and economic equity in the adult-use cannabis industry in this Commonwealth. The authority shall partner with 20250HB0020PN2119 - 48 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the Office of Social Equity in facilitating the loans and grants under this chapter.§ 9142. Loans and grants to social and economic equity applicants.(a) Loan and grant programs.--The authority, in partnership with the Office of Social Equity, shall establish loan and grant programs, subject to appropriations from the Community Opportunity Fund, for the purposes of providing financial assistance, loans, grants and technical assistance to social and economic equity applicants. The authority, in partnership with the Office of Social Equity may:(1) provide cannabis social and economic equity loans and grants from appropriations from the Community Opportunity Fund to assist qualified social and economic equity applicants in the Commonwealth's regulated adult-use cannabis marketplace;(2) enter into agreements that state the terms and conditions of the financial assistance, accept money or grants and engage in cooperation with private entities and Commonwealth agencies or local government to carry out the purposes of this section;(3) fix, determine, charge and collect any premiums, fees, charges, costs and expenses, including application fees, commitment fees, program fees, financing charges or publication fees, in connection with the Office of Social Equity's activities under this section;(4) coordinate assistance under loan programs with activities of the authority and other Commonwealth agencies as needed to maximize the effectiveness and efficiency of this chapter;20250HB0020PN2119 - 49 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) provide staff, administration and related support required to administer this section;(6) take other necessary or appropriate actions to protect the Commonwealth's interest in the event of bankruptcy, default, foreclosure or noncompliance with the terms and conditions of financial assistance provided under this section, including the ability to recapture money if the recipient is found to be in noncompliance with the terms and conditions of the financial assistance agreement;(7) establish application, notification, contract and other forms, procedures or regulations deemed necessary and appropriate; and(8) utilize vendors or contract work to implement this chapter.(b) Conditions.--Loans made under this section shall meet all of the following criteria:(1) May only be granted if, in the judgment of the authority and Office of Social Equity, the project furthers the goals specified under this chapter.(2) Be in a principal amount and form and contain terms and provisions with respect to security, insurance, reporting, delinquency charges, default remedies and other matters as the authority and Office of Social Equity shall determine appropriate to protect the public interest and to be consistent with the purposes of this section.(c) Award.--Grants made under this section shall be awarded on a competitive and annual basis and shall further and promote the goals of this chapter, including promotion of social and economic equity applicants, job training and workforce development and technical assistance to social and economic 20250HB0020PN2119 - 50 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 equity applicants.(d) Annual report.--Beginning January 1, 2026, and each year thereafter, the Office of Social Equity shall annually report to the Governor, the General Assembly and the authority, the outcomes and effectiveness of this section, including all of the following:(1) The number of persons or businesses receiving financial assistance under this section.(2) The amount in financial assistance awarded in the aggregate, in addition to the amount of loans made that are outstanding and the amount of grants awarded.(3) The location of the project engaged in by the person or business.(4) If applicable, the number of new jobs and other forms of economic output created as a result of the financial assistance.(e) Additional outreach.--The authority and Office of Social Equity shall include engagement with individuals with limited English proficiency as part of its outreach provided or targeted to attract and support social and economic equity applicants.§ 9143. Fee waivers.(a) Permit application fee waiver.--The authority may waive or reduce the nonrefundable permit application fee, nonrefundable fee associated with purchasing a permit to operate a cannabis business establishment and any surety bond or other financial requirement of a social and economic equity applicant if at the time the payment is due, the social and economic equity applicant, including each person with 10% or greater ownership and each parent company, subsidiary or affiliate, has less than a total of $750,000 of income in the previous calendar 20250HB0020PN2119 - 51 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 year.(b) Attestation.--The authority may require a social and economic equity applicant to attest that they meet the requirements for a fee waiver under subsection (a) and provide evidence of total annual income for the previous calendar year.(c) Eligibility determination.--If the authority determines that an applicant who applied as a social and economic equity applicant is not eligible under this section, the applicant shall be provided an additional 10 days to provide alternative evidence of qualification as a social and economic equity applicant. The applicant may pay the remainder of the waived fee and not be considered as a social and economic equity applicant. If the applicant cannot meet the qualification standards or pay the remainder of the waived fee, the authority may keep the initial application fee and the application shall not be graded.§ 9144. Transfer of permit awarded to qualified social and economic equity applicant.(a) Transfer, sale or grant of permit.--In the event a qualified social and economic equity applicant seeks to transfer, sell or grant a cannabis business establishment permit to a person that does not qualify as a social and economic equity applicant after one year from the date of issuance of the permit and within five years after the permit was issued, the transfer agreement shall require the new permit holder to pay the authority an amount equal to all the following for deposit into the Community Opportunity Fund:(1) Fees that were waived by any Commonwealth agency based on the applicant's status as a social and economic equity applicant, if applicable.(2) The outstanding amount owed by the qualified social 20250HB0020PN2119 - 52 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and economic equity applicant for a loan through the Community Opportunity Fund, if applicable.(3) The amount of a grant awarded to the qualified social and economic equity applicant from the authority, in partnership with the Office of Social Equity, if applicable.(b) Applicability.--Transfers of a cannabis business establishment permit awarded to a social and economic equity applicant shall be subject to all other provisions of this chapter.SUBCHAPTER FREGULATION OF CANNABIS BUSINESS ESTABLISHMENTSSec.9151. Permit required.9152. Powers and duties of authority.9153. Authorization of current medical cannabis business establishments to commence dispensing cannabis for adult use.9154. Issuance of dispensary permits to qualified social and economic equity applicants.9155. New dispensary permits.9156. Selection criteria for social and economic equity and new dispensary permits.9157. Dispensary operational requirements and prohibitions.9158. Dispensing cannabis.9159. Agent-in-charge.9159.1. Inventory control system.9159.2. Storage requirements.9159.3. Destruction and disposal of cannabis.9159.4. Security measures.9159.5. Recordkeeping.20250HB0020PN2119 - 53 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 9159.6. Issuance of adult-use cultivation center permits.9159.7. Authorization of current medical cannabis grower/processor permit holders to grow cannabis for adult use.9159.8. New adult-use cultivation center permits.9159.9. Adult-use cultivation center requirements and prohibitions.9159.10. Issuance of microcultivation center permits.9159.11. Microcultivation center permit applications.9159.12. Selection criteria for microcultivation center permits.9159.13. Microcultivation center requirements and prohibitions.9159.14. Labor Peace Agreements.9159.15. Agent identification cards.9159.16. Affiliation.9159.17. Renewal of cannabis business establishment permits and agent identification cards.9159.18. Relocation.9159.19. Warehousing and distribution permits.§ 9151. Permit required.A person may not operate a cannabis business establishment for the purpose of cultivating, processing, dispensing or transporting adult-use cannabis or cannabis-infused edible or nonedible products without a permit issued under this chapter. A person may not be an officer, director, manager or agent of a cannabis business establishment without having been authorized by the authority.§ 9152. Powers and duties of authority.Subject to the provisions of this chapter, the authority may exercise the following powers and duties:20250HB0020PN2119 - 54 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Prescribe forms to be issued for the administration and enforcement of this chapter.(2) Examine, inspect and investigate the premises, operations and records of cannabis business establishment applicants and permittees.(3) Conduct investigations of possible violations of this chapter pertaining to a cannabis business establishment and cannabis business establishment agents.(4) Conduct hearings on proceedings to refuse to issue, renew, revoke or suspend permits or to place on probation, reprimand or otherwise discipline a permittee or agent under this chapter or take other nondisciplinary action.(5) Adopt regulations required for the administration of this chapter.§ 9153. Authorization of current medical cannabis business establishments to commence dispensing cannabis for adult use.(a) Dual use permits.--No later than 90 days after the effective date of this section, a medical cannabis business establishment holding a dispensary permit granted under Subchapter E (relating to medical use of cannabis business establishments) or I (relating to academic clinical research centers and clinical registrants) of Chapter 93 (relating to medical use of cannabis) shall be authorized to commence selling cannabis for adult use at a dispensary operating under Chapter 93. A medical cannabis business establishment shall pay a fee of $100,000 to the authority, which shall be deposited into the Community Opportunity Fund, before commencing the sale of adult-use cannabis.(b) Delay or inhibit operations.--The failure of the 20250HB0020PN2119 - 55 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 authority to promulgate regulations shall not delay or inhibit the ability of a medical cannabis business establishment under subsection (a) from commencing the sale of adult-use cannabis at a dispensary operating under Chapter 93. If the authority fails to authorize a medical cannabis organization under subsection (a) from commencing the sale of adult-use cannabis at a dispensary operating under Chapter 93 within 90 days from the effective date of this subsection, the medical cannabis business establishment shall automatically be authorized to commence adult-use cannabis sales.§ 9154. Issuance of dispensary permits to qualified social and economic equity applicants.(a) Social and economic equity dispensary permits.--In addition to the dual use permits authorized under section 9153 (relating to authorization of current medical cannabis business establishments to commence dispensing cannabis for adult use), the authority shall issue dispensary permits to qualified social and economic equity applicants. The permit shall authorize the social and economic equity dispensary permit holder to operate at a single location to serve adult-use consumers and patients in this Commonwealth. The authority may issue an initial 60 social and economic equity dispensary permits.(b) Limitation.--An applicant may file no more than three applications for a social and economic equity dispensary permit in any single application period.(c) Qualified social and economic equity applicants.--(1) The authority shall develop an application, and the social and economic equity applicants may apply, for a social and economic equity dispensary permit.(2) The permit shall authorize the social and economic 20250HB0020PN2119 - 56 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 equity applicant to operate at a single location to serve adult-use consumers and patients in this Commonwealth.(d) Applications.--A qualified social and economic equity applicant seeking a dispensary permit shall submit an application on a form provided by the authority. The application shall include information in at least the following categories as determined by the authority:(1) The fees to be paid. (2) A business plan that complies with the requirements under this chapter.(3) A security plan. (4) An inventory control plan. (5) A plan for community engagement. (6) Written policies and procedures regarding recordkeeping, inventory control, safety, security, diversion and diversity.(7) Facility plans, including floor plans, security overlay and specifications of the building exterior and interior layout.(8) The physical address of the social and economic equity applicant's proposed facility, including the following, as applicable:(i) Evidence of the social and economic equity applicant's clear legal title to or option to purchase the proposed facility.(ii) A fully-executed copy of the social and economic equity applicant's unexpired lease for the proposed facility that includes the consent of the property owner for the use of the proposed property and facility for the term of the initial permit.20250HB0020PN2119 - 57 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) Other evidence satisfactory to the authority that shows the social and economic equity applicant has the authority, or will have the authority prior to the date of license issuance, to use the proposed property and facility for the term of the permit.(9) A copy of each relevant local zoning ordinance and documentation, if necessary, of approval from the local zoning office that the proposed dispensary location is in compliance with each local zoning ordinance.(10) Information regarding each principal officer. (11) Evidence of the applicant's status as a social and economic equity applicant.(12) An executed labor peace agreement between a bona fide labor organization and the applicant. This agreement shall be an ongoing material condition of licensure.(e) Deficiency notice.--If the authority receives an application that fails to provide the required elements under subsection (c), the authority shall issue a deficiency notice to the qualified social and economic equity applicant. The qualified social and economic equity applicant shall have 30 calendar days from the date of the deficiency notice to submit the complete information.(f) Review.--Upon receipt of all of the required information and documents under this section, the authority shall review the application of the qualified social and economic equity applicant. The following shall apply:(1) The authority may request revisions and retain final approval over retail site features.(2) The authority shall approve the permit upon satisfactory review of the application.20250HB0020PN2119 - 58 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Final approval for each individual dispensary location shall be contingent on the completion of construction of the dispensary location, authority inspections and providing the authority with any information specified under subsection (c) relating to the dispensary location that was not provided during the initial application process.(g) Authorization.--The authority may only authorize the sale of cannabis at a social and economic equity dispensary permit holder's dispensary location after the completion of a successful inspection of the location. The authority shall inspect the location within 14 days of a written request by a social and economic equity dispensary permit holder.(h) Successful inspection.--If the permit holder passes the inspection under this section, the authority shall authorize the sale of cannabis at the dispensary within 10 business days.(i) Notification of opening date.--Once the authority has authorized the sale of cannabis at a social and economic equity dispensary location, the social and economic equity dispensary permit holder shall notify the authority of the proposed opening date.(j) Initial sale.--Upon issuance of a permit, a social and economic equity dispensary permit holder may begin selling adult-use cannabis, cannabis-infused edible and nonedible products, cannabis paraphernalia and related items to patients and adult-use consumers. Medical cannabis seeds and immature plants may be offered, but are not required to be available for sale by the permit holder, for sale to certified medical patients only.(k) Deposit.--All fees collected under this section shall be 20250HB0020PN2119 - 59 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 deposited into the Cannabis Regulation Fund, unless otherwise specified.(l) Issuance of social and economic equity dispensary permits.--The selection criteria and issuance of social and economic equity dispensary permits issued under this section shall be performed in accordance with section 9156 (relating to selection criteria for social and economic equity and new dispensary permits).§ 9155. New dispensary permits.(a) Dispensary permits.--The authority shall be the exclusive entity authorized to issue new dispensary permits. Separate and apart from any dispensing organization permits issued to medical cannabis organizations under section 9153 (relating to authorization of current medical cannabis organizations to commence dispensing cannabis for adult use), and to social and economic equity applicants under section 9154 (relating to issuance of dispensary permits to qualified social and economic equity applicants), after January 1, 2026, the authority shall issue up to 12 additional dispensary permits to applicants that are any of the following:(1) A disadvantaged business.(2) A diverse business.(3) A small business.(b) Dispensing.--Additional dispensary permits awarded under this section shall authorize the permit holders to operate at a single location to serve adult-use consumers and patients in this Commonwealth.(c) Award of permits.--To ensure the geographic dispersion of dispensary permittees throughout this Commonwealth, the authority shall determine how many permits should be awarded 20250HB0020PN2119 - 60 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 across this Commonwealth through a merit-based application process. An applicant may file no more than one application in a single application period for dispensing organization permit under this section.(d) Permit application.--An applicant seeking issuance of a dispensary permit shall submit an application on a form provided by the authority. The application shall include information in at least the following categories as determined by the authority:(1) The fees to be paid, if applicable.(2) A business plan that complies with the requirements under this chapter.(3) A security plan.(4) An inventory control plan.(5) A plan for community engagement.(6) Written policies and procedures regarding recordkeeping, inventory control, safety, security and diversity.(7) Facility plans, including floor plans, security overlay and specifications of the building exterior and interior layout.(8) The physical address of the applicant's proposed facility, including the following, as applicable:(i) Evidence of the applicant's clear legal title to or option to purchase the proposed facility.(ii) A fully-executed copy of the applicant's unexpired lease for the proposed facility that includes the consent of the property owner for the use of the proposed property and facility for the term of the initial permit.20250HB0020PN2119 - 61 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) satisfactory documentation that shows the applicant has the authority, or will have the authority prior to the date of license issuance, to use the proposed property and facility for the term of the permit.(9) A copy of each relevant local zoning ordinance and documentation, if necessary, of approval from the local zoning office that the proposed dispensary location is in compliance with each local zoning ordinance.(10) Information regarding each principal officer. (11) Evidence of the applicant's status as a disadvantaged business, diverse business or small business.(e) Operations.--An applicant who receives a dispensary permit under this section shall have one calendar year from the date of the award to become operational. The following shall apply:(1) If the applicant does not receive approval to commence operations at one of the applicant's locations within one calendar year of the permit award, the authority may revoke the permit absent good reason for the delay shown by the applicant.(2) Before a new dispensary receives authorization to commence building a dispensary, the authority shall inspect the physical space selected by the permittee.(3) The authority shall verify the site is suitable for public access, including the following:(i) That the site's layout promotes the safe dispensing of adult-use cannabis.(ii) That the site's location is sufficient in size, power allocation, lighting, parking, handicapped-20250HB0020PN2119 - 62 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 accessible parking spaces, accessible entry and exits as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (Public Law 101-336, 104 Stat. 327), product handling and storage.(f) Additional permits.--In addition to the dispensing permits to be awarded in subsection (a) of this section, the authority shall conduct a comprehensive market analysis to determine whether a need exists to modify or raise the number of dispensary permits awarded to disadvantaged businesses, diverse businesses, and small businesses. In determining whether to exercise the authority granted under the subsection, the authority shall consider the following factors:(1) The percentage of cannabis sales occurring in this Commonwealth not in the regulated market.(2) Whether there is an adequate supply of cannabis and cannabis-infused edible and nonedible products to serve patients under Chapter 93 (relating to medical use of cannabis).(3) Whether there is an adequate supply of cannabis and cannabis-infused edible and nonedible products to serve adult-use consumers.(4) Whether there is an oversupply of cannabis in this Commonwealth leading to trafficking of cannabis to states where the sale of cannabis is not permitted by law.(5) Population increases or shifts.(6) The density of dispensaries in any area of this Commonwealth.(7) Perceived security risks of increasing the number or location of dispensaries.(8) The past safety record of dispensary permittees.20250HB0020PN2119 - 63 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (9) The authority's capacity to appropriately regulate additional permittees.(10) Participation in the market by social and economic equity applicants and disadvantaged, diverse and small businesses.(11) Any other criteria the authority deems relevant.(g) Limitations.--The authority may not issue more than three individual dispensary permits to a single disadvantaged business, diverse business or small business.(h) Previously surrendered or revoked dispensary permits.--Beginning one year after the effective date of this subsection, the authority shall publish no later than December 5 of each year a list of any permit surrendered or revoked under this chapter on the authority's publicly accessible Internet website. The authority shall accept applications for the licenses that appear on this list no later than January 15 of each year, submitted by an applicant, that is any of the following:(1) A social and economic equity applicant under section 9154 (relating to issuance of dispensary permits to qualified social and economic equity applicants).(2) A disadvantaged business.(3) A diverse business.(4) A small business.§ 9156. Selection criteria for social and economic equity and new dispensary permits.(a) Incomplete application.--Failure by an applicant to submit to the authority all required information under sections 9154 (relating to issuance of dispensary permits to qualified social and economic equity applicants) and 9155 (relating to new dispensary permits) may result in the application being 20250HB0020PN2119 - 64 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 disqualified. If the authority receives an application that fails to provide the required elements in a section, that section shall not be scored.(b) Application scoring.--The authority shall, by rule, develop a merit-based scoring system in which to award new dispensary permits.(c) Scoring criteria.--An applicant for a dispensary permit shall be awarded points on applications as determined by the authority.(d) Anonymity.--Applications for dispensary permits shall be scored by the authority anonymously in accordance with regulations promulgated by the authority, which shall include tie-breaker language that governs the process through which some applicants are to be awarded permits when multiple applicants receive the same application score and the awarding of permits to all tied applicants would result in awarding more permits than is permissible under this chapter. Any tie-breaking process shall be designed to ensure clarity, transparency and fairness.(e) Review.--Each application for a dispensary permit shall be reviewed and scored by three individuals who score each application independently. An applicant's score in each category under subsection (c) shall be an average of the three scores awarded by each individual score. An applicant may not receive full points simply for providing responsive information on a section of the application.§ 9157. Dispensary operational requirements and prohibitions.(a) Requirements and prohibitions.--A dispensary shall operate in accordance with the representations made in its application and permit materials. A dispensary shall be in compliance with this chapter and the regulations promulgated 20250HB0020PN2119 - 65 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under this chapter. The following shall apply:(1) All adult-use cannabis, cannabis concentrates, cannabis-infused edible and nonedible products and cannabis seeds shall be obtained from an adult-use cultivation center, microcultivation center or another dispensary registered in this Commonwealth.(2) A dispensary:(i) Shall inspect and count product received from an adult-use cultivation center, microcultivation center or other dispensary before dispensing it.(ii) May only accept cannabis deliveries into a restricted access area. Deliveries may not be accepted through the public or limited access areas unless otherwise approved by the authority.(iii) Shall maintain compliance with Commonwealth and local building, fire and zoning requirements or regulations.(iv) Shall submit a list to the authority of the names of all service professionals that will work at the dispensary. The list shall include a description of the type of business or service provided. The authority shall be promptly notified of any changes to the service professional list. No service professional shall work in the dispensary until the name is provided to the authority on the service professional list.(v) May operate between 6 a.m. and 10 p.m. local time or as determined by the local municipality.(vi) Shall keep all lighting outside and inside the dispensary in good working order and wattage sufficient for security cameras.20250HB0020PN2119 - 66 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (vii) Shall keep, in good working order, all air treatment systems that will be installed to reduce odors.(viii) Shall ensure that any building or equipment used by a dispensary for the storage or sale of adult-use cannabis are maintained in a clean and sanitary condition.(ix) Shall be free from infestation by insects, rodents or pests.(x) Shall develop a recall policy and procedure as approved by the authority.(3) A dispensary may not:(i) Cultivate, process or manufacture cannabis.(ii) Accept a cannabis-infused edible and nonedible product from an adult-use cultivation center, microcultivation center or dispensary unless it is prepackaged and labeled in accordance with this chapter and regulations that may be promulgated in accordance with this chapter.(iii) Obtain adult-use cannabis or cannabis-infused edible and nonedible products from outside this Commonwealth.(iv) Sell adult-use cannabis or cannabis-infused edible and nonedible products to adult-use consumer unless the individual has been verified to be 21 years of age or older or if the dispensary maintains a medical cannabis permit under Chapter 93 (relating to medical use of cannabis) and the individual is registered under Chapter 93.(v) Enter into agreements to allow persons that are not cannabis business establishment agents to deliver 20250HB0020PN2119 - 67 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 cannabis or to transport cannabis to adult-use consumers, other than through home delivery services approved by the authority.(vi) Operate a dispensary if the:(A) Dispensary's video surveillance equipment is inoperative.(B) Point-of-sale equipment is inoperative.(C) Cannabis seed-to-seed tracking system is inoperative, unless the dispensary has the ability to record, including electronically, transactions to upload to the cannabis seed-to-seed tracking system once the system is operational.(vii) Have fewer than two individuals working at any time while the dispensary is open.(viii) Sell clones or any other live cannabis plant material, unless sales are limited to certified medical patients pursuant to Chapter 93.(ix) Shall not be located in an area zoning for residential use or within 1,500 feet of the property line of another dispensary. This setback shall not apply to current medical cannabis establishments at their current locations.(x) Violate any other requirements or prohibitions specified by the authority.(b) Regulations.--The authority shall promulgate regulations, within 180 days following the release of temporary regulations, specifying operational requirements for dispensaries, consistent with the provisions of this chapter, including the operational requirements and prohibitions contained in this section.20250HB0020PN2119 - 68 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 9158. Dispensing cannabis.(a) Dispensing criteria.--Prior to a cannabis business establishment agent dispensing cannabis, the agent shall:(1) Verify the age of the adult-use consumer and validity of the government-issued identification card of the adult-use consumer by use of an electronic reader or electronic scanning device, unless otherwise permitted by the authority, to scan the government-issued identification, if applicable.(2) Enter the following information into the seed-to-sale tracking system:(i) The agent's identification number.(ii) The amount and type, including strain, if applicable, of adult-use cannabis or cannabis-infused edible and nonedible product dispensed.(iii) The date and time the adult-use cannabis or cannabis-infused edible and nonedible product was dispensed.(b) Refusal to sell.--A dispensary shall refuse to sell cannabis or cannabis-infused edible and nonedible products under any of the following circumstances:(1) To an individual unless the individual produces valid identification showing that the individual is 21 years of age or older. A dispensary under Chapter 93 (relating to medical use of cannabis) may sell cannabis or cannabis-infused edible and nonedible products to an individual who is younger than 21 years of age if the sale complies with the provisions of Chapter 93.(2) To an individual who is disqualified by the authority.20250HB0020PN2119 - 69 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Validity.--For the purposes of this section, valid identification shall:(1) Be valid and unexpired.(2) Contain a photograph and the date of birth of the person.§ 9159. Agent-in-charge.(a) Designation.--A dispensary shall designate, at a minimum, one agent-in-charge for each permitted dispensary. The designated agent-in-charge shall hold an agent identification card. Maintaining an agent-in-charge shall be a continuing requirement for the dispensary permit, except as provided under subsection (e).(b) Requirements.--The agent-in-charge shall be on-site managers or full-time agents of the dispensary and shall manage the dispensary. The following shall apply:(1) Managing the dispensary shall include:(i) Responsibility for opening and closing the dispensary.(ii) Delivery acceptance.(iii) Oversight of sales and cannabis business establishment agents.(iv) Recordkeeping.(v) Inventory.(vi) Cannabis business establishment agent training.(vii) Compliance with this chapter, including the responsibility for maintaining all files subject to audit or inspection by the authority at the dispensary.(2) Except as provided under paragraph (3), the agent-in-charge shall, within 10 days, notify the authority of a change of information required to be reported to the 20250HB0020PN2119 - 70 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 authority.(3) In the case of a dispensary employee who has diverted cannabis or cannabis-infused edible or nonedible products or has intentionally dispensed cannabis or cannabis-infused edible or nonedible products in a manner not consistent with this chapter, the notification required under paragraph (2) to the authority shall be made within 48 hours.(c) Determination.--In determining whether an agent-in-charge manages the dispensary, the authority may consider the responsibilities identified in this section, the number of cannabis business establishment agents under the supervision of the agent-in-charge and the employment relationship between the agent-in-charge and the dispensary, including the existence of a contract for employment and any other relevant fact or circumstance.(d) Change in status.--The agent-in-charge shall be responsible for notifying the authority of a change in the employment status of a cannabis business establishment agent within 10 business days after the change, including notice to the authority if the termination of an agent was for diversion of product or theft of currency.(e) Vacancy.--In the event of the separation of an agent-in-charge due to death, incapacity, termination or any other reason and if the dispensary does not have an active agent-in-charge, the dispensary shall immediately contact the authority and request temporary authority allowing the continuing operation. The request shall include the name of an interim agent-in-charge until a succeeding agent-in-charge is identified or shall include the name of the replacement. The authority may not delay in granting the temporary authority, and the dispensary shall be 20250HB0020PN2119 - 71 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 permitted to operate while obtaining authority approval for an interim agent-in-charge. A temporary authority may not be valid for more than 90 days. The succeeding agent-in-charge shall register with the authority in compliance with this section. Once the permanent succeeding agent-in-charge is registered with the authority, the temporary authority shall be void.(f) Registration.--The dispensary agent-in-charge registration shall expire one year from the date of issuance. The agent-in-charge's registration shall be renewed annually.(g) Termination.--Upon termination of an agent-in-charge's employment, the dispensary shall immediately reclaim the agent identification card. The dispensary shall promptly return the agent identification card to the authority.(h) Application denial.--The authority may deny a new application or a renewal or discipline or revoke an agent-in-charge identification card for any of the following reasons:(1) Submission of misleading, incorrect, false or fraudulent information in the application or renewal application.(2) Violation of the requirements of this chapter or regulations.(3) Fraudulent use of an agent identification card.(4) Selling, distributing, transferring in any manner or giving cannabis to any unauthorized person.(5) Theft of cannabis, currency or any other items from a dispensary.(6) Tampering with, falsifying, altering, modifying or duplicating an agent-in-charge identification card.(7) Tampering with, falsifying, altering or modifying the surveillance video footage, point-of-sale system, 20250HB0020PN2119 - 72 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 cannabis seed-to-sale tracking system or the Commonwealth's verification system.(8) Failure to notify the authority immediately upon discovery that the agent-in-charge identification card has been lost, stolen or destroyed.(9) Failure to notify the authority within 10 business days after a change in the information provided in the application for an agent-in-charge identification card.(10) Intentionally dispensing to adult-use consumers in amounts above the limits provided in this chapter.(11) Failure to notify the authority within 48 hours after a determination that a dispensary employee has diverted cannabis or cannabis-infused edible or nonedible products or has intentionally dispensed cannabis or cannabis-infused edible or nonedible products in a manner not consistent with this chapter.(12) Failure to provide or maintain a labor peace agreement with a bona fide labor organization.§ 9159.1. Inventory control system.(a) Inventory.--A dispensary agent-in-charge shall have primary oversight of the dispensary's cannabis inventory point-of-sale system. The inventory point-of-sale system shall be real-time, web-based, open API, two-way communication and accessible by the authority at any time. The point-of-sale system shall track, at a minimum, the date of sale, amount, price and currency.(b) Account.--A dispensary shall establish an account with the authority's verification system that documents:(1) Each sales transaction at the time of sale and each day's beginning inventory, acquisitions, sales, disposal and 20250HB0020PN2119 - 73 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ending inventory.(2) Acquisition of cannabis and cannabis-infused edible and nonedible products from a permitted adult-use cultivation center or microcultivation center, including:(i) A description of the products, including the quantity, strain, variety and batch number of each product received.(ii) The name and registry identification number of the permitted adult-use cultivation center or microcultivation center providing the cannabis and cannabis-infused edible and nonedible products.(iii) The name and registry identification number of the permitted cannabis business establishment agent delivering the cannabis.(iv) The name and registry identification number of the cannabis business establishment agent receiving the cannabis.(v) The date of acquisition.(3) The disposal of cannabis, including:(i) A description of the products, including the quantity, strain, variety, batch number and reason for the cannabis disposal.(ii) The method of disposal.(iii) The date and time of disposal.(c) Verification.--Upon cannabis delivery from an adult-use cultivation center or a microcultivation center, a dispensary shall confirm that the product's name, strain name, weight and identification number on the manifest matches the information on the cannabis, cannabis-infused edible and nonedible product label and package. The product name listed and the weight listed 20250HB0020PN2119 - 74 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 in the Commonwealth's verification system shall match the product packaging.(d) Inventory.--The agent-in-charge shall conduct a daily inventory reconciliation documenting and balancing cannabis inventory by confirming that the authority's verification system matches the dispensary's point-of-sale system and the amount of physical product at the dispensary. The following shall apply:(1) A dispensary shall provide a reason for an inventory adjustment. Inventory adjustment documentation shall be kept at the dispensary or maintained electronically for two years from the date performed.(2) If the dispensary identifies an anomaly in the amount of cannabis after the daily inventory reconciliation due to a mistake, the dispensary shall determine how the anomaly occurred and take and document corrective action. The dispensary shall work diligently to determine the reason for the anomaly and document steps on how to address the anomaly.(3) If the dispensary identifies a discrepancy in the amount of cannabis after the daily inventory reconciliation or through other means due to theft, criminal activity or suspected criminal activity, the dispensary shall determine how the diversion occurred and take and document corrective action. Within 48 hours after the first discovery of the diversion due to theft, criminal activity or suspected criminal activity, the dispensary shall inform the authority and the Pennsylvania State Police in writing.(4) The dispensary shall file an annual compilation report to the authority in a manner determined by the authority.(e) Documentation.--A dispensary shall have all of the 20250HB0020PN2119 - 75 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 following duties:(1) Maintain the documentation required under this section in a secure locked location at the dispensary, an off-site approved office or electronically for two years from the date on the document.(2) Provide any documentation required to be maintained in this section to the authority for review upon request.(3) If maintaining a bank account, retain for a period of two years, electronically or otherwise, a record of each deposit or withdrawal from the bank account.(f) Return policy.--If a dispensary chooses to have a return policy for cannabis and cannabis-infused edible and nonedible products, the dispensary shall seek prior approval from the authority, including written policies as to how returned cannabis or cannabis-infused edible and nonedible products will be stored and quarantined from other inventory.§ 9159.2. Storage requirements.(a) Authorized on-premises storage.--A dispensary shall store inventory on its premises. All inventory stored on the premises shall be secured in a restricted access area and tracked consistently with the inventory tracking regulations. A dispensary shall be of suitable size and construction to facilitate cleaning, maintenance and proper operations and shall maintain adequate lighting, ventilation, temperature, humidity control and equipment.(b) Tampered containers.--A cannabis container that has been tampered with, damaged or opened shall be labeled with the date opened, if known, and quarantined from other cannabis-infused edible and nonedible products in the vault until the cannabis-infused edible and nonedible products are disposed. Cannabis 20250HB0020PN2119 - 76 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 that was tampered with, expired or damaged may not be stored at the premises for more than 14 calendar days.(c) Samples.--Cannabis samples shall be in a sealed container and clearly labeled. Samples shall be maintained in the restricted access area.(d) Storage.--The dispensary storage areas shall be maintained in accordance with the security requirements of this chapter and any regulations promulgated by the authority. Cannabis shall be stored at appropriate temperatures and under appropriate conditions to help ensure that the packaging, strength, quality and purity are not adversely affected.§ 9159.3. Destruction and disposal of cannabis.(a) Destruction.--Cannabis and cannabis-infused edible and nonedible products shall be destroyed by rendering the cannabis and cannabis-infused edible and nonedible products unusable using methods approved by the authority and promptly disposed of in a manner that complies with this chapter and regulations promulgated by the authority. Disposal of the cannabis waste rendered unusable may be delivered to a permitted solid waste facility for final disposition. Acceptable permitted solid waste facilities shall include all of the following:(1) Compostable facilities.(2) Noncompostable mixed-waste facilities.(b) Waste inventory.--Waste and unusable cannabis, cannabis concentrate or a cannabis-infused edible and nonedible product shall be weighed, recorded and entered into the seed-to-sale tracking system prior to rendering it unusable. Verification of waste inventory shall be performed by an employee who is a manager and conducted in an area with video surveillance. Electronic documentation of destruction and disposal shall be 20250HB0020PN2119 - 77 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 maintained for a period of at least two years.§ 9159.4. Security measures.A dispensary shall implement security measures to protect the premises and adult-use consumers and deter and prevent entry into and theft of cannabis or currency in accordance with the regulations promulgated under this chapter as determined by the authority.§ 9159.5. Recordkeeping.(a) Record retention.--Dispensary records shall be maintained electronically for two years and be available for inspection by the authority upon request. The required written records shall include all of the following:(1) Operating procedures.(2) Inventory records, policies and procedures.(3) Security records, not including video footage retained under section 9159.4 (relating to security measures).(4) Audit records.(5) Staff training plans and completion documentation.(6) Staffing plan.(7) Business records, including:(i) Assets and liabilities.(ii) Monetary transactions.(iii) Written or electronic accounts, including bank statements, journals, ledgers and supporting documents, agreements, checks, invoices, receipts and vouchers.(iv) Any other financial accounts reasonably related to the dispensary operations.(b) Storage and transfer of records.--If a dispensary closes due to insolvency, revocation, bankruptcy or for any other 20250HB0020PN2119 - 78 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 reason, all records required to be maintained shall be preserved and provided to the authority.§ 9159.6. Issuance of adult-use cultivation center permits.(a) Modifications or changes.--Following the completion of a comprehensive market analysis, the authority may, by rule, do any of the following:(1) Modify or change the number of new adult-use cultivation center permits available.(2) Modify or change the permitting application process to reduce or eliminate the barriers to permits, particularly for social and economic equity applicants, and shall make modifications to remedy evidence of discrimination.(b) Additional permits.--If the authority determines that additional adult-use cultivation center permits should be issued other than those permits issued to current medical cannabis grower/processors, the authority shall ensure that microcultivation center permit holders are provided the first opportunity to apply for, and be awarded, the additional permits prior to accepting additional applications.§ 9159.7. Authorization of current medical cannabis grower/processor permit holders to grow cannabis for adult use.(a) Dual use cultivation center permits.--A medical cannabis business establishment holding a grower/processor permit granted under Subchapter E (relating to medical cannabis business establishments) or I (relating to academic clinical research centers and clinical registrants) of Chapter 93 (relating to medical use of cannabis) shall, within 90 days from the effective date of this subsection, be authorized by the authority to commence selling adult use cannabis as an adult use 20250HB0020PN2119 - 79 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 cultivation center. A medical cannabis business establishment holding a grower/processor permit granted under Subchapter E or K of Chapter 93 shall pay a nonrefundable permit fee of $250,000 to the authority, which shall be deposited into the Cannabis Regulation Fund.(b) Delay or inhibit operations.--The failure of the authority to promulgate regulations shall not delay or inhibit the ability of a medical cannabis business establishment under subsection (a) from commencing the sale of cannabis for adult use at a grower/processor facility operating under Chapter 93. If the authority fails to authorize a medical cannabis business establishment under subsection (a) from commencing the sale of cannabis for adult use at a grower/processor facility operating under Chapter 93 within 90 days from the effective date of this subsection, the medical cannabis business establishment shall automatically be authorized to commence cannabis sales for adult use.(c) Adult-use cultivation centers.--An adult-use cultivation center which is a medical cannabis business establishment operating under this chapter and Chapter 93 shall be subject to the provisions of both chapters.§ 9159.8. New adult-use cultivation center permits.If the authority makes available an additional adult-use cultivation center permit, the authority shall determine the requirements of an application for the permit and selection criteria and promulgate regulations as necessary to implement this section.§ 9159.9. Adult-use cultivation center requirements and prohibitions.(a) Requirements.--The operating documents of an adult-use 20250HB0020PN2119 - 80 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 cultivation center shall include procedures for the oversight of the adult-use cultivation center, tracking cannabis, including a physical inventory recorded weekly, accurate recordkeeping and a staffing plan.(b) Security plan.--An adult-use cultivation center shall implement a security plan that includes facility access controls, perimeter intrusion detection systems, personnel identification systems, a 24-hour surveillance system to monitor the interior and exterior of the adult-use cultivation center facility and accessibility to authorized law enforcement and the authority in real time.(c) Facility.--All cultivation of cannabis by an adult-use cultivation center shall take place in an enclosed, locked facility at the physical address provided to the authority during the licensing process. The adult-use cultivation center location shall only be accessed by the agents working for the adult-use cultivation center, the authority staff performing inspections and State law enforcement or other emergency personnel, contractors working on jobs unrelated to cannabis or other individuals as provided by rule.(d) Sale prohibited.--An adult-use cultivation center may not sell or distribute any cannabis or cannabis-infused edible and nonedible products to any person other than a dispensary or as otherwise authorized by rule of the authority.(e) Pricing.--An adult-use cultivation center may not either directly or indirectly discriminate in price between different dispensaries that are purchasing a like grade, strain, brand and quality of cannabis or cannabis-infused edible or nonedible product. Nothing in this subsection shall prevent adult-use cultivation centers from pricing cannabis differently based on 20250HB0020PN2119 - 81 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 differences in cannabinoid content, in the cost of manufacturing or processing, the quantities sold, including volume discounts, or the way the products are delivered.(f) Inventory tracking system.--All cannabis harvested by an adult-use cultivation center and intended for distribution to a dispensary shall be entered into inventory tracking system, packaged and labeled and placed into a cannabis container for transport.(g) Random inspection.--An adult-use cultivation center shall be subject to random inspections by the authority.(h) Theft or diversion notification.--If a cannabis business establishment discovers evidence of, or upon completion of an internal investigation reasonably suspects, a theft or diversion of cannabis or cannabis products, the permittee shall notify local law enforcement, the Pennsylvania State Police and the authority. This notification shall occur no later than 24 hours following completion of an investigation or discovery of evidence reasonably confirming the theft or diversion. Notification shall be made by phone, in person or by written or electronic communication.(i) Pesticides.--An adult-use cultivation center shall comply with all Federal and State rules and regulations regarding the use of pesticides on cannabis plants. The authority shall promulgate reasonable regulations allowing pesticide use in accordance with thresholds permitted in other adult-use cannabis markets.(j) Process.--An adult-use cultivation center may process cannabis, cannabis concentrates and cannabis-infused edible and nonedible products, including tinctures, topicals and edibles.(k) Compliance.--An adult-use cultivation center shall 20250HB0020PN2119 - 82 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 comply with any other requirements or prohibitions specified by regulations of the authority.(l) Technology solutions.-- An adult-use cultivation center may utilize sterilization methods and processes for cannabis plants prior to compliance testing, subject to the following:(1) The sterilization process shall happen after harvesting plant material, but before testing;(2) The adult-use cultivation center uses one of the following sterilization methods, or as otherwise approved by the authority:(i) Radio frequency;(ii) gas treatment, including ozone;(iii) Photonic;(iv) Irradiation;(v) UV light.(3) The adult-use cultivation center shall document whether the harvest batch showed visual signs of contamination.(4) Sterilized material and products must pass compliance testing.(m) Location limitation.--An adult-use cultivation center shall not be located in an area zoned for residential use.§ 9159.10. Issuance of microcultivation center permits.(a) Limitation.--An applicant may file no more than one application for a microcultivation center permit in any single application period.(b) Issuance.--The authority may issue up to 10 microcultivation center permits. Following completion of a comprehensive market analysis, the authority may adopt regulations to modify or raise the number of microcultivation 20250HB0020PN2119 - 83 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 center permits or modify or change the permitting application process to reduce or eliminate barriers for an applicant. In determining whether to exercise the authority granted under this subsection, the authority shall consider all the following factors:(1) The percentage of cannabis sales occurring in this Commonwealth not in the regulated market.(2) Whether there is an adequate supply of cannabis and cannabis-infused edible and nonedible products to serve patients under Chapter 93 (relating to medical use of cannabis).(3) Whether there is an adequate supply of cannabis and cannabis-infused edible and nonedible products to serve adult-use consumers.(4) Whether there is an oversupply of cannabis in this Commonwealth leading to trafficking of cannabis to states where the sale of cannabis is not permitted by law.(5) Population increases or shifts.(6) The density of microcultivation centers in any area of this Commonwealth.(7) Perceived security risks of increasing the number or location of microcultivation centers.(8) The past safety record of microcultivation centers.(9) The authority's capacity to appropriately regulate additional permittees.(10) Social and economic equity applicant participation.(11) Any other criteria the authority deems relevant.(c) Space.--A microcultivation center may not contain more than 3,000 square feet of canopy space for plants in the flowering stage for cultivation of cannabis as provided in this 20250HB0020PN2119 - 84 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 chapter. A microcultivation center may share a premises with a dispensary if each permittee stores currency and cannabis and cannabis-infused edible and nonedible products in a separate secured vault to which any other permittee does not have access or all permittees sharing a vault share more than 50% of the same ownership.§ 9159.11. Microcultivation center permit applications.(a) Required information.--When applying for a permit, the applicant for a microcultivation center permit shall electronically include information in at least the following categories as determined by the authority:(1) The fees to be paid.(2) A business plan that complies with the requirements under this chapter.(3) A security plan.(4) An inventory control plan.(5) A plan for community engagement.(6) Written policies and procedures regarding recordkeeping, inventory control, safety, security, diversion and diversity.(7) Facility plans, including floor plans, security overlay and specifications of the building exterior and interior layout.(8) The physical address of the microcultivation applicant's proposed facility, including the following, as applicable:(i) Evidence of the microcultivation applicant's clear legal title to or option to purchase the proposed facility.(ii) A fully-executed copy of the microcultivation 20250HB0020PN2119 - 85 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 applicant's unexpired lease for the proposed facility that includes the consent of the property owner for the use of the proposed property and facility for the term of the initial permit.(iii) Other evidence satisfactory to the authority that shows the microcultivation applicant has the authority, or will have the authority prior to the date of license issuance, to use the proposed property and facility for the term of the permit.(9) A copy of each relevant local zoning ordinance and documentation, if necessary, of approval from the local zoning office that the proposed microcultivation center location is in compliance with each local zoning ordinance.(10) Information regarding each principal officer.(11) Evidence of the applicant's status as a social and economic equity applicant, if applicable.(12) An executed labor peace agreement between a bona fide labor organization and the applicant. This agreement shall be an ongoing material condition of an applicant being issued a license.(b) Submission.--An applicant under subsection (a) shall submit all required information to the authority. Failure by an applicant to submit all required information may result in the application being disqualified.§ 9159.12. Selection criteria for microcultivation center permits.(a) Incomplete application.--If the authority receives an application under section 9159.11 (relating to microcultivation center permit applications) that fails to provide the required elements contained in a section, that section may not be scored.20250HB0020PN2119 - 86 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Application scoring.--The authority shall, by rule, develop a merit-based scoring system in which to award microcultivation center permits.(c) Scoring criteria.--An applicant for a microcultivation center permit shall be awarded points on an application as determined by the authority.(d) Anonymity.--Applications for microcultivation center permits shall be scored by the department anonymously in accordance with regulations promulgated by the authority, which shall include tie-breaker language that governs the process through which some applicants are to be awarded permits when multiple applicants receive the same application score and the awarding of permits to all tied applicants would result in awarding more permits than is permissible under this chapter. A tie-breaking process shall be designed to ensure clarity, transparency and fairness.(e) Review.--Each application for a microcultivation center permit shall be reviewed and scored by three individuals who score each application independently. An applicant's score shall be an average of the three scores awarded by each individual score.(f) Award of points.--Except in the case when an applicant for a microcultivation center permit provides necessary documentation of a status as a social and economic equity applicant or an existing farming operation, the scoring system developed by the authority shall be designed to ensure that the applicant does not receive full points for only providing responsive information on a section of the application.§ 9159.13. Microcultivation center requirements and prohibitions.20250HB0020PN2119 - 87 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Operating documents.--The operating documents of a microcultivation center shall include procedures for the oversight of the microcultivation center, tracking cannabis, including a physical inventory recorded weekly, accurate recordkeeping and a staffing plan.(b) Security plan.--A microcultivation center shall implement a security plan that includes facility access controls, perimeter intrusion detection systems, personnel identification systems and a 24-hour surveillance system to monitor the interior and exterior of the microcultivation center that is accessible to authorized law enforcement and the authority in real time.(c) Facility requirements.--All cultivation of adult-use cannabis by a microcultivation center shall take place in an enclosed, locked facility at the physical address provided to the authority during the permitting process. The microcultivation center location shall only be accessed by the cannabis business establishment agents working for the microcultivation center, the authority staff performing inspections, Commonwealth and local law enforcement or other emergency personnel, contractors working on jobs unrelated to cannabis, individuals in a mentoring or educational program approved by the State or other individuals as provided by rule. If a microcultivation center shares a premises with a dispensary, agents from the other permittees may access the microcultivation center portion of the premises if the location point is a common area for access to bathrooms, lunchrooms, locker rooms or other areas of the building where work or cultivation of adult-use cannabis is not performed. At no time may a dispensary agent perform work at a microcultivation center 20250HB0020PN2119 - 88 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 without being an employee of the microcultivation center.(d) Sale and distribution limitation.--A microcultivation center may not sell or distribute cannabis to any person other than a dispensary permitted under this chapter or as otherwise authorized by rule of the authority.(e) Location limitation.--A microcultivation center shall not be located in an area zoned for residential use.(f) Price discrimination.--A microcultivation center may not either directly or indirectly discriminate in price between different dispensaries that are purchasing a like grade, strain, brand and quality of adult-use cannabis or cannabis-infused edible or nonedible product. Nothing in this subsection shall prevent a microcultivation center from pricing adult-use cannabis differently based on cannabinoid content, differences in the cost of manufacturing, processing, quantities sold, including volume discounts, or the method of product delivery.(g) Data collection system.--All adult-use cannabis harvested by a microcultivation center and intended for distribution to a dispensary shall be entered into a data collection system, packaged and labeled in compliance with this chapter and any regulations promulgated by the authority and, if the distribution is to a dispensary that does not share a premises with the dispensary receiving the adult-use cannabis, placed into a cannabis container for transport.(h) Random inspection.--A microcultivation center shall be subject to random inspections by the authority.(i) Notification of loss or theft.--A microcultivation center agent shall notify local law enforcement, the Pennsylvania State Police and the authority within 24 hours of the discovery of any loss or theft. A notification under this 20250HB0020PN2119 - 89 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subsection shall be made by phone, in person or by written or electronic communication.(j) Pesticides.--A microcultivation center shall comply with all Federal and State rules and regulations regarding the use of pesticides in addition to any regulations promulgated by the authority.(k) Transportation.--A microcultivation center or cannabis business establishment agent shall be permitted to transport cannabis or cannabis-infused edible and nonedible products to any other cannabis business establishment. A microcultivation center may alternatively enter into a contract with a dispensary or a testing laboratory related to the transport of cannabis.(l) Compliance.--A microcultivation center shall comply with any other requirements or prohibitions specified by regulations of the authority.§ 9159.14. Labor peace agreements. (a) Condition of licensing.-- (1) Applicants applying for or holding a license to grow, process, or dispense adult-use cannabis shall submit as part of their application a labor peace agreement signed by a bona fide labor organization and the applicant applicable to all locations under the same license.(2) A labor peace agreement shall be an ongoing material condition of an applicant being issued a license and maintaining the license.(3) This subsection shall apply to all licenses issued by the authority, including transfers and renewals.(b) Failure to comply.--(1) Failure to comply with the terms agreed to in the labor peace agreement for the entire duration of the 20250HB0020PN2119 - 90 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 agreement shall result in fines, suspension, license or renewal, denial or revocation of a license.(2) The authority shall determine a schedule establishing the ongoing review of the status and maintenance of a labor peace agreement to assess the eligibility of a license holder.(3) Upon review and findings of unsatisfactory status or the insufficient maintenance of a labor peace agreement, the authority may issue a fine or other penalty to the license holder.(4) A determination by the Pennsylvania Labor Relations Board, National Labor Relations board, or by an arbitrator as provided in the labor peace agreement that an employer has engaged in an unfair labor practice or has violated the terms of the labor peace agreement shall result in immediate suspension of the permit until the violation has been rectified pursuant to an order of the board or arbitrator.(5) Nothing in this section shall void the right of a bona fide labor organization to pursue a complaint of unfair labor practices in violation of Federal or State law with the Pennsylvania Labor Relations Board or the National Labor Relations Board.(6) If a majority of the employees of a cannabis business have voted to join a bona fide labor organization, failure to enter into a collective bargaining agreement within 200 days of the opening of such licensed cannabis business, may result in a referral to the National Labor Relations Board.§ 9159.15. Agent identification cards.(a) Required form.--The authority shall promulgate 20250HB0020PN2119 - 91 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 regulations detailing the form required for an initial application or renewal application for an agent identification card submitted under this chapter. The form shall include all of the following:(1) A nonrefundable fee to accompany the initial application or renewal application.(2) A fingerprinting and background check requirement.(3) Means to submit the initial application or renewal application via electronic means.(b) Verification.--The authority shall verify the information contained in an initial application or renewal application for an agent identification card submitted under this chapter and approve or deny the application within 14 days of receiving the completed application and all supporting documentation required by regulations of the authority.(c) Duties of establishment.--The cannabis business establishment:(1) shall print and issue an agent identification card to a qualifying agent within 14 business days of approving the initial application or renewal application; and(2) may allow a cannabis business establishment agent to work at a cannabis business establishment after the agent's application has been approved but prior to issuance of the agent identification card.(d) Identification card.--An agent shall keep the agent identification card under this section visible at all times when on the property of the cannabis business establishment where the agent is employed, unless the agent is working after being approved as an agent by the authority but prior to the receipt of the agent's identification card.20250HB0020PN2119 - 92 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (e) Identification card requirements.--The agent identification card shall contain the following:(1) The name of the cardholder.(2) The date of issuance and expiration date of the agent identification card.(3) A random 10-digit alphanumeric identification number containing at least four numbers and at least four letters that is unique to the holder.(4) A photograph of the cardholder.§ 9159.16. Affiliations.(a) Affiliation requirements.--(1) A person that owns or obtains a controlling interest of a cannabis business establishment, including an approved laboratory, pursuant to a change in control transaction or security of a cannabis business established pledged or provided to a financial backer that is not already affiliated as a principal shall be affiliated as a principal by the authority as provided for in paragraphs (2) and (3).(2) Within 10 days of the pledge or provision of any securities of a cannabis business establishment to a financial backer, a change in control transaction or receipt of a controlling interest, subsequent to the adoption of this subsection or immediately with respect to a pledge or provision of any securities of a cannabis business establishment to a financial backer, a change in control transaction or receipt of a controlling interest before the adoption of this subsection, the person that has obtained the securities, pledged or provided securities of the cannabis business establishment shall complete the affiliation of any person required to be affiliated with the authority. 20250HB0020PN2119 - 93 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) The authority shall, within 15 days of receipt of a request to affiliate a person, affiliate the person of the cannabis business establishment that is required to affiliate as required by paragraph (2) or as otherwise provided for under this paragraph.(b) Limitations.--(1) This section shall not be interpreted to require the authority to examine, inspect or approve equity transactions.(2) The authority may not deny an affiliation as provided for in this part, unless the person does meet the requirements provided for in sections 602 and 603 of the act of April 17, 2016 (P.L.84, No.16), known as the Medical Marijuana Act.(c) Administration.--An action brought by a person to enforce subsection (a)(3) of this subchapter shall be brought in the Commonwealth Court pursuant to its original jurisdiction provided for in 42 Pa.C.S. § 761 (relating to original jurisdiction.§ 9159.17. Renewal of cannabis business establishment permits and agent identification cards.(a) Renewal.--A permit or agent identification card issued under this chapter or Chapter 93 (relating to medical use of cannabis) shall be renewed every four years. A cannabis business establishment and agent shall receive written or electronic notice no later than 90 days before the expiration of the permit or card. The authority shall grant a renewal within 30 days of submission of a renewal application if all of the following apply:(1) The cannabis business establishment submits the required nonrefundable renewal fee.20250HB0020PN2119 - 94 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The permit or agent identification card has not been suspended or revoked for violating this chapter or regulations adopted under this chapter.(3) The cannabis business establishment has continued to operate in accordance with all plans submitted as part of its application and approved by the authority or any amendments to a submitted plan that have been approved by the authority.(4) The cannabis business establishment has submitted an agent, employee, contracting and subcontracting diversity report as required by the authority.(5) The cannabis business establishment has maintained a labor peace agreement with a bona fide labor organization that is actively engaged in representing the permittee ' s employees. Failure to maintain a labor peace agreement for the entire duration of the license may result in fines or other penalties issued by the authority.(6) The cannabis business establishment is in compliance with all Federal, State and local occupational health and safety requirements. A cannabis business establishment with outstanding fines or compliance orders from the Occupation Safety and Health Administration shall be deemed noncompliant for the purpose of this section.(b) Renewal fees.-- (1) For a dual-use grower/processor: (i) A renewal fee in the amount of $10,000 shall be paid and shall include renewal for all locations.(ii) The renewal fee shall be returned if the renewal is not granted.(2) For a dual-use dispensary:(i) A renewal fee in the amount of $5,000 shall be 20250HB0020PN2119 - 95 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 paid.(ii) The fee shall be returned if the renewal is not granted and shall include renewal for all locations.(3) For an adult-use cultivation center:(i) A renewal fee, to be determined by the authority, shall be paid.(ii) The fee shall be returned if the renewal is not granted and shall include renewal for all locations.(4) For a microcultivation:(i) A renewal fee, to be determined by the authority, shall be paid.(ii) The fee shall be returned if the renewal is not granted and shall cover renewal for all locations.(5) For a grower/processor permit that does not maintain adult-use operations:(i) A renewal fee in the amount of $10,000 shall be paid and shall cover renewal for all locations.(ii) The renewal fee shall be returned if the renewal is not granted.(6) For a dispensary that does not maintain adult-use operations:(i) A renewal fee in the amount of $5,000 shall be paid.(ii) All fees shall be paid by certified check, money order, electronic transfer or credit card.(iii) The fee shall be returned if the renewal is not granted and shall include renewal for all locations.(c) Pendency.--In the event the authority has not completed its review of a permittee's renewal application, and the renewal application was submitted as required in this subchapter, the 20250HB0020PN2119 - 96 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 permittee's permit shall remain active and in good standing until the authority completes the review and issues a renewed permit or denial.(d) Failure to renew license.--If a cannabis business establishment fails to renew the establishment's permit prior to license expiration, the establishment shall cease operations until the permit is renewed, unless otherwise permitted by the authority.(e) Failure to renew identification card.--If a cannabis business establishment or cannabis business establishment agent fails to renew a cannabis business establishment permit or the agent identification card prior to expiration, the cannabis business establishment or cannabis business establishment agent shall cease to operate as a cannabis business establishment or work as an agent of a cannabis business establishment, as applicable, until the cannabis business establishment permit or agent identification card is renewed, unless otherwise permitted by the authority.(f) Disciplinary action and fines.--A cannabis business establishment that continues to operate or any cannabis business establishment agent who continues to work as an agent, after the applicable permit or agent identification card has expired without renewal, absent authority permission, shall be subject to disciplinary action by the authority.(g) Collection of fees and fines.--All fees or fines collected from the renewal of a cannabis business establishment permit or agent identification card shall be deposited into the Cannabis Regulation Fund.§ 9159.18. Relocation.The authority may approve an application from a cannabis 20250HB0020PN2119 - 97 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 business establishment, under this chapter or Chapter 93 (relating to medical use of cannabis), to relocate within this Commonwealth or to add or delete activities or facilities.§ 9159.19. Warehousing and distribution permits. (a) Issuance.--The authority shall issue warehousing and distribution permits, which authorize the storage, inventory management and transportation of cannabis and cannabis products between cannabis business establishments, to eligible applicants.(b) Scope of permit.--A permit issued under this section shall authorize a permittee to:(1) Store cannabis and cannabis products in secure, compliant facilities.(2) Manage inventory, including tracking and reporting, as required by the board.(3) Transport cannabis and cannabis products between cultivators, manufacturers, retailers and other authorized entities within this Commonwealth.(c) Fees.--(1) A one-time, nonrefundable application fee of $2,500 shall be payable to the authority upon submission of the initial application for a permit.(2) An annual renewal fee of $5,000 shall be payable to the authority for a permit.(d) Residency requirement.--Ownership of at least 51% of an entity, including corporate stock of a corporation, control over the management and day-to-day operations of the business and an interest in the capital, assets, profits and losses of the business proportionate to the percentage of ownership, applying for a permit must be held by individuals who have been residents 20250HB0020PN2119 - 98 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of this Commonwealth for at least two consecutive years immediately prior to the application date.(e) Restriction on other permits.--The holder of a permit, including its owners, principals and operators, may not hold a grower-processor permit or cultivation center permit.(f) Employee background checks.--(1) All employees of a permittee shall undergo a criminal history background check conducted by the Pennsylvania State Police prior to employment.(2) A permittee shall submit employee background check results to the authority upon request and maintain records for inspection.(g) Regulatory oversight.--The authority shall establish and enforce rules governing the permitting, operation and compliance of warehousing and distribution facilities, including:(1) Security protocols for storage and transportation.(2) Inventory tracking and reporting requirements.(3) Compliance with health and safety standards.(h) Inspections.--The authority, or a designee, may conduct regular and unannounced inspections of permitted facilities to ensure compliance.(i) Penalties.--A violation of this section may result in fines or permit suspension or revocation, as determined by the authority.(j) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Permit." A permit issued under subsection (a)."Permittee." The holder of a permit.SUBCHAPTER G20250HB0020PN2119 - 99 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ENFORCEMENT AND IMMUNITIESSec.9161. Permit discipline.9162. Immunities and presumptions relating to handling of cannabis by cannabis business establishments and agents.9163. Commonwealth standards and requirements.9164. Violation of tax acts and refusal, revocation or suspension of permit or agent identification card.§ 9161. Permit discipline.(a) Authority actions.--Notwithstanding any other civil or criminal penalties related to the unlawful possession of adult-use cannabis, the authority may take disciplinary or nondisciplinary action as the authority deems proper with regard to a cannabis business establishment or cannabis business establishment agent, including fines not to exceed $5,000 for each violation of this chapter or regulations promulgated by the authority.(b) Determination.--The authority shall consider permittee cooperation in any investigation in its determination of penalties imposed under this section. The procedures for disciplining a cannabis business establishment or cannabis business establishment agent and for administrative hearings shall be determined by regulation of the authority and shall provide for the review of final decisions under 2 Pa.C.S. (relating to administrative law and procedure).§ 9162. Immunities and presumptions relating to handling of cannabis by cannabis business establishments and agents.(a) Immunities and presumptions.--A cannabis business 20250HB0020PN2119 - 100 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 establishment or an agent shall not be subject to the following based solely on conduct that is lawful under this chapter or any regulations promulgated under this chapter:(1) Prosecution.(2) Search or inspection, except by the authority or under the authority of the authority or a State or local law enforcement agency under this chapter.(3) Seizure.(4) Denial of any right or privilege.(5) Penalty in any manner, or denial of any right or privilege, including civil penalty or disciplinary action by a business permitting or licensing board or entity for working for a cannabis business establishment under this chapter and regulations adopted under this chapter.(b) Prohibition.--Any cannabis, cannabis-infused edible or nonedible product, cannabis paraphernalia, legal property or interest in legal property that is possessed, owned or used in connection with the use of cannabis as permitted under this chapter, or acts incidental to that use, may not be seized or forfeited. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent the seizure or forfeiture of cannabis exceeding the amounts permitted under this chapter or prevent seizure or forfeiture if the basis for the action is unrelated to the cannabis that is possessed, manufactured, transferred or used under this chapter.(c) Laws of this Commonwealth.--Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to preclude State or local law enforcement from searching an adult-use cultivation center, microcultivation center or dispensary if there is probable cause to believe that the laws of this Commonwealth have been violated and the search is conducted in conformance with law.20250HB0020PN2119 - 101 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Attorney General investigation.--Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to preclude the Attorney General or other authorized government agency from investigating or bringing a civil action against a cannabis business establishment or a cannabis business establishment agent for a violation of Commonwealth law, including civil rights violations and violations of the act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law.§ 9163. Commonwealth standards and requirements.Any standards, requirements and regulations regarding the health and safety, environmental protection, testing, security, food safety and worker protections established by the Commonwealth shall be the minimum standards for all permittees under this chapter, where applicable. Knowing violations of any Commonwealth or local law, ordinance or regulation conferring worker protections or legal rights on the employees of a permittee may be grounds for disciplinary action in addition to applicable penalties under this chapter.§ 9164. Violation of tax acts and refusal, revocation or suspension of permit or agent identification card.(a) General rule.--In addition to other grounds specified in this chapter, the authority, upon notification by the Department of Revenue, may not issue or renew a permit or agent identification card or suspend or revoke the permit or agent identification card of any person for any of the following:(1) Failure to file a tax return.(2) The filing of a fraudulent tax return.(3) Failure to pay all or part of any tax or penalty determined to be due.(4) Failure to keep books and records in accordance with 20250HB0020PN2119 - 102 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 this chapter or the regulations promulgated by the authority.(5) Failure to secure and display a certificate or related permit document, if required.(6) The willful violation of any rule or regulation of the Department of Revenue relating to the administration and enforcement of tax liability.(b) Resolution.--The Department of Revenue, after a violation under subsection (a) has been corrected or resolved, shall, upon request of the subject of the violation, notify the authority that the violation has been corrected or resolved. Upon receiving notice from the Department of Revenue that a violation under subsection (a) has been corrected or otherwise resolved, the authority may issue or renew the permit or agent identification card or vacate an order of suspension or revocation.SUBCHAPTER HLABORATORY TESTINGSec.9171. Laboratory testing requirements and prohibitions.§ 9171. Laboratory testing requirements and prohibitions.(a) Legality.--Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the following actions, when performed by a cannabis testing facility with a current, valid registration or an individual 21 years of age or older who is acting in an official capacity as an owner, employee or agent of a cannabis testing facility, may not be determined to be unlawful and may not be an offense or be a basis for seizure or forfeiture of assets under the laws of this Commonwealth:(1) Possessing, repackaging, transporting or storing cannabis or cannabis-infused edible or nonedible products.20250HB0020PN2119 - 103 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Receiving or transporting cannabis or cannabis-infused edible or nonedible products from a cannabis business establishment.(3) Returning or transporting cannabis or cannabis-infused edible or nonedible products to a cannabis business establishment.(b) Prohibition.--A laboratory at a cannabis testing facility may not handle, test or analyze adult-use cannabis unless approved by the authority in accordance with this section. A laboratory at a cannabis testing facility may not be approved to handle, test or analyze cannabis unless the laboratory:(1) Is accredited by a private laboratory accrediting organization.(2) Does not have a direct or indirect financial, management or other interest in an adult-use cultivation center, microcultivation center, dispensary or medical cannabis grower/processor in this Commonwealth or is affiliated with a certifying physician under Chapter 93 (relating to medical use of cannabis).(3) Has employed at least one individual to oversee and be responsible for the laboratory testing who has earned, from a college or university accredited by a national or regional certifying authority, at least one of the following:(i) A master's level degree in chemical or biological sciences and a minimum of two years' postgraduate laboratory experience.(ii) A bachelor's degree in chemical or biological sciences and a minimum of four years' postgraduate laboratory experience.20250HB0020PN2119 - 104 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) Provides the authority with a copy of the most recent annual inspection report granting accreditation and every annual report thereafter.(c) Random sample.--(1) Immediately prior to selling any cannabis or cannabis-infused edible or nonedible product or packaging cannabis for sale to a dispensary, each batch shall be made available by the adult-use cultivation center or microcultivation center for an employee of an approved laboratory at a cannabis testing facility to select a random sample, which shall be tested by the approved laboratory for:(i) Microbiological contaminants.(ii) Mycotoxins.(iii) Pesticide active ingredients.(iv) Heavy metals.(v) Residual solvent.(vi) An active ingredient analysis.(vii) THC potency.(2) The authority shall only require cannabis or cannabis-infused edible and nonedible products to be tested one time in its final form before the cannabis or cannabis-infused edible and nonedible products can be sold to a dispensary for sale to adult-use consumers.(d) Standard operating procedures.--(1) An approved laboratory shall maintain written standard operating procedures for each of the following:(i) Confirmation of the validity of results of testing.(ii) Quality control.(iii) All sampling and testing procedures, including 20250HB0020PN2119 - 105 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 required safety tests.(iv) Any other operation as determined by the authority.(2) A laboratory applying for approval as a testing laboratory shall submit its standard operating procedures to the authority as part of the laboratory ' s application. (3) An approved testing laboratory shall submit its standard operating procedures to the authority at the following time periods:(i) for laboratories approved prior to the effective date of this paragraph, within 30 days of the effective date of this paragraph;(ii) at each renewal of approval; and(iii) with 30 days of a substantial change to the standard operating procedures.(4) The authority shall enter and conduct a reasonable inspection of an approved testing laboratory to ensure adherence to the standard operating procedures at least annually. The following shall apply:(i) If the inspection results in the authority identifying gaps in the standard operating procedure, the authority shall submit its findings to the approved testing laboratory. The laboratory shall have 30 days to respond to the findings and submit a corrective action plan to the authority.(ii) Failure to adhere to corrective actions within a reasonable time shall constitute a violation of this act and may result in penalties. Nothing shall limit the authority ' s ability to suspend or revoke an approval issued to a laboratory as prescribed in 28 Pa. Code Ch. 20250HB0020PN2119 - 106 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 1171a (relating to laboratories).(5) The authority may engage with an independent accreditation body to fulfill the requirements under this subchapter.(e) Validity of testing results.--(1) The authority, in coordination with the Bureau of Laboratories, shall ensure that approved testing laboratories ' results are valid no less than once a year beginning on January 1 immediately following the effective date of this paragraph. The following apply:(i) The authority shall require approved testing laboratories to participate in an established method used to determine validity of results.(ii) The authority may engage an accredited proficiency testing provider to fulfill subparagraph (i).(iii) Nothing in this subsection shall be interpreted as prohibiting the authority from ensuring validity of results more than once within a calendar year.(iv) A test issued by an accredited proficiency testing provider as required solely to maintain accreditation shall not fulfill the requirements of this subparagraph.(2) If the results from an approved testing laboratory are found to be invalid, the following actions shall be taken by the authority:(i) A review of the approved testing laboratory ' s standard operating procedures.(ii) Additional testing, as needed, to understand the cause for the anomalies and unanticipated errors.20250HB0020PN2119 - 107 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) The authority may enter the approved testing laboratory for further investigation and shall issue its findings. The authority may engage with an independent accreditation body to fulfill the requirements under this subparagraph.(3) Failure to participate or failure to adhere to corrective actions shall constitute a violation of this part and may result in penalties. Nothing in this subsection shall be interrupted as limiting the authority ' s ability to suspend or revoke an approval issued to a laboratory as prescribed in 28 Pa. Code Ch. 1171a.(f) Trend analysis.--The authority may utilize the seed-to-sale tracking system to conduct trend analysis for laboratory oversight.(g) Accreditation.--The authority shall determine the scope of accreditation an approved laboratory must receive and maintain. The authority shall provide an approved laboratory reasonable time to receive any additional accreditation beyond the laboratory ' s most recent certificate of accreditation. (h) State testing laboratory.--The authority may establish and maintain a State testing laboratory. A State testing laboratory under this subsection shall be responsible for:(1) Developing and maintaining a cannabis laboratory reference library that contains testing methodologies in the areas of:(i) Potency.(ii) Homogeneity.(iii) Detection of contaminants and the quantity of those contaminants.(iv) Solvents.20250HB0020PN2119 - 108 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Establishing standard operating procedures for sample collection, preparation and analysis of cannabis by approved testing laboratories.(3) Conducting proficiency testing of approved testing laboratories.(4) Remediating of problems with approved testing laboratories.(5) Conducting compliance testing on cannabis samples analyzed by approved testing laboratories.(h.1) Materials.--Approved testing laboratories shall provide materials to the State testing laboratory reference library.(i) Authority sample.--The authority may select a random sample that shall, for the purposes of conducting an active ingredient analysis, be tested by a laboratory chosen by the authority for verification of label information.(j) Disposal of sample.--A laboratory at a cannabis testing facility shall immediately return or dispose of any cannabis upon the completion of any testing, use or research. Any cannabis that is disposed of shall be done in accordance with the authority's regulations related to cannabis waste.(k) Sample failure.--If a sample of cannabis does not pass testing under subsection (c) based on the standards established by the authority, the following shall apply:(1) The sample may be retested, with or without remediation, up to two additional times after a failed test.(2) After a third failed test, including the initial failed test, or at the choosing of the cannabis business establishment, the batch may be used to make a CO2-based or solvent-based extract. After processing, the CO2-based or 20250HB0020PN2119 - 109 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 solvent-based extract shall still pass all required tests.(3) Seeds, immature cannabis plants, cannabis plants, cannabis flowers or cannabis-infused edible or nonedible products may be remediated at any time prior to cannabis or cannabis-infused edible or nonedible products being provided to dispensaries for sale to adult-use consumers under this chapter, including after any failed test performed by an independent laboratory under subsection (c) based on the standards established by the authority, if the cannabis or cannabis-infused edible or nonedible products being provided to dispensaries ultimately passes laboratory testing under subsection (c) based on the standards established by the authority.(l) Authority testing standards.--The authority shall establish standards for contamination under subsection (c) and shall develop labeling requirements for contents and potency. The authority shall ensure standards under this subsection are comparable to those set by other established adult-use cannabis markets and shall publicly disclose the basis for any standards set.(m) Copy of test results.--A laboratory at a cannabis testing facility shall file with the authority an electronic copy of each laboratory test result for any batch that does not pass testing under subsection (c) at the same time that it transmits those results to the adult-use cultivation center or microcultivation center. The testing laboratory shall maintain the laboratory test results for at least five years and make test results available at the authority's request for the same period.(n) Results.--An adult-use cultivation center or 20250HB0020PN2119 - 110 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 microcultivation center shall provide to a dispensary the laboratory test results for each batch of cannabis-infused edible or nonedible product purchased by the dispensary, if sampled. Each dispensary shall have those laboratory results available upon request to adult-use consumers.(o) Additional regulations permitted.--The authority shall promulgate regulations relating to testing in furtherance of and consistent with this chapter.(p) Location limitation.--A testing laboratory shall not be located in an area zoned for residential use.SUBCHAPTER IADVERTISING, MARKETING, PACKAGING AND LABELINGSec.9181. Advertising and promotions.9182. Cannabis-infused edible and nonedible product packaging and labeling.§ 9181. Advertising and promotions.(a) Authorization.--A cannabis business establishment may advertise and market adult-use cannabis and cannabis-infused edible and nonedible products, including through discounts and promotional programs. A cannabis business establishment shall not engage in advertising or marketing contains any statement or image that:(1) is false or misleading;(2) promotes over-consumption of cannabis or cannabis-infused edible and nonedible products;(3) depicts a person under 21 years of age consuming cannabis;(4) makes any unsupported health claims about cannabis, cannabis-infused edible or nonedible products or cannabis 20250HB0020PN2119 - 111 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 concentrates;(5) includes any image designed or likely to appeal to a minor; or(6) is in the form of a billboard that is placed, or caused to be placed, within 500 feet of a building occupied exclusively as a public, private or parochial school or day-care center.(a.1) Disclaimer.--Health claims made by a cannabis business establishment must be accompanied by a disclaimer or other qualifying language to accurately communicate to consumers the level of scientific evidence supporting the claim.(b) Definition.--For purposes of this section, the term "qualified health claim" means a claim supported by scientific evidence, which does not meet the more rigorous significant scientific agreement standard required for an authorized health claim.§ 9182. Cannabis-infused edible and nonedible product packaging and labeling.(a) Registration.--Each cannabis-infused edible and nonedible product produced for sale shall be registered with the authority in a form and manner provided by the authority. A product produced in accordance with this chapter may not require authority approval prior to being produced for sale. Each product registration shall include a label containing all information required by the authority.(b) Packaging.--Cannabis-infused edible and nonedible products intended for distribution to a dispensary for sale to adult-use consumers shall be packaged in a sealed or child-resistant container or package and labeled in a manner consistent with current standards, including the Consumer 20250HB0020PN2119 - 112 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Product Safety Commission standards referenced under 15 U.S.C. Ch. 39A (relating to special packaging of household substances for protection of children).(c) Cannabis-infused edible and nonedible product packaging.--Each cannabis-infused edible and nonedible product shall be wrapped or packaged at the original point of preparation.(d) Cannabis-infused edible and nonedible product labeling.--Each cannabis-infused edible and nonedible product shall be labeled prior to sale. Each label shall be securely affixed to the package and shall state in legible font all of the following:(1) The common or usual name of the item and the registered name of the cannabis-infused edible and nonedible product that was registered with the authority under subsection (a).(2) A unique serial number that matches the product with an adult-use cultivation center or microcultivation center batch and lot number to facilitate any warnings or recalls the authority or adult-use cultivation center or microcultivation center deems appropriate.(3) The date of final testing and packaging.(4) The identification of the independent cannabis testing facility.(5) The date of harvest for cannabis flower or the date of manufacture for other forms of cannabis.(6) A "use by" date.(7) The quantity, in ounces or grams, of cannabis contained in the product.(8) A content list, including:20250HB0020PN2119 - 113 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) The minimum and maximum percentage content by weight for:(A) delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol (THC);(B) tetrahydrocannabinolic acid (THCA);(C) cannabidiol (CBD);(D) cannabidiolic acid (CBDA); and(E) all other ingredients of the item, including any colors, artificial flavors and preservatives listed in descending order by predominance of weight shown with common or usual names.(ii) (Reserved).(9) The acceptable tolerances for the minimum percentage shall not be below 85% or above 115% of the labeled amount.(e) Prohibition.--Cannabis product packaging may not contain information that:(1) Is false or misleading.(2) Promotes excessive consumption.(3) Depicts a person under 21 years of age consuming cannabis.(4) Includes any image designed or likely to appeal to a minor.(f) Additional requirements.--The following shall apply to a cannabis-infused edible and nonedible product produced by concentrating or extracting ingredients from the cannabis plant:(1) If solvents were used to create the concentrate or extract, a statement that discloses the type of extraction method, including any solvents or gases used to create the concentrate or extract.(2) Disclosure of any chemicals or compounds used to produce or added to the concentrate or extract.20250HB0020PN2119 - 114 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Cannabis concentrates sold with greater than 70% THC shall indicate the product is a high-THC product on the product label.(g) Product warning.--All cannabis, cannabis-infused edible and nonedible products and cannabis concentrates shall contain a warning on its label stating:Cannabis consumption may impair the ability to drive or operate heavy machinery, is for adult use only and should not be used by pregnant or breastfeeding women. Keep out of reach of children.(h) Servings.--(1) Each cannabis-infused edible or nonedible product intended for consumption shall include on the packaging the total milligram content of THC and CBD. Each package may not include more than a total of 500 milligrams of THC per package with respect to cannabis-infused edible and nonedible products intended for adult-use consumers. A package may contain multiple servings. A cannabis-infused edible and nonedible product that consists of more than a single serving shall be marked, stamped or otherwise imprinted, by individual single serving, with a symbol or easily recognizable mark approved by the authority indicating the package contains cannabis and shall be either:(i) scored or delineated to indicate one serving, if the cannabis-infused edible or nonedible product is in solid form; or(ii) if the cannabis-infused edible or nonedible product is not in solid form, packaged in a manner so that a single serving is readily identifiable or easily measurable.20250HB0020PN2119 - 115 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) As used in this subsection, the term "delineated" includes directly marking the product to indicate one serving or providing a means by which adult-use consumers can accurately identify one serving.(i) Delineation.--A cannabis-infused edible or nonedible product consisting of multiple servings shall be homogenized so that each serving contains the same concentration of THC.(j) Alternation or destruction of packaging.--No individual other than the adult-use consumer shall alter or destroy any labeling affixed to the primary packaging of cannabis-infused edible or nonedible products after the cannabis-infused edible or nonedible products have been dispensed.SUBCHAPTER JPREPARATION, DESTRUCTION AND REGULATION OF CANNABIS AND CANNABIS-INFUSED EDIBLE AND NONEDIBLE PRODUCTS.Sec.9191. Preparation of cannabis-infused edible and nonedible products.9192. Destruction of cannabis.9193. Local ordinances.9194. Confidentiality.9195. Financial institutions.9196. Contracts enforceable.9197. Administrative rulemaking.§ 9191. Preparation of cannabis-infused edible and nonedible products.(a) Regulation.--The authority may regulate the production of cannabis-infused edible and nonedible products by an adult-use cultivation center or a microcultivation center and establish regulations related to refrigeration, hot-holding and 20250HB0020PN2119 - 116 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 handling of cannabis-infused edible and nonedible products. All cannabis-infused edible and nonedible products shall meet the packaging and labeling requirements specified under this chapter and any regulation promulgated by the authority.(b) Approval.--Cannabis-infused edible and nonedible products for sale or distribution at a dispensary shall be prepared by an approved agent of an adult-use cultivation center or microcultivation center. A dispensary may not manufacture, process or produce a cannabis-infused edible and nonedible product.(c) (Reserved).(d) Enforcement.--The authority shall promulgate regulations for the manufacture and processing of cannabis-infused edible and nonedible products and may at all times enter every building, room, basement, enclosure or premises occupied or used, or suspected of being occupied or used, for the production, preparation, manufacture for sale, storage, processing, distribution or transportation of cannabis-infused edible and nonedible products. The authority may inspect the premises together with all utensils, fixtures, furniture and machinery used for the preparation of products under this section.§ 9192. Destruction of cannabis.(a) Destruction.--All cannabis byproduct, scrap and harvested cannabis not intended for distribution to a dispensary shall be destroyed and disposed of under regulations adopted by the authority under this chapter. Documentation of the destruction and disposal shall be retained at the adult-use cultivation center, microcultivation center or cannabis testing facility as applicable for a period of not less than two years.20250HB0020PN2119 - 117 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Notification prior to destruction.--The adult-use cultivation center, microcultivation center or dispensary shall keep a record of the date and quantity of destruction.(c) Unsold cannabis.--A dispensary shall destroy all cannabis, including cannabis-infused edible and nonedible products, not sold to adult-use consumers by the stated date of expiration. Documentation of destruction and disposal shall be retained at the dispensary for a period of not less than two years.§ 9193. Local ordinances.(a) Zoning ordinances.--Unless otherwise provided by this chapter or law:(1) A municipality may enact reasonable zoning ordinances not in conflict with this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter regulating a cannabis business establishment. A municipality may not unreasonably prohibit the use of cannabis authorized by this chapter.(2) A municipality may enact ordinances not in conflict with this chapter or with rules adopted under this chapter governing the time, place, manner and number of cannabis business establishment operations, including minimum distance limitations between cannabis business establishments and locations it deems sensitive. A municipality may establish civil penalties for violation of an ordinance or rules governing the time, place and manner of operation of a cannabis business establishment in the jurisdiction of the unit of local government. A municipality may not unreasonably restrict the time, place, manner and number of cannabis business establishment operations authorized by this chapter.(3) A municipality may authorize or permit the on-20250HB0020PN2119 - 118 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 premises consumption of cannabis at or in an adult-use dispensary within its jurisdiction in a manner consistent with this chapter. An adult-use dispensary authorized or permitted by a unit of local government to allow on-site consumption shall not be deemed a public place under the act of June 13, 2008 (P.L.182, No.27), known as the Clean Indoor Air Act.(4) A municipality may not regulate the activities described in paragraph (1), (2) or (3) in a manner more restrictive than the regulation of those activities by the Commonwealth under this chapter.(5) A municipality may not enact ordinances to prohibit a cannabis business establishment from locating within the unit of local government.(6) A municipality may not prohibit or condition the sale of cannabis for adult use at a medical cannabis dispensary authorized to sell cannabis for adult use under section 9153 (relating to authorization of current medical cannabis to commence dispensing cannabis for adult use).(b) Municipal zoning and land use requirements.--(1) A grower/processor shall meet the same municipal zoning and land use requirements as other manufacturing, processing and production facilities that are located in the same zoning district.(2) A dispensary shall meet the same municipal zoning and land use requirements as other commercial facilities that are located in the same zoning district.§ 9194. Confidentiality.(a) Disclosure.--Information provided by cannabis business establishment permittees or applicants to the authority, the 20250HB0020PN2119 - 119 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Office of Social Equity, the Pennsylvania State Police or other agency shall be limited to information necessary for the purposes of administering this chapter. The information shall be subject to the provisions and limitations contained in the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.(b) Privacy.--The information received and records kept by the authority, the Office of Social Equity and the Pennsylvania State Police for purposes of administering this chapter shall be subject to all applicable Federal privacy laws and shall be confidential and exempt from disclosure under 5 U.S.C. § 552 (relating to public information; agency rules, opinions, orders, records, and proceedings), except as provided under this chapter. The information received and records kept by the authority, the Office of Social Equity and the Pennsylvania State Police for purposes of administering this chapter shall not be subject to disclosure to an individual or a public or private entity, except to the authority, the Office of Social Equity, the Pennsylvania State Police and the Attorney General as necessary to perform official duties under this chapter.(c) Name and address.--The name and address of a person holding each cannabis business establishment permit shall be subject to disclosure under the Right-to-Know Law.(d) Authority information.--All information collected by the authority in the course of an examination, inspection or investigation of a permittee or applicant, including any complaint against a permittee or applicant filed with the authority and information collected to investigate any complaint, shall be maintained for the confidential use of the authority and shall not be disclosed, except as otherwise 20250HB0020PN2119 - 120 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provided under this chapter. A formal complaint against a permittee by the authority or any disciplinary order issued by the authority against a permittee or applicant shall be public record, except as otherwise provided by law. Complaints from consumers or members of the general public received regarding a specific, named permittee or complaints regarding conduct by entities without permits shall be subject to disclosure under the Right-to-Know Law.§ 9195. Financial institutions.(a) Exemption.--A financial institution that provides financial services customarily provided by financial institutions to a cannabis business establishment authorized under this chapter or to a person that is affiliated with a cannabis business establishment shall be exempt from any criminal law of the Commonwealth as it relates to cannabis-related conduct authorized under State law.(b) Confidentiality.--Information received by a financial institution from a cannabis business establishment shall be confidential. Except as otherwise required or permitted by Federal or State law or regulation, a financial institution may not make the information available to any person other than:(1) The adult-use consumer to whom the information applies.(2) A trustee, conservator, guardian, personal representative or agent of the adult-use consumer to whom the information applies.(3) A Federal or State regulator when requested in connection with an examination of the financial institution or if otherwise necessary for complying with Federal or State law.20250HB0020PN2119 - 121 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) A Federal or State regulator when requested in connection with an examination of the financial institution or if otherwise necessary for complying with Federal or State law.(5) A third party performing service for the financial institution if the third party is performing services under a written agreement that expressly or by operation of law prohibits the third party's sharing and use of confidential information for any purpose other than as provided in its agreement to provide services to the financial institution.§ 9196. Contracts enforceable.Contracts related to the operation of a cannabis business establishment under this chapter shall be enforceable. A contract entered into by a cannabis business establishment or its agents on behalf of a cannabis business establishment, or by those who allow property to be used by a cannabis business establishment, may not be considered unenforceable on the basis that cultivating, obtaining, manufacturing, processing, distributing, dispensing, transporting, selling, possessing or using cannabis is prohibited by Federal law.§ 9197. Administrative rulemaking.No later than 180 days after the promulgation of temporary regulations, the authority and each Commonwealth agency or authority with regulatory responsibility under this chapter shall promulgate regulations in accordance with the duties required under this chapter. The failure by a Commonwealth agency or authority with regulatory responsibility under this chapter to promulgate regulations within 180 days of the promulgation of temporary regulations shall not delay or otherwise impede a cannabis business establishment from 20250HB0020PN2119 - 122 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 commencing operations in accordance with this chapter.SUBCHAPTER KTAXESSec.9199.1. Imposition of sales tax and excise tax.9199.2. Cannabis Regulation Fund and distribution of revenue.9199.3. Tax deduction for eligible cannabis business establishments.§ 9199.1. Imposition of sales tax and excise tax.(a) Rate of sales tax.--A sales tax is imposed at the rate of 8% of the sales price for cannabis and cannabis-infused edible and nonedible products sold or otherwise transferred to any person other than a cannabis business establishment.(b) Deposit of sales tax.--Sales tax revenue under subsection (a) shall be deposited into the Cannabis Regulation Fund.(c) Rate of excise tax.--In addition to all other applicable taxes, an excise tax is imposed on each dispensary at the rate of 5% of the sales price for cannabis sold for adult use or otherwise transferred to any person other than a cannabis business establishment. Except as otherwise provided by regulation, a product subject to the tax imposed under this subsection may not be bundled in a single transaction with a product or service that is not subject to the tax imposed under this subsection.(d) Deposit of excise tax.--Excise tax revenue under subsection (c) shall be deposited into the Cannabis Regulation Fund.§ 9199.2. Cannabis Regulation Fund and distribution of revenue.(a) Establishment.--The Cannabis Regulation Fund is 20250HB0020PN2119 - 123 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 established in the State Treasury. Money in the fund is appropriated as specified under subsection (d). Any amount unspent at the end of a fiscal year shall be transferred to the General Fund if there has been an appropriation from the General Fund for the operations of the authority.(b) Deposit.--Fees and taxes payable to the Cannabis Regulation Fund under this chapter shall be deposited in the Cannabis Regulation Fund, other than tax revenue disbursed to municipalities and counties specified under subsection (f). The money deposited into the Cannabis Regulation Fund may only be used for the purposes specified under this section. Any interest accrued shall be deposited into the Cannabis Regulation Fund.(c) Transfers.--As soon as practical, but not to exceed 90 days, after the effective date of this subsection, the State Treasurer shall transfer twenty percent of the total balance of the Medical Marijuana Program Fund into the Cannabis Regulation Fund.(d) Allocation.--Money in the Cannabis Regulation Fund shall be allocated in accordance with the following:(1) Two percent of gross receipts of the revenue in the Cannabis Regulation Fund is appropriated to the authority as necessary for actual costs and expenses, including staffing expenses and expenses related to administering and enforcing this chapter.(2) The remainder of the money in the Cannabis Regulation Fund is transferred to the General Fund to provide economic relief to this Commonwealth.(e) Administration.--The Department of Revenue shall administer the taxes imposed under this chapter and may promulgate regulations that prescribe a method and manner for 20250HB0020PN2119 - 124 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 payment of the tax to ensure proper tax collection under this chapter.(f) Disbursement.--Revenue from all taxes collected under this chapter shall be disbursed as follows:(1) Ten percent of the revenue shall be disbursed to municipalities in which a cannabis business establishment is located, disbursed in proportion to the number of cannabis business establishments within the municipality. The following shall apply:(i) If a cannabis business establishment is located within a city of the first class or city of the second class all applicable tax revenue under this subsection shall be disbursed directly to the Commonwealth Financing Authority for deposit into the local share accounts for such cities.(ii) (Reserved).(2) Ten percent of the revenue shall be deposited into the Cannabis Regulation Fund for program administration and community investment.(3) Thirty percent of the revenue shall be deposited into the Community Opportunity Fund for technical assistance, grants, loans and incubation of social and economic equity applicants. Of the revenue, 5% shall be deposited into the Agricultural Innovation Grant Program.(4) Five percent of the revenue shall be used by the authority to establish each of the following:(i) A program to assist patients with the cost of providing medical cannabis under Chapter 93 (relating to medical use of cannabis) to patients who demonstrate financial hardship or need under this chapter, and the 20250HB0020PN2119 - 125 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 authority shall develop guidelines and procedures to ensure maximum availability to individuals with financial need.(ii) A program to assist patients and caregivers with the cost associated with the waiver or reduction of fees for identification cards under sections 9331(c)(5) (relating to identification cards) and 9332(a)(2) (relating to caregivers).(iii) A program to reimburse caregivers for the cost of providing background checks for caregivers.(5) To the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs, 10% of the revenue in the fund allocated at levels of 3% for drug use prevention, 3% for drug use treatment services and 4% for community-based peer recovery support services.(6) To the Pennsylvania Commission on Crime and Delinquency, 10% of the revenue in the fund for distribution to local police departments that demonstrate a need relating to the enforcement of this chapter and 5% of the revenue in the fund to be used for indigent defense services.(7) To the Department of Agriculture, 5% of the revenue, to be allocated at levels determined by the Department of Agricultural, for the benefit of farmland preservation and deposit in the Agricultural Innovation Grant Program.(8) To the General Fund, 20%.§ 9199.3. Tax deduction for eligible cannabis business establishments.A tax deduction shall be allowed from the taxable income of a cannabis business establishment in the amount of the ordinary and necessary expenses paid or incurred during the taxable year by the cannabis business establishment that are ordinarily 20250HB0020PN2119 - 126 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 deductible for Federal income tax purposes under 26 U.S.C. § 162 (relating to trade or business expenses). The deduction shall only be permitted to the extent that deductions for expenses under 26 U.S.C. § 162 were not taken by the cannabis business establishment for Federal income tax purposes for the taxable year.SUBCHAPTER LCANNABIS CLEAN SLATESec.9199.11. Cannabis clean slate.§ 9199.11. Cannabis clean slate.(a) General rule.--An individual who has been arrested for, charged with or convicted, including convictions resulting from a plea bargain, under section 13(a)(30) or (31) of the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, shall have the individual's criminal history related to the criminal proceeding expunged in accordance with subsection (b). This subsection shall only apply to nonviolent offenses.(b) Expungement process.--(1) The Pennsylvania State Police central repository shall, within six months of the effective date of this paragraph, transmit to the Administrative Office of Pennsylvania Courts all records related to an arrest or conviction under subsection (a) for expungement.(2) If the Administrative Office of Pennsylvania Courts determines that a record transmitted under paragraph (1) is not eligible for expungement, the Administrative Office of Pennsylvania Courts shall notify the Pennsylvania State Police of the determination within 30 days of receiving the 20250HB0020PN2119 - 127 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 information. Upon expiration of the 30-day period, the Administrative Office of Pennsylvania Courts shall provide to the court of common pleas in which the arrest or adjudication occurred a list of all records eligible for expungement. Within 30 days of receiving the list, the court of common pleas shall order the expungement of all criminal history records received under this section and all administrative records of the Department of Transportation relating to the criminal history records received under this section.(c) Resentencing process.--(1) An individual currently serving a sentence for a conviction under The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act related to the manufacture, delivery, or possession of cannabis, including, but not limited to, section 13(a)(30) or (31) of The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, that would have been lawful if this chapter had been in effect at the time of the offense, may petition for a dismissal of sentence before the trial court that entered the judgment of conviction in his or her case to request resentencing.(2) An individual with a prior conviction under The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, related to the manufacture, delivery, or possession of cannabis including, but not limited to, section 13(a)(30) or (31) of The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, that would have been lawful if this chapter had been in effect at the time of the offense, who is currently serving a sentence for a subsequent conviction of any kind and whose prior conviction under The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act may have led to an increased sentence for the 20250HB0020PN2119 - 128 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 current conviction may petition for a dismissal of sentence before the trial court that entered the judgment of conviction in his or her case to request resentencing.(3) Following review of the petition by the court, if the individual is found to be eligible for resentencing, the court shall notify the prosecution and any other relevant parties to allow for the presentation of arguments or evidence regarding the request.(d) Release of inmates.--A court of common pleas that has received an expungement order for a person currently incarcerated for the crime for which the court received the expungement order shall transmit to the appropriate county correctional institution or State correctional institution, as those terms are defined under 61 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions), an order for the immediate release or discharge of the individual whose record has been ordered to be expunged.(e) Motor vehicle operation privileges.--The Bureau of Motor Vehicles shall reinstate an individual's suspended or revoked motor vehicle operation privileges that were suspended or revoked as a result of the individual's conviction that has been expunged under this section.(f) Reinstatement of license or registration.--A license or registration that has been suspended or revoked under section 23 of The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act due to an arrest or conviction that has been expunged under this section shall be reinstated.(g) Workplace.--(1) This section is not intended to prohibit an employer from adopting reasonable policies restricting the use, consumption, possession, transfer, display, transportation, 20250HB0020PN2119 - 129 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 sale or growing of cannabis or cannabis products by employees in the workplace for adult use.(2) The following shall apply to drug screening tests:(i) Drug screening tests may be permissible for any position of employment that is a safety-sensitive position.(ii) A random drug screening test showing the mere presence of cannabis may not be the basis of a termination of employment or any other disciplinary action against the employee.(iii) Except as otherwise specifically provided by law:(A) An employer may not refuse to hire a prospective employee because the results of a drug screening test indicate the presence of cannabis.(B) If an employer requires an employee to submit to a drug screening test within the first 30 days of employment, the employee shall have the right to submit to an additional drug screening test, at the employee's own expense, to rebut the results of the initial drug screening test. The employer shall accept and give appropriate consideration to the results of the additional drug screening test.(iv) The provisions of subparagraph (iii) shall not apply:(A) To the extent that the provisions are inconsistent or otherwise in conflict with the provisions of an employment contract or collective bargaining agreement regarding the employee.(B) To the extent that the provisions are 20250HB0020PN2119 - 130 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 inconsistent or otherwise in conflict with Federal law.(C) To a position of employment that is funded by a Federal grant.(3) As used in this subsection, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this paragraph unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Drug screening test." A test of an individual's blood, urine, hair or saliva to detect the general presence of a controlled substance or any other drug."Safety-sensitive position." A position that requires any activity that an employer reasonably believes presents a potential risk of harm to the health or safety of an employee, others or the public while under the influence of medical cannabis or cannabis for adult use, including:(i) Duties performed at heights or in confined spaces, including mining.(ii) The operation of a motor vehicle, aircraft, watercraft, snowmobile or other vehicles, equipment, machinery or power tools.(iii) Repairing, maintaining or monitoring the performance or operation of any equipment, machinery or manufacturing process, the malfunction or disruption of which could result in injury or property damage.(iv) Performing firefighting or law enforcement duties.(v) The operation, maintenance or oversight of critical services and infrastructure, including electric, gas and water utilities, power generation or distribution.20250HB0020PN2119 - 131 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (vi) The extraction, compression, processing, manufacturing, handling, packaging, storage, disposal, treatment or transport of potentially volatile, flammable, combustible materials, elements, chemicals or other highly regulated components.(vii) Dispensing pharmaceuticals.(viii) A position that requires the employee to carry a firearm.(ix) Direct patient care or direct childcare.SUBCHAPTER MMISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSSec.9199.21. Conflicts.9199.22. (Reserved).9199.23. Implementation.§ 9199.21. Conflicts.The cultivation, processing, manufacture, acquisition, transportation, sale, dispensing, distribution, possession and consumption of cannabis permitted under this chapter and Chapter 93 (relating to medical use of cannabis) shall not be deemed to be a violation of the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act. If a provision of The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act relating to cannabis conflicts with a provision of this chapter, this chapter shall take precedence.§ 9199.22. (Reserved).§ 9199.23. Implementation.The issuance of permits and other authorizations specified under this chapter, including the commencement of adult-use cannabis sales, shall begin no later than 90 days after the 20250HB0020PN2119 - 132 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 effective date of this section.CHAPTER 93MEDICAL USE OF CANNABISSubchapterA. Preliminary ProvisionsB. ProgramC. PractitionersD. PatientsE. Medical Cannabis Business EstablishmentsF. Medical Cannabis ControlsG. DispensariesH. Offenses Related to Medical CannabisI. Academic Clinical Research Centers and Clinical RegistrantsJ. Miscellaneous ProvisionsSUBCHAPTER APRELIMINARY PROVISIONSSec.9301. Scope of chapter.9302. Declaration of policy.9303. Definitions.§ 9301. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to the regulation and use of medical cannabis in this Commonwealth.§ 9302. Declaration of policy.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Scientific evidence suggests that medical cannabis is one potential therapy that may mitigate suffering in some patients and also enhance quality of life.(2) The Commonwealth is committed to patient safety. 20250HB0020PN2119 - 133 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Carefully regulating the program which allows access to medical cannabis will enhance patient safety while research into its effectiveness continues.(3) It is the intent of the General Assembly to:(i) Provide a program of access to medical cannabis which balances the need of patients to have access to the latest treatments with the need to promote patient safety.(ii) Provide a safe and effective method of delivery of medical cannabis to patients.(iii) Promote high quality research into the effectiveness and utility of medical cannabis.(4) It is the further intention of the General Assembly that any Commonwealth-based program to provide access to medical cannabis serve as a temporary measure, pending Federal approval of and access to medical cannabis through traditional medical and pharmaceutical avenues.§ 9303. Definitions.For purposes of this chapter, the terms used in this chapter shall have the meanings ascribed to them in Chapter 91 (relating to adult use of cannabis). In addition, the following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Caregiver." The term includes the following entities designated to deliver medical cannabis:(1) An individual designated by a patient.(2) If the patient is under 18 years of age, an individual under section 9337(2) (relating to minors).(3) Individuals designated in writing, for purposes of 20250HB0020PN2119 - 134 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 section 9332 (relating to caregivers), by an organization that provides hospice, palliative or home health care services and:(i) Are employed by an organization that is licensed under the act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act.(ii) Have significant responsibility for managing the healthcare and well-being of a patient.(iii) Were designated by the organization to provide care to a patient who has provided authorization for the designation.(4) Individuals designated in writing, for purposes of section 9332, by a residential facility, including a long-term care nursing facility, skilled nursing facility, assisted living facility, personal care home, independent long-term care facility or intermediate care facility for individuals with intellectual disabilities that:(i) Are licensed by the authority or the Department of Human Services.(ii) Have significant responsibility for managing the health care and well-being of the patient.(iii) Were designated by the residential facility to provide care to a patient who has provided authorization for the designation."Certified medical use." The acquisition, possession, use or transportation of medical cannabis by a patient, or the acquisition, possession, delivery, transportation or administration of medical cannabis by a caregiver, for use as part of the treatment of the patient's serious medical condition, as authorized in a certification under this chapter, 20250HB0020PN2119 - 135 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 including enabling the patient to tolerate treatment for the serious medical condition."Continuing care." Treating a patient, in the course of which the practitioner has completed a full assessment of the patient's medical history and current medical condition, including a consultation with the patient."Family or household member." As defined in 23 Pa.C.S. § 6102 (relating to definitions)."Fund." The Cannabis Regulation Fund."Identification card." A document issued under section 9331 (relating to identification cards) that authorizes access to medical cannabis under this chapter."Individual dose." A single measure of medical cannabis."Medical cannabis." Cannabis for certified medical use as specified in this chapter."Medical cannabis product." The final form and dosage of medical cannabis that is grown, processed, produced, sealed, labeled and tested by a grower/processor and sold to a dispensary."Medical cannabis unit." An amount of medical cannabis equivalent to 3.5 grams of dry leaf, 1 gram of concentrate or 100 milligrams of THC infused into a pill, capsule, oil, liquid, tincture or topical form."Patient." An individual who:(1) has a serious medical condition;(2) has met the requirements for certification under this chapter; and(3) is a resident of this Commonwealth."Practitioner." A physician who is registered with the authority under section 9321 (relating to practitioner 20250HB0020PN2119 - 136 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 registration)."Prescription drug monitoring program." The Achieving Better Care by Monitoring All Prescriptions Program."Registry." The registry established by the authority for practitioners."Research initiative." A nonpatient investigation not subject to Institutional Review Board or Research Approval Committee approval requirements of a patient-based research program, project or study, conducted by an academic clinical research center and its contracted clinical registrant."Secretary." The Secretary of Health of the Commonwealth."Serious medical condition." Any of the following:(1) Cancer, including remission therapy.(2) Positive status for human immunodeficiency virus or acquired immune deficiency syndrome.(3) Amyotrophic lateral sclerosis.(4) Parkinson's disease.(5) Multiple sclerosis.(6) Damage to the nervous tissue of the central nervous system (brain-spinal cord) with objective neurological indication of intractable spasticity and other associated neuropathies.(7) Epilepsy.(8) Inflammatory bowel disease.(9) Neuropathies.(10) Huntington's disease.(11) Crohn's disease.(12) Posttraumatic stress disorder.(13) Intractable seizures.(14) Glaucoma.20250HB0020PN2119 - 137 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (15) Sickle cell anemia.(16) Severe chronic or intractable pain of neuropathic origin or severe chronic or intractable pain.(17) Autism.(18) Anxiety disorders.(19) Chronic Hepatitis C.(20) Dyskinetic and spastic movement disorder.(21) Neurodegenerative diseases.(22) Opioid use disorder for which conventional therapeutic interventions are contraindicated or infective, or for which adjunctive therapy is indicated in combination with primary therapeutic interventions.(23) Terminal illness.(24) Tourette syndrome.(25) Other conditions determined and certified by a practitioner for which a patent may benefit from a certified medical use of cannabis."Synchronous interaction." A two-way or multiple-way exchange of information between a patient and a health care provider that occurs in real time via audio or video conferencing."Terminally ill." A medical prognosis of life expectancy of approximately one year or less if the illness runs its normal course.SUBCHAPTER BPROGRAMSec.9311. Program established.9312. Confidentiality and public disclosure.9313. Lawful use of medical cannabis.20250HB0020PN2119 - 138 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 9314. (Reserved).§ 9311. Program established.(a) Establishment.--A medical cannabis program for patients suffering from serious medical conditions is established. The program shall be implemented and administered by the authority which shall implement standards and operational requirements identical to those set forth in Chapter 91 (relating to adult use of cannabis), except where expressly required to protect the rights of patients. The authority shall have all the powers and duties authorized by Chapter 91, in addition to the following:(1) Register practitioners and ensure their compliance with this chapter.(2) Maintain a directory of patients and caregivers approved to use or assist in the administration of medical cannabis within the authority's database.(3) (Reserved).(4) Establish a program to authorize the use of medical cannabis to conduct medical research relating to the use of medical cannabis to treat serious medical conditions, including the collection of data and the provision of research grants.(5) Establish and maintain public outreach programs about the medical cannabis program, including:(i) A dedicated telephone number for patients, caregivers and members of the public to obtain basic information about the dispensing of medical cannabis under this chapter.(ii) A publicly accessible Internet website with similar information.(b) Regulations.--The authority shall promulgate all 20250HB0020PN2119 - 139 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter. No medical cannabis regulation shall differ from any regulation promulgated by the authority addressing the comparable issue regarding the operation of a permittee under Chapter 91 (relating to adult use of cannabis), except where expressly required to protect the rights of patients. The authority shall align all medical cannabis regulations promulgated under this chapter with the regulations promulgated under Chapter 91, eliminating differences between the regulations and avoiding any duplication required by medical cannabis permittees who hold dual-use permits under Chapter 91, except where differences are required to protect the rights of patients. To the extent any medical cannabis regulation conflicts with any regulation related to adult-use cannabis under Chapter 91, the adult-use cannabis regulation shall supersede the medical cannabis regulation, except as required to protect the rights of patients.§ 9312. Confidentiality and public disclosure.(a) Patient information.--The authority shall maintain a confidential list of patients and caregivers to whom it has issued identification cards. All information obtained by the authority relating to patients, caregivers and other applicants shall be confidential and not subject to public disclosure, including disclosure under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law, including:(1) Individual identifying information about patients and caregivers.(2) Certifications issued by practitioners.(3) Information on identification cards.(4) Information provided by the Pennsylvania State 20250HB0020PN2119 - 140 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Police under section 9332(b) (relating to caregivers).(5) Information relating to the patient's serious medical condition.(b) Public information.--The following records are public records and shall be subject to the Right-to-Know Law:(1) Applications for permits submitted by medical cannabis business establishments.(2) The names, business addresses and medical credentials of practitioners authorized to provide certifications to patients to enable them to obtain and use medical cannabis in this Commonwealth. All other practitioner registration information shall be confidential and exempt from public disclosure under the Right-to-Know Law.(3) Information relating to penalties or other disciplinary actions taken against a medical cannabis business establishment or practitioner by the authority for violation of this chapter.§ 9313. Lawful use of medical cannabis.(a) General rule.--Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, use or possession of medical cannabis as set forth in this chapter is lawful within this Commonwealth.(b) Requirements.--The lawful use of medical cannabis is subject to the following:(1) Medical cannabis may only be dispensed to:(i) a patient who receives a certification from a practitioner and is in possession of a valid identification card issued by the authority; and(ii) a caregiver who is in possession of a valid identification card issued by the authority.(2) Subject to regulations promulgated under this 20250HB0020PN2119 - 141 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 chapter, medical cannabis may only be dispensed to a patient or caregiver in the following forms and dosages approved by the board:(i) Cannabis-infused nonedible products.(ii) Cannabis-infused edible products no greater than 1,200 milligrams per package.(iii) Dry leaf and plant material to be administered by combustion, smoking, vaporization or nebulization.(iv) Cannabis concentrates:(A) Vaporizers not exceeding 2 grams per package.(B) Other cannabis concentrates intended for vaporization not exceeding 3 grams per package.(3) (Reserved).(4) A patient may designate up to two caregivers at any one time.(5) Medical cannabis that has not been used by the patient shall be kept in the original package in which it was dispensed.(6) A patient or caregiver shall possess an identification card whenever the patient or caregiver is in possession of medical cannabis. This does not apply to adult-use cannabis purchased by a patient or caregiver, which shall be treated separate from their medical cannabis allotment.(7) Products packaged by a grower/processor or sold by a dispensary shall only be identified by the name of the grower/processor, the name of the dispensary, the brand name, if applicable, the form and species of medical cannabis, the percentage of tetrahydrocannabinol and cannabinol contained in the product and any other labeling required by the 20250HB0020PN2119 - 142 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 authority.(c) Limitations on cultivating cannabis.--Cultivating cannabis for personal use by a patient shall be subject to the following limitations:(1) A resident of this Commonwealth 21 years of age or older who is a patient may cultivate cannabis plants, with a limit of five plants that are more than five inches tall, without an adult-use cultivation center or microcultivation center permit. The plant limitation specified under this paragraph shall be cumulative for households in which more than one patient resides. As used in this paragraph, the term "resident" means an individual who has been domiciled in this Commonwealth for a period of 30 days prior to cultivation.(2) Cannabis cultivation by a patient shall take place in an enclosed, locked space.(3) A patient 21 years of age or older shall purchase cannabis seeds and immature cannabis plants from a dispensary for the purpose of home cultivation. Seeds and immature cannabis plants may not be given or resold to any other individual regardless of age.(4) Cannabis plants shall not be stored or placed in a location where they are subject to ordinary public view. A patient who cultivates cannabis shall take reasonable precautions to ensure that the plants are secure from unauthorized access, including unauthorized access by an individual who is under 21 years of age.(5) Cannabis cultivation for personal use by a patient may occur only on residential property lawfully in possession of the patient cultivating cannabis for personal use or with the consent of the person in lawful possession of the 20250HB0020PN2119 - 143 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 property. An owner or lessor of residential property may prohibit the cultivation of cannabis by a lessee.(6) Cannabis plants may only be tended by a patient who resides at the residence or caregiver authorized by a patient attending to the residence for brief periods.(7) A patient who cultivates more than the allowable number of cannabis plants, or who sells or gives away cannabis plants, cannabis or cannabis-infused edible or nonedible products, shall be liable for penalties as provided by State law in addition to loss of home cultivation privileges as established by regulation by the board.(8) Cannabis cultivated by a patient and cannabis produced by cannabis plants grown, if the amount of cannabis produced is in excess of 30 grams of raw cannabis, shall remain secured within the residence or residential property in which the cannabis is grown.§ 9314. (Reserved).SUBCHAPTER CPRACTITIONERSSec.9321. Practitioner registration.9322. Practitioner restrictions.9323. Issuance of certification.9324. Certification form.9325. Duration.§ 9321. Practitioner registration.(a) Eligibility.--A physician included in the registry is authorized to issue certifications to patients to use medical cannabis. To be eligible for inclusion in the registry:(1) A physician must apply for registration in the form 20250HB0020PN2119 - 144 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and manner required by the authority.(2) The authority must determine that the physician is, by training or experience, qualified to treat a serious medical condition. The physician shall provide documentation of credentials, training or experience as required by the authority.(3) The physician must have successfully completed the course under section 9311(a)(7) (relating to program established).(b) Authority action.--(1) The authority shall review an application submitted by a physician to determine whether to include the physician in the registry. The review shall include information maintained by the Department of State regarding whether the physician has a valid, unexpired, unrevoked, unsuspended Pennsylvania license to practice medicine and whether the physician has been subject to discipline.(2) The inclusion of a physician in the registry shall be subject to annual review to determine if the physician's license is no longer valid, has expired or been revoked or the physician has been subject to discipline. If the license is no longer valid, the authority shall remove the physician from the registry until the physician holds a valid, unexpired, unrevoked, unsuspended Pennsylvania license to practice medicine.(3) The Department of State shall report to the authority the expiration, suspension or revocation of a physician's license and any disciplinary actions in a timely fashion.(c) Practitioner requirements.--A practitioner included in 20250HB0020PN2119 - 145 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the registry shall have an ongoing responsibility to immediately notify the authority in writing if the practitioner knows or has reason to know that any of the following is true with respect to a patient for whom the practitioner has issued a certification:(1) The patient no longer has the serious medical condition for which the certification was issued.(2) Medical cannabis would no longer be therapeutic or palliative.(3) The patient has died.§ 9322. Practitioner restrictions.(a) Practices prohibited.--The following apply with respect to practitioners:(1) A practitioner may not accept, solicit or offer any form of remuneration from or to a prospective patient, patient, prospective caregiver, caregiver or medical cannabis business establishment, including an employee, financial backer or principal, to certify a patient, other than accepting a fee for service with respect to the examination of the prospective patient to determine if the prospective patient should be issued a certification to use medical cannabis.(2) A practitioner may not hold a direct or economic interest in a medical cannabis business establishment.(3) A practitioner may not advertise the practitioner's services as a practitioner who can certify a patient to receive medical cannabis.(b) Unprofessional conduct.--A practitioner who violates subsection (a) shall not be permitted to issue certifications to patients. The practitioner shall be removed from the registry.(c) Discipline.--In addition to any other penalty that may 20250HB0020PN2119 - 146 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 be imposed under this chapter, a violation of subsection (a) or section 9323(f) (relating to issuance of certification) shall be deemed unprofessional conduct under section 41(8) of the act of December 20, 1985 (P.L.457, No.112), known as the Medical Practice Act of 1985, or section 15(a)(8) of the act of October 5, 1978 (P.L.1109, No.261), known as the Osteopathic Medical Practice Act, and shall subject the practitioner to discipline by the State Board of Medicine or the State Board of Osteopathic Medicine, as appropriate.§ 9323. Issuance of certification.(a) Conditions for issuance.--A certification to use medical cannabis may be issued by a practitioner to a patient if all of the following requirements are met:(1) The practitioner has been approved by the authority for inclusion in the registry and has a valid, unexpired, unrevoked, unsuspended Pennsylvania license to practice medicine at the time of the issuance of the certification.(2) The practitioner has determined that the patient has a serious medical condition and has included the condition in the patient's health care record.(3) The patient is under the practitioner's continuing care for the serious medical condition.(4) In the practitioner's professional opinion and review of past treatments, the practitioner determines the patient is likely to receive therapeutic or palliative benefit from the use of medical cannabis.(b) Contents.--The certification shall include:(1) The patient's name, date of birth and address.(2) The specific serious medical condition of the patient.20250HB0020PN2119 - 147 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) A statement by the practitioner that the patient has a serious medical condition and the patient is under the practitioner's continuing care for the serious medical condition.(4) The date of issuance.(5) The name, address, telephone number and signature of the practitioner.(6) Any requirement or limitation concerning the appropriate form of medical cannabis and limitation on the duration of use, if applicable, including whether the patient is terminally ill.(c) Consultation.--A practitioner shall review the prescription drug monitoring program prior to:(1) Issuing a certification to determine the controlled substance history of a patient.(2) Recommending a change of amount or form of medical cannabis.(d) Other access by practitioner.--A practitioner may access the prescription drug monitoring program to do any of the following:(1) Determine whether a patient may be under treatment with a controlled substance by another physician or other person.(2) Allow the practitioner to review the patient's controlled substance history as deemed necessary by the practitioner.(3) Provide to the patient, or caregiver on behalf of the patient if authorized by the patient, a copy of the patient's controlled substance history.(e) Duties of practitioner.--The practitioner shall:20250HB0020PN2119 - 148 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Provide the certification to the patient.(2) Provide a copy of the certification to the authority, which shall place the information in the patient directory within the authority's electronic database. The authority shall permit electronic submission of the certification.(3) File a copy of the certification in the patient's health care record.(f) Prohibition.--A practitioner may not issue a certification for the practitioner's own use or for the use of a family or household member.§ 9324. Certification form.The authority shall develop a standard certification form, which shall be available to practitioners upon request. The form shall be available electronically. The form shall include a statement that a false statement made by a practitioner is punishable under the applicable provisions of 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 49 (relating to falsification and intimidation).§ 9325. Duration.Receipt of medical cannabis by a patient or caregiver from a dispensary may not exceed a 90-day supply, 192 medical cannabis units, of individual doses. During the last seven days of any 30-day period during the term of the identification card, a patient may obtain and possess a 90-day supply for the subsequent 30-day period. Additional 90-day supplies may be provided in accordance with this section for the duration of the authorized period of the identification card unless a shorter period is indicated on the certification. This provision does not apply to purchases made under Chapter 91 (relating to adult use of cannabis).20250HB0020PN2119 - 149 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SUBCHAPTER DPATIENTSSec.9331. Identification cards.9332. Caregivers.9333. Notice.9334. Verification.9335. Special conditions.9336. (Reserved).9337. Minors.9338. Caregiver authorization and limitations.9339. Contents of identification card.9339.1. Suspension.9339.2. Prohibitions.§ 9331. Identification cards.(a) Issuance.--The authority may issue an identification card to a patient who has a certification approved by the authority and to a caregiver designated by the patient. An identification card issued to a patient shall authorize the patient to obtain and use medical cannabis as authorized by this chapter. An identification card issued to a caregiver shall authorize the caregiver to obtain medical cannabis on behalf of the patient.(b) Procedure for issuance.--The authority shall develop and implement procedures for:(1) Review and approval of applications for identification cards.(2) Issuance of identification cards to patients and caregivers.(3) Review of the certification submitted by the 20250HB0020PN2119 - 150 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 practitioner and the patient.(c) Application.--A patient or a caregiver may apply, in a form and manner prescribed by the authority, for issuance or renewal of an identification card. A caregiver must submit a separate application for issuance or renewal. Each application must include:(1) The name, address and date of birth of the patient.(2) The name, address and date of birth of a caregiver.(3) The certification issued by the practitioner.(4) The name, address and telephone number of the practitioner and documentation from the practitioner that all of the requirements of section 9323(a) (relating to issuance of certification) have been met.(5) A $50 processing fee. The authority may waive or reduce the fee if the applicant demonstrates financial hardship.(6) The signature of the applicant and date signed.(7) Other information required by the authority.(d) Forms.--Application and renewal forms shall be available on the authority's publicly accessible Internet website.(e) Expiration.--An identification card of a patient or caregiver shall expire within one year from the date of issuance, upon the death of the patient or as otherwise provided in this section.(f) Separate cards to be issued.--The authority shall issue separate identification cards for patients and caregivers as soon as reasonably practicable after receiving completed applications, unless it determines that an application is incomplete or factually inaccurate, in which case it shall promptly notify the applicant.20250HB0020PN2119 - 151 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (g) (Reserved).(h) Change in name or address.--A patient or caregiver who has been issued an identification card shall notify the authority within 10 days of any change of name or address. In addition, the patient shall notify the authority within 10 days if the patient no longer has the serious medical condition noted on the certification.(i) Lost or defaced card.--In the event of a lost, stolen, destroyed or illegible identification card, the patient or caregiver shall apply to the authority within 10 business days of discovery of the loss or defacement of the card for a replacement card. The application for a replacement card shall be on a form furnished by the authority and accompanied by a $25 fee. The authority may establish higher fees for issuance of second and subsequent replacement identification cards. The authority may waive or reduce the fee in cases of demonstrated financial hardship. The authority shall issue a replacement identification card as soon as practicable. A patient or caregiver may not obtain medical cannabis until the authority issues the replacement card.§ 9332. Caregivers.(a) Requirements.--(1) If the patient designates a caregiver, the application shall include the name, address and date of birth of the caregiver, other individual identifying information required by the authority and the following:(i) Federal and Commonwealth criminal history record information as set forth in subsection (b).(ii) If the caregiver has an identification card for the caregiver or another patient, the expiration date of 20250HB0020PN2119 - 152 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the identification card.(iii) Other information required by the authority.(2) The application shall be accompanied by a fee of $50. The authority may waive or reduce the fee in cases of demonstrated financial hardship.(3) The authority may require additional information for the application.(4) The application shall be signed and dated by the applicant.(b) Criminal history.--A caregiver who has not been previously approved by the authority under this section shall submit fingerprints for the purpose of obtaining criminal history record checks, and the Pennsylvania State Police or its authorized agent shall submit the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for the purpose of verifying the identity of the applicant and obtaining a current record of any criminal arrests and convictions. The following shall apply:(1) Any criminal history record information relating to a caregiver obtained under this section by the authority may be interpreted and used by the authority only to determine the applicant's character, fitness and suitability to serve as a caregiver under this chapter.(2) The criminal history record information provided under this subsection may not be subject to the limitations under 18 Pa.C.S. § 9121(b)(2) (relating to general regulations).(3) The authority shall also review the prescription drug monitoring program relating to the caregiver.(4) The authority shall deny the application of a caregiver who has been convicted of a criminal offense that 20250HB0020PN2119 - 153 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 occurred within the past five years relating to the sale or possession of drugs, narcotics or controlled substances.(5) The authority may deny an application if the applicant has a history of drug use or of diverting controlled substances or illegal drugs.§ 9333. Notice.An application for an identification card shall include notice that a false statement made in the application is punishable under the applicable provisions of 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 49 (relating to falsification and intimidation).§ 9334. Verification.The authority shall verify the information in a patient or caregiver's application and on any renewal form.§ 9335. Special conditions.The following apply:(1) If the practitioner states in the certification that, in the practitioner's professional opinion, the patient would benefit from medical cannabis only until a specified earlier date, then the identification card shall expire on that date.(2) If the certification so provides, the identification card shall state any requirement or limitation by the practitioner as to the form of medical cannabis for the patient.§ 9336. (Reserved).§ 9337. Minors.If a patient is under 18 years of age, the following shall apply:(1) The patient shall have a caregiver.(2) A caregiver must be one of the following:20250HB0020PN2119 - 154 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) A parent or legal guardian of the patient.(ii) An individual designated by a parent or legal guardian.(iii) An appropriate individual approved by the authority upon a sufficient showing that no parent or legal guardian is appropriate or available.§ 9338. Caregiver authorization and limitations.(a) Age.--An individual who is under 21 years of age may not be a caregiver unless a sufficient showing, as determined by the authority, is made to the authority that the individual should be permitted to serve as a caregiver.(b) Changing caregiver.--If a patient wishes to change or terminate the designation of the patient's caregiver, for whatever reason, the patient shall notify the department as soon as practicable. The department shall issue a notification to the caregiver that the caregiver's identification card is invalid and must be promptly returned to the authority.(c) Denial in part.--If an application of a patient designates an individual as a caregiver who is not authorized to be a caregiver, that portion of the application shall be denied by the authority. The authority shall review the balance of the application and may approve that portion of it.§ 9339. Contents of identification card.An identification card shall contain the following:(1) The name of the caregiver or the patient, as appropriate. The identification card shall also state whether the individual is designated as a patient or as a caregiver.(2) The date of issuance and expiration date.(3) An identification number for the patient or caregiver, as appropriate.20250HB0020PN2119 - 155 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) A photograph of the individual to whom the identification card is being issued, whether the individual is a patient or a caregiver. The method of obtaining the photograph shall be specified by the authority by regulation. The authority shall provide reasonable accommodation for a patient who is confined to the patient's home or is in inpatient care.(5) Any requirement or limitation set by the practitioner as to the form of medical cannabis.(6) Any other requirements determined by the authority, except the authority may not require that an identification card disclose the patient's serious medical condition.§ 9339.1. Suspension.If a patient or caregiver intentionally, knowingly or recklessly violates any provision of this chapter as determined by the authority, the identification card of the patient or caregiver may be suspended or revoked. The suspension or revocation shall be in addition to any criminal or other penalty that may apply.§ 9339.2. Prohibitions.The following prohibitions shall apply:(1) A patient may not operate or be in physical control of a motor vehicle if proven to be impaired by medical cannabis. The following shall apply:(i) A medical cannabis patient convicted of operating a vehicle while impaired to a degree that the individual is unable to safely drive, operate or be in actual physical control of the motor vehicle shall be penalized under 75 Pa.C.S. § 3804(c) (relating to penalties).20250HB0020PN2119 - 156 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) Possession of a medical cannabis patient identification card shall not, in and of itself, be sufficient to establish probable cause to charge the individual with a violation of this chapter.(iii) Possession of a medical cannabis patient identification card shall not, in and of itself, establish reasonable grounds to request a chemical test under 75 Pa.C.S. § 1547 (relating to chemical testing to determine amount of alcohol or controlled substance).(iv) Nothing in this section shall be construed to supersede Federal regulation of the licensing and operation of commercial vehicles and school vehicles.(2) A patient may not perform any employment duties at heights or in confined spaces, including mining, while under the influence of medical cannabis.(3) A patient may be prohibited by an employer from performing any task which the employer deems life-threatening, to either the employee or any of the employees of the employer, while under the influence of medical cannabis. The prohibition shall not be deemed an adverse employment decision even if the prohibition results in financial harm for the patient.(4) A patient may be prohibited by an employer from performing any duty which could result in a public health or safety risk while under the influence of medical cannabis. The prohibition shall not be deemed an adverse employment decision even if the prohibition results in financial harm for the patient.SUBCHAPTER EMEDICAL CANNABIS BUSINESS ESTABLISHMENTS20250HB0020PN2119 - 157 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Sec.9341. Medical cannabis business establishments.9342. Permit required.9343. Applications.9344. Issuance of permits.9345. Diversity goals.9346. Limitations on permits.§ 9341. Medical cannabis business establishments.The following entities shall be authorized to receive a permit to operate as a medical cannabis business establishment to grow, process or dispense medical cannabis:(1) Grower/processors.(2) Dispensaries.§ 9342. Permit required.A person may not operate a medical cannabis business establishment for the purpose of cultivating, processing, dispensing or transporting medical cannabis or medical cannabis-infused edible or nonedible products without a permit issued under this chapter. A person may not be an officer, director, manager or agent of a medical cannabis business establishment without having been authorized by the authority.§ 9343. Applications.(a) Notice.--Upon a determination by the authority that additional medical cannabis business establishments are necessary to meet the need of patients within the Commonwealth the authority shall transmit notice of a request for applications, including the number of permits to be awarded and the time period in which applications will be accepted by the authority, to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.20250HB0020PN2119 - 158 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Application.--An application for a grower/processor or dispensary permit to grow, process or dispense medical cannabis shall be in a form and manner prescribed by the authority.(c) Additional information.--If the authority is not satisfied that the applicant should be issued a permit, the authority shall notify the applicant in writing of the factors for which further documentation is required. Within 30 days of the receipt of the notification, the applicant may submit additional material to the authority.§ 9344. Issuance of permits.(a) Manner.--The issuance of permits to eligible applicants shall occur in a manner as determined by the authority.(b) Required information.--A permit issued by the authority to a medical cannabis business establishment that will operate a medical only facility and not one that is permitted as a dual-use facility under Chapter 91 (relating to adult use of cannabis), shall be effective only for that permittee and shall specify the following:(1) The name and address of the medical cannabis business establishment.(2) The activities of the medical cannabis business establishment permitted under this chapter.(3) The land, buildings, facilities or location to be used by the medical cannabis business establishment.(4) Any other information required by the authority.§ 9345. Diversity goals.(a) Goals.--It is the intent and goal of the General Assembly that the authority promote diversity and the participation by diverse groups in the activities authorized under this chapter. In order to further this goal, the authority 20250HB0020PN2119 - 159 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall adopt and implement policies ensuring the following:(1) That diverse groups are accorded equal opportunity in the permitting process.(2) That permittees promote the participation of diverse groups in their operations by affording equal access to employment opportunities.(b) Duties of authority.--To facilitate participation by diverse groups in the activities authorized under this chapter, the authority shall:(1) Conduct necessary and appropriate outreach including, if necessary, consulting with other Commonwealth agencies to identify diverse groups who may qualify for participation in activities under this chapter.(2) Provide sufficient and continuous notice of the participation opportunities afforded under this chapter by publishing notice on the authority's publicly accessible Internet website.(3) Include in the applications for permit under this chapter language to encourage applicants to utilize and give consideration to diverse groups for contracting or professional services opportunities.(4) Publish no later than December 5 of each year a list of the surrendered or revoked licenses under this chapter on the authority's publicly accessible Internet website.(5) Accept applications for the licenses on the list under paragraph (4) no later than January 15 of each year, submitted by an applicant that is any of the following:(i) A disadvantaged business.(ii) A diverse group.(iii) A small business.20250HB0020PN2119 - 160 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Reports.--No later than March 1, 2027, and each March 1 thereafter, the authority shall submit a report to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Health and Human Services Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Health Committee of the House of Representatives summarizing the participation and utilization of diverse groups in the activities authorized under this chapter. The report shall include:(1) The participation level, by percentage, of diverse groups in the activities authorized under this chapter.(2) A summary of how diverse groups are utilized by permittees, including in the provision of goods or services.(3) Any other information the authority deems appropriate.(d) Definitions.--The following words and phrases when used in this section shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Disadvantaged business." As defined in 74 Pa.C.S. § 303(b) (relating to diverse business participation)."Diverse group." A disadvantaged business, minority-owned business, women-owned business, service-disabled veteran-owned small business or veteran-owned small business that has been certified by a third-party certifying organization."Service-disabled veteran-owned small business." As defined in 51 Pa.C.S. § 9601 (relating to definitions)."Small business." An independently owned and operated for-profit business that employs 25 or fewer employees and not a subsidiary or affiliate of a corporation."Third-party certifying organization." As defined in 74 Pa.C.S. § 303(b).20250HB0020PN2119 - 161 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 9346. Limitations on permits.The following limitations apply to approval of permits for grower/processors and dispensaries:(1) The authority may not initially issue permits to more than 25 growers/processors.(2) The authority may not initially issue permits to more than 50 dispensaries. Each dispensary may provide medical cannabis at no more than three separate locations.(3) The authority may not issue more than five individual dispensary permits to one person.(4) The authority may not issue more than one individual grower/processor permit to one person.(5) No more than five grower/processors may be issued permits as dispensaries. If the number of growers/processors is increased as determined by the authority no more than 20% of the total number of growers/processors may also be issued permits as dispensaries.(6) A dispensary may only obtain medical cannabis from a grower/processor holding a valid permit under this chapter.(7) A grower/processor may only provide medical cannabis to a dispensary holding a valid permit under this chapter.SUBCHAPTER FMEDICAL CANNABIS CONTROLSSec.9351. Electronic tracking.9352. Laboratory.§ 9351. Electronic tracking.(a) Requirement.--A grower/processor or dispensary must implement the designated seed-to-sale tracking system as selected by the authority and an independent point-of-sale 20250HB0020PN2119 - 162 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 system. These systems shall comply with requirements contained within Chapter 91 (relating to adult use of cannabis).(b) Access.--Information maintained in electronic tracking systems under subsection (a) shall be confidential and not subject to the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.§ 9352. Laboratory.The authority shall promulgate regulations regarding laboratory practices and compliance testing, which shall include standards and operational requirements identical to those set forth in Chapter 91 (relating to adult use of cannabis).SUBCHAPTER GDISPENSARIESSec.9361. Dispensing to patients and caregivers.§ 9361. Dispensing to patients and caregivers.(a) General rule.--A medical cannabis business establishment authorized to dispense to patients and caregivers may lawfully dispense medical cannabis to a patient or caregiver upon presentation to the dispensary of a valid identification card for that patient or caregiver. The dispensary shall provide to the patient or caregiver a receipt, which shall include information as determined by the authority.(b) Filing with authority.--Prior to dispensing medical cannabis to a patient or caregiver, the dispensary shall file the receipt information with the authority utilizing the electronic tracking system. When filing receipts under this subsection, the dispensary shall dispose of any electronically recorded certification information as provided by regulation.(c) Limitations.--No dispensary may dispense to a patient or 20250HB0020PN2119 - 163 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 caregiver:(1) a quantity of medical cannabis greater than that which the patient or caregiver is permitted to possess under the certification; or(2) a form of medical cannabis prohibited by this chapter.(d) Supply.--When dispensing medical cannabis to a patient or caregiver, the dispensary may not dispense an amount greater than a 90-day supply, 192 medical cannabis units, until the patient has exhausted all but a seven-day supply provided under a previously issued certification until additional certification is presented under section 9325 (relating to duration).(e) Verification.--Prior to dispensing medical cannabis to a patient or caregiver, the dispensary shall verify the information in subsections (d) and (f) by consulting the electronic tracking system included in the authority's electronic database established under section 9311(a)(4)(v) (relating to program established) and the dispensary tracking system under section 9351(a)(2) (relating to electronic tracking).(f) Form of medical cannabis.--Medical cannabis dispensed to a patient or caregiver by a dispensary shall conform to any requirement or limitation set by the practitioner as to the form of medical cannabis for the patient.SUBCHAPTER HOFFENSES RELATED TO MEDICAL CANNABISSec.9391.1. Criminal diversion of medical cannabis by practitioners.9391.2. Criminal diversion of medical cannabis.9391.3. Criminal retention of medical cannabis.20250HB0020PN2119 - 164 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 9391.4. Criminal diversion of medical cannabis by patient or caregiver.9391.5. Falsification of identification cards.9391.6. Adulteration of medical cannabis.9391.7. Disclosure of information prohibited.9391.8. Additional penalties.9391.9. Other restrictions.§ 9391.1. Criminal diversion of medical cannabis by practitioners.In addition to any other penalty provided by law, a practitioner commits a misdemeanor of the first degree if the practitioner intentionally, knowingly or recklessly certifies a person as being able to lawfully receive medical cannabis or otherwise provides medical cannabis to a person who is not lawfully permitted to receive medical cannabis.§ 9391.2. Criminal diversion of medical cannabis.In addition to any other penalty provided by law, an employee, financial backer, operator or principal of any of the following commits a misdemeanor of the first degree if the person intentionally, knowingly or recklessly sells, dispenses, trades, delivers or otherwise provides medical cannabis to a person who is not lawfully permitted to receive medical cannabis:(1) A medical cannabis business establishment.(2) A clinical registrant or academic clinical research center under Subchapter I (relating to academic clinical research centers and clinical registrants).(3) A laboratory utilized to test medical cannabis under section 9352 (relating to laboratory).§ 9391.3. Criminal retention of medical cannabis.20250HB0020PN2119 - 165 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 In addition to any other penalty provided by law, a patient or caregiver commits a misdemeanor of the third degree if the patient or caregiver intentionally, knowingly or recklessly possesses, stores or maintains an amount of medical cannabis in excess of the amount legally permitted.§ 9391.4. Criminal diversion of medical cannabis by patient or caregiver.(a) Offense defined.--In addition to any other penalty provided by law, a patient or caregiver commits an offense if the patient or caregiver intentionally, knowingly or recklessly provides medical cannabis to a person who is not lawfully permitted to receive medical cannabis.(b) Grading.--A first offense under this section constitutes a misdemeanor of the second degree. A second or subsequent offense constitutes a misdemeanor of the first degree.§ 9391.5. Falsification of identification cards.(a) Offense defined.--In addition to any other penalty provided by law, a person commits an offense if, knowing he is not privileged to hold an identification card, the person does any of the following:(1) Possesses an identification card and either attempts to use the card to obtain medical cannabis or obtains medical cannabis.(2) Possesses an identification card which falsely identifies the person as being lawfully entitled to receive medical cannabis and either attempts to use the card to obtain medical cannabis or obtains medical cannabis.(3) Possesses an identification card which contains any false information on the card and the person either attempts to use the card to obtain medical cannabis or obtains medical 20250HB0020PN2119 - 166 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 cannabis.(b) Grading.--A first offense under this section constitutes a misdemeanor of the second degree. A second or subsequent offense under this section constitutes a misdemeanor of the first degree.§ 9391.6. Adulteration of medical cannabis.(a) General rule.--In addition to any other penalty provided by law, a person commits an offense if the person adulterates, fortifies, contaminates or changes the character or purity of medical cannabis from that set forth on the patient's or caregiver's identification card.(b) Grading.--A first offense under this section constitutes a misdemeanor of the second degree. A second or subsequent offense under this section constitutes a misdemeanor of the first degree.§ 9391.7. Disclosure of information prohibited.(a) Offense defined.--In addition to any other penalty provided by law, an employee, financial backer, operator or principal of any of the following commits a misdemeanor of the third degree if the person discloses, except to authorized persons for official governmental or health care purposes, any information related to the use of medical cannabis:(1) A medical cannabis business establishment.(2) A clinical registrant or academic clinical research center under Subchapter I (relating to academic clinical research centers and clinical registrants).(3) An employee or contractor of the authority.(b) Exception.--Subsection (a) shall not apply where disclosure is permitted or required by law or by court order. The authority, including an authorized employee, requesting or 20250HB0020PN2119 - 167 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 obtaining information under this chapter shall not be subject to any criminal liability. The immunity provided by this subsection shall not apply to any employee of the authority who knowingly and willfully discloses prohibited information under this chapter.§ 9391.8. Additional penalties.(a) Criminal penalties.--In addition to any other penalty provided by law, a practitioner, caregiver, patient, employee, financial backer, operator or principal of any medical cannabis business establishment, and an employee, financial backer, operator or principal of a clinical registrant or academic clinical research center under Subchapter I (relating to academic clinical research centers and clinical registrants), who violates any of the provisions of this chapter, other than those specified in section 9391.1 (relating to criminal diversion of medical cannabis by practitioners), 9391.2 (relating to criminal diversion of medical cannabis), 9391.3 (relating to criminal retention of medical cannabis), 9391.4 (relating to criminal diversion of medical cannabis by patient or caregiver), 9391.5 (relating to falsification of identification cards), 9391.6 (relating to adulteration of medical cannabis) or 9391.7 (relating to disclosure of information prohibited), or any regulation promulgated under this chapter:(1) For a first offense, commits a misdemeanor of the third degree and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of not more than $5,000 or to imprisonment for not more than six months.(2) For a second or subsequent offense, commits a misdemeanor of the third degree and shall, upon conviction, 20250HB0020PN2119 - 168 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 be sentenced to pay a fine of not more than $10,000 or to imprisonment for not less than six months nor more than one year, or both.(b) Civil penalties.--In addition to any other remedy available to the authority, the authority may assess a civil penalty for a violation of this chapter, a regulation promulgated under this chapter or an order issued under this chapter or regulation as provided in this subsection. The following shall apply:(1) The authority may assess a penalty of not more than $10,000 for each violation and an additional penalty of not more than $1,000 for each day of a continuing violation. In determining the amount of each penalty, the authority shall take the following factors into consideration:(i) The gravity of the violation.(ii) The potential harm resulting from the violation to patients, caregivers or the general public.(iii) The willfulness of the violation.(iv) Previous violations, if any, by the person being assessed.(v) The economic benefit to the person being assessed for failing to comply with the requirements of this chapter, a regulation promulgated under this chapter or an order issued under this chapter or regulation.(2) If the authority finds that the violation did not threaten the safety or health of a patient, caregiver or the general public and the violator took immediate action to remedy the violation upon learning of it, the authority may issue a written warning in lieu of assessing a civil penalty.(3) A person who aids, abets, counsels, induces, 20250HB0020PN2119 - 169 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 procures or causes another person to violate this chapter, a regulation promulgated under this chapter or an order issued under this chapter or regulation shall be subject to the civil penalties provided under this subsection.(c) Sanctions.--(1) In addition to the penalties provided in subsection (b) and any other penalty authorized by law, the authority may impose the following sanctions:(i) Revoke or suspend the permit of a person found to be in violation of this chapter, a regulation promulgated under this chapter or an order issued under this chapter or regulation.(ii) Revoke or suspend the permit of a person for conduct or activity or the occurrence of an event that would have disqualified the person from receiving the permit.(iii) Revoke or suspend the registration of a practitioner for a violation of this chapter or a regulation promulgated or an order issued under this chapter or for conduct or activity which would have disqualified the practitioner from receiving a registration.(iv) Suspend a permit or registration of a person pending the outcome of a hearing in a case in which the permit or registration could be revoked.(v) Order restitution of funds or property unlawfully obtained or retained by a permittee or registrant.(vi) Issue a cease and desist order.(2) A person who aids, abets, counsels, induces, 20250HB0020PN2119 - 170 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 procures or causes another person to violate this chapter shall be subject to the sanctions provided under this subsection.(d) Costs of action.--The authority may assess against a person determined to be in violation of this chapter the costs of investigation of the violation.(e) Minor violations.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the assessment of a civil penalty or the imposition of a sanction for a minor violation of this chapter if the authority determines that the public interest will be adequately served under the circumstances by the issuance of a written warning.§ 9391.9. Other restrictions.Nothing in this chapter may be construed to permit any person to engage in or prevent the imposition of any civil, criminal or other penalty for the following:(1) Undertaking any task under the influence of medical cannabis when doing so would constitute negligence, professional malpractice or professional misconduct.(2) Possessing or using medical cannabis in a youth detention center or other facility which houses children adjudicated delinquent, including the separate, secure State-owned facility or unit utilized for sexually violent delinquent children under 42 Pa.C.S. § 6404 (relating to duration of inpatient commitment and review). As used in this paragraph, the term "sexually violent delinquent children" shall have the meaning given to it in 42 Pa.C.S. § 6402 (relating to definitions). Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to apply to employees of the facilities set forth in this paragraph.20250HB0020PN2119 - 171 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SUBCHAPTER IACADEMIC CLINICAL RESEARCH CENTERSAND CLINICAL REGISTRANTSSec.9393.1. Legislative findings and declaration of policy.9393.2. Definitions.9393.3. Academic clinical research centers.9393.4. Clinical registrants.9393.5. Research study.9393.6. Research initiative.§ 9393.1. Legislative findings and declaration of policy.(a) Legislative findings.--It is determined and declared as a matter of legislative finding:(1) Patients suffering from serious medical conditions deserve the benefit of research conducted in conjunction with the Commonwealth's medical schools to determine whether medical cannabis will improve their conditions or symptoms.(2) The Commonwealth has an interest in creating a mechanism whereby this Commonwealth's medical schools and hospitals can help develop research programs and studies in compliance with applicable law.(b) Declaration of policy.--The General Assembly declares as follows:(1) It is the intention of the General Assembly to create a mechanism whereby this Commonwealth's medical schools and hospitals may provide advice to grower/processors and dispensaries in the areas of patient health and safety, medical applications and dispensing and management of controlled substances, among other areas. It is the further intention of the General Assembly to create a mechanism 20250HB0020PN2119 - 172 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 whereby the Commonwealth may encourage research associated with medical cannabis.(2) It is the policy of the Commonwealth to allow, in addition to the 25 grower/processors and 50 dispensaries initially authorized under section 9349.7 (relating to limitations on permits), the operation of additional grower/processors and dispensaries which will be approved by the authority as clinical registrants. A clinical registrant is a grower/processor and a dispensary which has a contractual relationship with a medical school that operates or partners with a hospital to provide advice about medical cannabis so that patient safety may be enhanced.§ 9393.2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Academic clinical research center." An accredited medical school within this Commonwealth that operates or partners with an acute care hospital licensed within this Commonwealth that has been approved and certified by the authority to enter into a contract with a clinical registrant."Clinical registrant." An entity that:(1) is approved by the authority as a clinical registrant;(2) has a contractual relationship with an academic clinical research center under which the academic clinical research center or its affiliate provides advice to the entity, regarding, among other areas, patient health and safety, medical applications and dispensing and management of controlled substances; and20250HB0020PN2119 - 173 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) is approved by the authority to hold a permit as both a grower/processor and a dispensary.§ 9393.3. Academic clinical research centers.(a) General rule.--An academic clinical research center must be approved and certified by the authority before the academic clinical research center may contract with a clinical registrant. An academic clinical research center shall only contract with one clinical registrant. The accredited medical school that is seeking approval and certification from the authority as an academic clinical research center must provide all information required by the authority, including information for the individual who will be the primary contact for the academic clinical research center during the authority's review of the application. The accredited medical school must also provide all information required by the authority for any licensed acute care hospital that the accredited medical school will operate or partner with during the time that it may be approved and certified as an academic clinical research center by the authority.(b) Posting and publication of list.--The authority shall post a list containing the name and address of each certified academic clinical research center on the authority's publicly accessible Internet website and transmit notice to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.§ 9393.4. Clinical registrants.(a) Approval.--The authority may approve up to 10 clinical registrants. Each clinical registrant may provide medical cannabis at not more than six separate locations. The total number of locations authorized to dispense medical cannabis 20250HB0020PN2119 - 174 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under this section shall not exceed 60. The grower/processor and dispensary permits issued to clinical registrants approved under this section shall be in addition to the 25 grower/processor and 50 dispensary permits issued by the authority in accordance with section 9346(1) and (2) (relating to limitations on permits). The limitations relating to number and location in sections 9346(1) and (2) do not apply. A clinical registrant may not hold more than one grower/processor and one dispensary permit. A clinical registrant that obtains a dual use permit under Chapter 91 (relating to adult use of cannabis), shall continue to hold and maintain the permit issued under this chapter. Once the authority approves an entity as a clinical registrant, the entity shall comply with this subchapter. The following shall apply:(1) The authority shall:(i) Open applications for the approval of up to two additional academic clinical research centers and issue approvals to qualified academic clinical research centers by July 16, 2016.(ii) Open applications for the approval of up to two additional clinical registrants by August 15, 2016, and issue permits to qualified clinical registrants within 180 days from the date when applications are posted.(2) If the statutory maximum number of approved academic clinical research centers or approved clinical registrants are not approved under paragraph (1), the authority shall reopen the application process for the approval of academic clinical research centers and clinical registrants.(b) Requirements.--The following shall apply to clinical registrants:20250HB0020PN2119 - 175 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) An entity seeking approval as a clinical registrant shall submit an application to the authority in such form and manner as the authority prescribes. The authority shall ensure that the applicant meets the requirements of this chapter before approving the application to become a clinical registrant.(2) An entity may be issued a permit as a grower/processor or dispensary before seeking approval as a clinical registrant. An entity may also apply for a permit as a grower/processor or a dispensary at the same time the entity seeks approval from the authority as a clinical registrant.(3) An entity seeking approval as a clinical registrant that does not already hold a permit as a grower/processor or a dispensary shall submit the applications required under Subchapter E (relating to medical cannabis business establishments). In reviewing an application, the authority shall ensure that the entity meets all of the requirements for the issuance of a grower/processor permit or a dispensary permit, as applicable.(4) When the authority issues a permit as a grower/processor or a dispensary to an entity seeking approval as a clinical registrant, the issuance shall not be construed to reduce the number of permits for growers/processors and dispensaries authorized under section 9349.7(1) and (2).(i) The authority shall not approve an applicant for a grower/processor permit if the applicant has previously had a contractual relationship with an academic clinical research center whereby the academic clinical research 20250HB0020PN2119 - 176 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 center or its affiliate provided advice to the applicant regarding, among other areas, patient health and safety, medical applications and dispensing and management of controlled substances and the applicant subsequently sold or assigned for profit to another entity their responsibility under the contractual relationship.(ii) (Reserved).(5) Except as provided in section 9347(1)(vi) and (2) (relating to fees and other requirements), an entity seeking approval as a clinical registrant must pay the fees and meet all other requirements under this chapter for obtaining a permit as a grower/processor and a dispensary. Upon approval of the authority, a clinical registrant shall be issued a grower/processor permit and a dispensary permit and shall be a medical cannabis business establishment. As a medical cannabis business establishment, a clinical registrant must comply with all the provisions of this chapter relating to medical cannabis business establishments except as otherwise provided in this subchapter.(6) The clinical registrant must have a minimum of $15,000,000 in capital. The authority shall verify the capital requirement.(7) The clinical registrant shall have all of the same rights as a grower/processor permittee and must comply with all other requirements of this chapter regarding growing, processing and dispensing medical cannabis.(8) A grower/processor facility owned by a clinical registrant may sell its medical cannabis products to all dispensary facilities. The facility may sell seeds, medical cannabis plants and medical cannabis products to, or exchange 20250HB0020PN2119 - 177 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 seeds, medical cannabis plants and medical cannabis products with, any other grower/processor facility holding a permit under Subchapter E or this subchapter.(9) A clinical registrant may petition the authority, on a form prescribed by the authority, for approval to sell certain of the medical cannabis products grown and processed by its grower/processor facility to other medical cannabis business establishments holding dispensary permits under Subchapter E. The petition must be accompanied by a written report of the clinical registrant's research findings with respect to the medical cannabis products which are the subject of the petition. The authority shall approve the petition if it has been demonstrated that the medical cannabis products have a practical effect on patients which changes a recommendation within the medical field as indicated in the report submitted by the clinical registrant.(10) A dispensary owned by a clinical registrant may dispense medical cannabis products to a patient or caregiver who presents a valid identification card to an employee who is authorized to dispense medical cannabis products at a dispensary location operated by the clinical registrant, regardless of whether the patient is a participant in a research study or program.§ 9393.5. Research study.(a) Applicability.--The provisions of this section shall apply upon publication of the notice under section 9399.8 (relating to notice).(b) Procedures.--The authority may, upon application, approve the dispensing of medical cannabis by a clinical registrant to the academic clinical research center for the 20250HB0020PN2119 - 178 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 purpose of conducting a research study. The authority shall develop the application and standards for approval of such dispensing by the clinical registrant. The following apply to the research study:(1) The clinical registrant shall disclose the following information to the authority in its application:(i) The reason for the research project, including the reason for the trial.(ii) The strain and strength of medical cannabis to be used in the research study.(iii) The anticipated duration of the study.(iv) Evidence of approval of the trial by an accredited institutional review board and any other required regulatory approvals.(v) Other information required by the authority, except that the authority may not require disclosure of any information that would infringe upon the academic clinical research center's exclusive right to intellectual property or legal obligations for patient confidentiality.(2) The academic clinical research center shall provide its findings to the authority within 365 days of the conclusion of the research study or within 365 days of publication of the results of the research study in a peer-reviewed medical journal, whichever is later.(3) The authority shall allow the exchange of medical cannabis seed between clinical registrants for the conduct of research.§ 9393.6. Research initiative.(a) Authority.--An academic clinical research center, in 20250HB0020PN2119 - 179 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 coordination with its contracted clinical registrant, may conduct a research initiative on the antimicrobial effects of applying solvent-based extraction methods and processes to microbial contamination of immature medical cannabis plants, medical cannabis plants, medical cannabis or medical cannabis products.(b) Procedure.--An academic clinical research center shall submit to the authority for approval a completed written research protocol of the planned research initiative. The authority shall grant approval or denial of the protocol within 15 days of its submissions. The following apply:(1) The research initiative shall commence no later than 30 days from the date the authority issues approval and shall be completed no later than six months from the start date of the research initiative.(2) Research initiative findings shall be provided to the authority by the academic clinical research center within 15 days of the research initiative's conclusion.(3) An academic clinical research center and its contracted clinical registrant shall present research initiative findings to the authority and the authority's research subcommittee for the authority's review and consideration. The authority shall issue a written report, with recommendations and findings regarding the use of solvent-based extraction methods and processes on microbial contamination by a clinical registrant or grower/processor.(4) Prior to implementing a recommendation of the authority under paragraph (3), a clinical registrant or grower/processor shall seek approval from the authority for a change in its grower/processor extraction process. The 20250HB0020PN2119 - 180 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 authority shall inspect the site and facility equipment. Upon approval, the authority shall issue a notice of final approval to implement the process.SUBCHAPTER JMISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSSec.9399.1. Financial and employment interests.9399.2. Insurers.9399.3. Protections for patients and caregivers.9399.4. Schools.9399.5. Day-care centers.9399.6. Zoning.9399.7. Applicability.9399.8. Lawful transport of industrial hemp, hemp, and hemp materials.§ 9399.1. Financial and employment interests.(a) Financial interests.--Except as may be provided for the judiciary by rule or order of the Pennsylvania Supreme Court, an executive-level public employee, public official or party officer, or an immediate family member thereof, shall not intentionally or knowingly hold a financial interest in a medical cannabis business establishment or in a holding company, affiliate, intermediary or subsidiary thereof, while the individual is an executive-level public employee, public official or party officer and for one year following termination of the individual's status as an executive-level public employee, public official or party officer.(b) Employment.--Except as may be provided by rule or order of the Pennsylvania Supreme Court, no executive-level public employee, public official or party officer, or an immediate 20250HB0020PN2119 - 181 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 family member thereof, shall be employed by a medical cannabis business establishment or by any holding company, affiliate, intermediary or subsidiary thereof, while the individual is an executive-level public employee, public official or party officer and for one year following termination of the individual's status as an executive-level public employee, public official or party officer.(c) Grading.--An individual who violates this section commits a misdemeanor and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of not more than $1,000 or to imprisonment for not more than one year, or both.(d) State Ethics Commission.--The State Ethics Commission shall do all of the following:(1) Issue a written determination of whether a person is subject to subsection (a) or (b) upon the written request of the person or any other person that may have liability for an action taken with respect to such person. A person that relies in good faith on a determination made under this paragraph shall not be subject to any penalty for an action taken, provided that all material facts set forth in the request for the determination are correct.(2) Publish a list of all State, county, municipal and other government positions that meet the definitions of "executive-level public employee" or "public official" as those terms are defined under 4 Pa.C.S. § 1512(b) (relating to financial and employment interests). The Office of Administration shall assist the State Ethics Commission in the development of the list, which shall be transmitted by the State Ethics Commission to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the 20250HB0020PN2119 - 182 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Pennsylvania Bulletin biennially and posted by the authority on the authority's Internet website. Upon request, each public official shall have a duty to provide the State Ethics Commission with adequate information to accurately develop and maintain the list. The State Ethics Commission may impose a civil penalty under 65 Pa.C.S. § 1109(f) (relating to penalties) upon any individual, including any public official or executive-level public employee, who fails to cooperate with the State Ethics Commission under this subsection. A person that relies in good faith on the list published by the State Ethics Commission shall not be subject to any penalty for a violation of this section.(e) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Financial interest." As defined in 4 Pa.C.S. § 1512(b)."Immediate family." As defined in 4 Pa.C.S. § 1512(b)."Party officer." As defined in 4 Pa.C.S. § 1512(b)."Public official." As follows:(1) The term shall include the following:(i) The Governor, Lieutenant Governor, a member of the Governor's cabinet, Treasurer, Auditor General and Attorney General of the Commonwealth.(ii) A member of the Senate or House of Representatives of the Commonwealth.(iii) An individual elected or appointed to any office of a county or municipality that directly receives a distribution of revenue from the fund.(iv) An individual elected or appointed to a authority, agency, board, commission, authority or other 20250HB0020PN2119 - 183 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 governmental body not included in subparagraph (i), (ii) or (iii) that directly receives a distribution of revenue from the fund.(v) An individual elected or appointed to a authority, agency, board, commission, authority, county, municipality or other governmental body not included in subparagraph (i), (ii) or (iii) with discretionary power which may influence or affect the outcome of an action or decision and who is involved in the development of regulation or policy relating to a medical cannabis business establishment or who is involved in other matters under this chapter.(2) The term does not include a member of a school board or an individual who held an uncompensated office with a governmental body prior to January 1, 2017, and who no longer holds the office as of January 1, 2017.§ 9399.2. Insurers.Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require an insurer or a health plan, whether paid for by Commonwealth funds or private funds, to provide coverage for medical cannabis. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no workers' compensation carrier, self-insured employer or other insurer in this Commonwealth may be required to provide coverage for or otherwise reimburse the cost of medical cannabis.§ 9399.3. Protections for patients and caregivers.(a) Licensure.--None of the following shall be subject to arrest, prosecution or penalty in any manner or denied any right or privilege, including civil penalty or disciplinary action by a Commonwealth licensing board or commission, solely for lawful use of medical cannabis or manufacture or sale or dispensing of 20250HB0020PN2119 - 184 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 medical cannabis, or for any other action taken in accordance with this chapter:(1) A patient.(2) A caregiver.(3) A practitioner.(4) A medical cannabis business establishment.(5) A cannabis business establishment licensed under Chapter 91 (relating to adult use of cannabis).(6) A clinical registrant or academic clinical research center under Subchapter I (relating to academic clinical research centers and clinical registrants).(7) An employee, principal or financial backer of a medical cannabis business establishment.(8) An employee of a clinical registrant or an employee of an academic clinical research center under Subchapter I.(b) Employment.--(1) No employer may discharge, threaten, refuse to hire or otherwise discriminate or retaliate against an employee regarding an employee's compensation, terms, conditions, location or privileges solely on the basis of the employee's status as an individual who is certified to use medical cannabis.(2) Nothing in this chapter shall require an employer to make any accommodation of the use of medical cannabis on the property or premises of any place of employment. If an employer makes an adverse employment decision against an employee or job applicant under this chapter, the adverse employment decision may not be challenged under any other State or local law.(3) Nothing in this chapter shall require an employer to 20250HB0020PN2119 - 185 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 commit any act that would put the employer or any person acting on its behalf in violation of Federal law.(c) Custody determination.--The fact that an individual is certified to use medical cannabis and acting in accordance with this chapter shall not by itself be considered by a court in a custody proceeding. In determining the best interest of a child with respect to custody, the provisions of 23 Pa.C.S. Ch. 53 (relating to child custody) shall apply.§ 9399.4. Schools.The Department of Education shall promulgate regulations by October 17, 2017, regarding the following:(1) Possession and use of medical cannabis by a student on the grounds of a preschool, primary school and a secondary school.(2) Possession and use of medical cannabis by an employee of a preschool, primary school and a secondary school on the grounds of the school.§ 9399.5. Day-care centers.The Department of Human Services shall promulgate regulations by October 17, 2017, regarding the following:(1) Possession and use of medical cannabis by a child under the care of a child-care or social service center licensed or operated by the Department of Human Services.(2) Possession and use of medical cannabis by an employee of a child-care or social service center licensed or operated by the Department of Human Services.(3) Possession and use of medical cannabis by employees of a youth development center or other facility which houses children adjudicated delinquent, including the separate, secure State-owned facility or unit for sexually violent 20250HB0020PN2119 - 186 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 delinquent children, as specified in section 9391.9(2) (relating to other restrictions).§ 9399.6. Notice.Upon amendment of the Controlled Substances Act (Public Law 91-513, 84 Stat. 1236) removing cannabis from Schedule I of the Controlled Substances Act, the authority shall transmit notice of the effective date of the amendment to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.§ 9399.7. Applicability.(a) (Reserved).(b) Issuance.--The issuance of permits and other authorizations shall begin upon transmittance of notice by the authority to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin that adequate temporary or permanent regulations have been adopted to initiate the program under this chapter.§ 9399.8. Lawful transport of industrial hemp, hemp, and hemp materials.(a) Limitation.--Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit or interfere with the lawful transport of industrial hemp, hemp materials, or hemp products as authorized by the United States Department of Agriculture, the United States Food and Drug Administration, and in compliance with other Federal law or rules, through the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania for delivery to an out-of-state destination.(b) Manifest.--No person shall transport industrial hemp, hemp, or hemp materials within the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, unless the person is duly authorized under Federal or State law and regulation to transport hemp and possesses a hemp manifest 20250HB0020PN2119 - 187 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 that shall include the following:(1) The name and address of the owner of the hemp.(2) The point of origin.(3) The point of delivery, including name and address.(4) The kind and quantity of packages or, if in bulk, the total quantity of hemp in the shipment.(5) The date of shipment.Section 2. Repeals are as follows:(1) The General Assembly declares that the repeals under paragraphs (2) and (3) are necessary to effectuate the addition of 35 Pa.C.S. Ch. 93.(2) The following acts and parts of acts are repealed to the extent specified:(i) Section 13(a)(31) of the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, is repealed.(ii) 18 Pa.C.S. § 7508(a)(1) and (f) are repealed.(3) The act of April 17, 2016 (P.L.84, No.16), known as the Medical Marijuana Act, is repealed.(4) All other acts and parts of acts are repealed insofar as they are inconsistent with the addition of 35 Pa.C.S. Chs. 91 and 93.Section 3. The addition of 35 Pa.C.S. Ch. 93 is a continuation of the act of April 17, 2016 (P.L.84, No.16), known as the Medical Marijuana Act. Except as otherwise provided in 35 Pa.C.S. Ch. 93, all activities initiated under the act of April 17, 2016 (P.L.84, No.16), known as the Medical Marijuana Act, shall continue and remain in full force and effect and may be completed under 35 Pa.C.S. Ch. 93. Orders, regulations, rules and decisions which were made under the Medical Marijuana Act 20250HB0020PN2119 - 188 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and which are in effect on the effective date of section 2(3) of this act shall remain in full force and effect until revoked, vacated or modified under 35 Pa.C.S. Ch. 93. Contracts, obligations and collective bargaining agreements entered into under the Medical Marijuana Act are not affected nor impaired by the repeal of the Medical Marijuana Act.Section 4. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0020PN2119 - 189 - 1234567